   #Lamontville Golden Arrows FC » Feed Lamontville Golden Arrows FC »
   Comments Feed alternate alternate

     * 1ST TEAM
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + 2019/20 LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + MATCH REPORTS
     * COACHES COLUMN
     * DISKI
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + CHALLENGE LOG
          + SHIELD FIXTURES
          + SHIELD LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
     * RESERVES
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * Official Website Official Website Official Website
     * u17
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * THE CLUB
          + CLUB RECORDS
          + HISTORY
          + TROPHY CABINET
     * NEWS
     * FAN ZONE
          + FAN IMAGES
          + DESKTOP IMAGES
          + FAN GEAR
     * CONTACT US

   Official Website Official Website Official Website Official Website

     * 1ST TEAM
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + 2019/20 LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + MATCH REPORTS
     * COACHES COLUMN
     * DISKI
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + CHALLENGE LOG
          + SHIELD FIXTURES
          + SHIELD LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
     * RESERVES
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * u17
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * THE CLUB
          + CLUB RECORDS
          + HISTORY
          + TROPHY CABINET
     * NEWS
     * FAN ZONE
          + FAN IMAGES
          + DESKTOP IMAGES
          + FAN GEAR
     * CONTACT US

   ____________________ Submit
   Lamontville Golden Arrows
   Lamontville Golden Arrows

CATCH LIVE PLAY-BY-PLAY ACTION ON OUR SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS

     *
     *
     *

CATCH LIVE PLAY-BY-PLAY ACTION ON OUR SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS

     *
     *
     *

   [capture-150x150.jpg]

   We have dropped 3 points this evening at FNB Stadium against Kaizer
   Chiefs.

   In what looked to be an equal footed game in the first 10 minutes, we
   gave the hosts their first opportunity to score as Billiat dragged a
   shot wide from the right.

   The Glamour Boys were then awarded a penalty as Billiat took a shot
   into the box. Dube, defending, had an arm out and the referee blew
   against him awarding the hosts an opportunity to take the lead.

   Cardoso stepped to the spot and put the home side into the lead.

   We had a number of well executed attacking plays. Lunga, Sibeko and
   Mutizwa did well linking up on attack but the chances we created were
   just not good enough to create the gaps to score before the break.

   Coming back onto the pitch in the second 45, we once again countered
   well against a confident home side. we created better chances to score
   but it was Chiefs who were gifted their second goal after Sibisi scored
   an own goal in the 60th minute.

   The boys fought back hard, and did create a number of good chances,
   however it was just not to be our night. Mutizwa had a good chance to
   pull one back, but put the sitter over the bar.

   The team have a couple of weeks to pull together and work on the part
   of the game where we are lacking before we face Polokwane City at home
   on the 26th October.
   [coaches-comment-stellenbosch-150x150.jpg]

   We knew it was going to be a tricky match. It needed a sober mind and
   clear thinking. We started very well and scored two goals on transition
   from Mutizwa to make it 2:0.

   The opponent tried to sit in a block but we managed to unlock them by
   playing over the top using our speed in attack. There was little
   problems in the first half and went to half time leading 2:0, playing a
   good possession and pressing game.

   The second half started and we still kept our structure. The opponent
   introduced another striker with aerial prowess and we decided to add a
   central defender. It was at that moment of switch when we lost
   concentration and conceded the first goal to be 2:1.

   We could not settle and a long diagonal ball in the center of the
   defense was missed by the keeper and the striker (Moon) scored their
   second goal to make it 2:2.

   We had committed two basic errors and surrendered our lead. We then
   changed and played 3:3:4 to chase the game. We played our usual
   possession and attacking football, created a few more chances but
   lacked the killer instinct.

   We drew the match 2:2 and dropped 2 valuable points. One of the key
   areas to improve with our team is a better mindset and also attitude of
   remaining respectful throughout the match till we win.

   Our next assignment is in two days against KAIZER Chiefs in
   Johannesburg on Tuesday.
   [arrows-stellenbosch-result-150x150.jpg]

   It was a game of two halves this afternoon at Sugar Ray Xulu stadium as
   we played to a draw with Stellenbosch FC.

   Coming into the game and playing a strong attacking game in the first
   half,we kept the visitors on the back foot.

   This saw Mutizwa getting his brace off two similar goals after being
   played into position off long balls. This forced Dr Jong off his line
   in defence and opened up his goals, allowing us to take full advantage
   of the situation.

   Going into the break 2 goals up looked promising for us. This however
   was not the case in the second half.

   Stellenbosch FC came out of the break looking fired up. They attacked
   from kick off and were not allowing us time on the ball.

   Their attacking play payed off in the 60th minute with their first goal
   and then the equaliser just 3 minutes later.

   We pulled together and attacked more in the last 15 minutes, creating
   chances, but just not being given space to capitalise on them.

   Not the result we were hoping for as we head off to play Kaizer Chiefs
   on Tuesday, however still a point to add to the seasons tally.

   We host newcomers Stellenbosch FC at the Sugar Ray Xulu tomorrow
   afternoon in our weekends ABSA Premiership game.

   With having had positive results at home so far, we will be looking at
   collect 3 points against Stellenbosh.

   While the visitors have yet to secure a victory this season, no
   assumptions can be made that they will be an easy defeat come 3pm kick
   off.

   Our attacking play has seen us come back from some close defeats, and
   should we continue this style of play, could see us with a decent goal
   haul.

   Stellenbosch have played some close encounters this season. They have
   drawn against Chippa United, Maritzburg United and most recently Black
   Leopards, while losing narrowly to Cape Town City. Their two biggest
   defeats have come against Bidvest Wits and Bloemfontein Celtic.

   The game will be televised on SS10 and covered on our social media
   channels. We would however like to have our supporters in the stands to
   get behind the team for the game.
   [ccomments-ctc-150x150.jpg]

   A very difficult match to a CTC team that always wants to play from the
   back with lots of capable technical players. Their profile of is not
   far from our profile. Both teams showed lots of similarities. The
   glaring one was the high pressing game where the team in possession
   lost the ball and immediately applied pressure to stop possible counter
   attacks. We were more aggressive in our pressing game. We pressed till
   the last minute. A sign that our team is well conditioned.

   In moments where we needed to play, we played good attacking football.
   We finished the first half with no problems except composure in our
   finishing. We also lacked the ability to counter efficiency where
   possible and we were too forgiving when we had a good opportunity to
   counter. We ended the first half 0:0.

   The second half started very well and we had two great opportunities
   the first five minutes but failed to score. The opponent had a rare
   opportunity when a cross got delivered in the box and Erasmus converted
   to make 1:0. We kept playing our way without panic and looked
   convincing.

   We made changes to effect the game, Venter for Sibiya, Sibeko for
   Lamola and Mutizwa for Gumede. We managed to pull an equalizer when
   Sibeko pulled wide on the left and left defenders behind, only to be
   fouled inside the box for penalty. Mutizwa made it 1:1.

   The team showed great mental fortitude, good physical condition.

   We played good football and created enough chances to win the match but
   wasn’t to be.
   [final-story-ctc-150x150.jpg]

   Determination from the team saw us claim a point away from home with
   just 10 minutes left to play in this afternoons game against Cape Town
   City.

   From the first whistle, we looked confident in play and managed a
   number of attacking movements against the home side.

   We did well to get behind the defence but just failed to execute the
   final touches to score, creating a number of strong chances that were
   well defended by the City defenders and the keeper.

   We should have gone into the break with at least a goal lead, but it
   was not to be.

   Our defence did well against The Citizens, Mathiane and Sibisi were on
   the whole solid at the back and Parusnath did well to play out of
   position.

   After the break, we continued defending the home sides attack and were
   unfortunate to concede in the 52nd minute.

   The boys did not drop their heads, but rather fought to create chances.
   With Sibeko, Mutizwa and Venter coming on in the half to continue the
   pace attack we were showing, we kept the pressure on the home side.

   With just 8 minutes of official time left, Sibeko played into the box
   from the far side. City’s player Seedat fouled him and Referee Gomes
   awarded a penalty.

   Mutizwa kept his cool and converted for the equaliser with minutes left
   to play.

   A solid fight back from the boys and a well earned point away.

   Next week weekend we host Stellenbosch FC at home, and would love to
   see our home supporters at Sugar Ray Xulu stadium.
   [cape-town-city-vs-golden-arrows-spetember2019-150x150.jpg]

   We travel to Cape Town this weekend to face Cape Town City in our 6th
   ABSA premiership League game of the season. Kick off is on Sunday
   afternoon at 15h00.

   Head Coach, Steve Komphela will be keen to secure points away from home
   and maintain a positive point haul. His first objective for the season
   was to secure 10 points from the first 5 games, and while not pleased
   about coming up short, has set the same objectives for the next five
   games.

   This will bolster a solid foundation to work from while keeping the
   club in contention for a Top 8 finish come the end of the season.

   Cape Town City, under the guidance of Benni McCarthy, will be wanting
   to secure home points. They currently sit just 10th on the log and have
   secured just a single win so far this season. The remainder of their
   points come from 3 draws.

   The Citizens will be wanting to take advantage of their home advantage,
   and will not be serving points on a platter come Sunday afternoon.

   The game will be televised on SS4 and we will be posting on the game on
   our social media channels.

   The match, a derby as it was had all the ingredients of it. Due to the
   international break, Lunga and Mutizwa were rested and Lamola and
   Nkombelo got the start. We had good control of the first half. We
   dominated play and created the most chances. Most of the entries were
   from our right and all we needed was a good final pass and and clinical
   finishing. Our build up play was cohesive and were solid in defense. We
   took the lead in the 36th minute through a Sibiya penalty after Lamola
   was fouled from entry from the right. The score was 1:0. We were
   comfortable in all departments and proceedings till end of first half.
   We could have increased the lead to 2:0 but Lamola lacked composure to
   finish.

   The second half was not as comfortable as the first even though there
   was more energy and physical exertion to die the Amazulu change of game
   plan. There were more explosive actions and fact that we were not in
   good control the opponent got a penalty in the 58th minute. The score
   was 1:1. Both teams were clearly eager to play for a result but
   unfortunately it wasn’t to be. We had a few chances in the second half
   as well but we wasted them. Phiri had a great strike at goal and the
   keeper was alert to concede a corner.

   The match ended 1:1. We had a target of ten points out of five matches.
   We short of two points and are starting another group of five where we
   need ten. Our next opponent is Cape Town City in Cape Town.
   [goldenarrows-amazulu-story-150x150.jpg]

   We shared the spoils with AmaZulu in this afternoons Durban Derby at
   Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium.

   In what was a game of two halves, we dominated the first 45 minutes,
   keeping our opponents on the back foot and pressing up on the wings to
   get attacking ball into the last third.

   This game plan worked well, with Sibiya and S.Dube pushing up well and
   feeding some clean balls to the box. We were unfortunate on a number of
   occasions not to benefit from the play.

   It was off one of these attacking moves that Lamola was bought down in
   the box, and the referee awarded a penalty to us.

   Sibiya converted the opportunity to give a lead heading into the break.

   The second half of the game was dominated by AmaZulu who seemed to be
   determined to claw back the lead from us. They managed to retain a lot
   of ball and made a number of attacking plays.

   We too defended a little to hard, and conceded a penalty as Ntuli was
   taken down in the box.

   He made no mistake in converting and equaled the score with just 15
   minutes of play left.

   With neither teams managing to convert chances created in the last
   quarter of the game, we had to be content with a draw and a point from
   the afternoons action.

   The team will return to training in preparation for our away game
   against Cape Town City next Sunday being their top priority.

   Tomorrow sees us host the home Durban Derby game against AmaZulu FC for
   the 2019/20 season.

   It’s an important game for us on many fronts, the first being that we
   will be wanting to maintain our unbeaten streak at home for the season.

   Having beaten Maritzburg United in the opening game of the season, then
   seeing off Chippa United in our second home game, Steve Komphela and
   his charges will be eager to maintain a winning home streak.

   Accumulating home points will help build a strong foundation for the
   season and this is an important aspect of the seasons targets.

   AmaZulu, as always, will be wanting to secure a win in the Derby. They
   will be under more pressure to perform for their fans after securing
   just a point from 4 games so far in the season.

   They will see this game as an opportunity to secure maximum points and
   keep the fans happy.

   Ticksts are available at the gates and will cost R40 for adults, and
   just R15 for kids under 12.

   We would like to encourage the green and gold army to get to Sugar Ray
   Xulu Stadium in numbers and get behind the side.

   The Diski side head to Cape Town to take on Cape Town City at Malta
   Park tomorrow.

   The side have performed well so far this season, but lacked in their
   defence and conceded goals. This has seen them on the back foot so far,
   but they remain positive going forward in the season.

   Cape Town City have won two of their encounters and lost one to
   accumulate 6 points so far this season.

   They are a fighting side who are wanting to contend for the top berth
   this season.

   The game is not a televised game, but we will post the score of the
   game as we go tomorrow.
   [coaches-comment-orlando-pirates-150x150.jpg]

   We were playing a good opponent who unfortunately had not been getting
   results even though playing good fast paced football. We needed to deny
   them the space in wide areas and also control their two holding
   midfielders. Our defensive structure was very solid and only needed us
   to connect well after regaining possession. We had a good chance to
   take the lead when Sibisi missed a header. The opponent had very little
   chance to get behind our defense. Our midfield worked extremely hard to
   protect the defence and we went to half time at 0:0.

   The second continued in the same way except more clarity given at half
   time regarding the second layer of attack positioning. We also didn’t
   take full advantage of the free kicks we got. We had yet another
   opportunity to take the lead when we successfully came out and Phiri
   crosses for Sibiya who wasted the opportunity to finish a swift counter
   attacking move. A few changes that were made were purely to freshen the
   team because structurally, we looked very good throughout the match. At
   the end the match was drawn 0:0 even though we had the better chances.
   Our next opponent is Amazulu in 14 days.
   [pirates-arrows-28-aug-2019-150x150.jpg]

   We shared the points tonight in Soweto with a nil-nil draw against
   Orlando Pirates.

   With the home side dominating in both possession and field play for the
   majority of the 90 minutes, we were forced to play a defensive game
   with few scoring opportunities.

   We were only going to score off either a quick counter play or a set
   piece and were unlucky not to get an opener in the 19th minute as
   Sibisi put a header attempt over the bar.

   The Buccaneers managed to keep the ball at their boots for the majority
   of the time and attacked from a number of angles.

   We had to defend heavily at the back and there were a number of plays
   that saw us clearing the ball off the line in what seemed like sure
   fire chances for the Soweto giants.

   Mathiane lead by example tonight and showed why he wears the captains
   armband.

   We did have a couple of opportunities in the second half. The best of
   which was when Sibiya took a well directed shot at goals. It dipped
   well, but Sandilands managed to help it over the bar.

   Sibanda made a telling save late in the game as he made a finger tip
   save off an Orlando Pirates free kick.

   At the end of the day, a point on the road and a decent result for the
   team.

   We return to Durban to prepare for the Durban Derby next month against
   AmaZulu at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium.
   [b18jcss0032-150x150.jpg]

   We head to Orlando Stadium tomorrow night for our last fixture of the
   month as we take on Orlando Pirates at 19h30.

   After a confidence boost with the win on Saturday against Chippa
   United, the team are looking forward to facing off in their mid-week
   game in Soweto.

   The performance over the weekend was a turn around both defensively and
   on attack from the second round of the competition and should the boys
   keep up the level of game, they have a great chance of returning home
   with another three points.

   Orlando Pirates will want to secure the home win. They have secured
   just four points from the first three games of the season.

   The Buccaneers started the season with a win against Bloem Celtic but
   have since lost to Highlands Park, and in their last outing drew with
   AmaZulu at King Zwelithini Stadium.

   The game should be an interesting one to watch, and support will be
   welcomed at Orlando Stadium.

   We will be doing a play-by-play on the game, so follow us on social
   media for updates on the game. The game will also be live on SuperSport
   4 (channel 204)
   [5102565f-743d-47b2-be13-a354e1713061-150x150.jpg]

   We played this match under difficult circumstances after the 5:0 away
   accidental loss to Celtic. We had ten days to work on the players moral
   and confidence. We also paid more attention to our defensive
   organization and it showed in the Chippa match.

   We tried different central pairings at the back and we settled for
   Mathiane and Sibisi. We defended the opponent very well and scored the
   opening goal via Sibiya after a good combination with Makhubela. The
   score was 1:0. Even though we didn’t start as good as we wished. After
   the goal, we grew in confidence and finished the first half very
   strong.

   In the dressing room we declared that the worse result in the second
   half should be to draw the half but our desire was to win it as well.
   The opponent started by bringing in two wide players and pushed us
   deeper into our half. We adapted quickly and regained our superiority.

   As we were in ascendency with seven minutes to go, the opponent were
   awarded a dubious penalty and equalized from there. After the opponent
   goal, we had a chance when Mutizwa went one on one with the goalkeeper
   but missed. Within a minute, a second chance was created when Sabelo
   crosses from the left and Mutizwa headed the ball goal bound but hit
   the upright, quickly reacted to finish the chance and made it 2:1.

   The opponent had no chance to bounce back and we won the match 2:1.
   This was our second win at home. A confidence boost after the CELTICS
   disaster.

   We preparing to face a wounded Orlando Pirates away at Orlando Stadium
   in four days.
   [67ea1456-7f08-494d-95e1-8783d1d2088c-150x150.jpg]

   A late goal in extra time secured the game for us this afternoon
   against Chippa United.

   It was a game of two halves that saw us dominating play in the first 45
   minutes and putting the visitors under pressure from impress attacking
   plays up the flanks. Both Sibiya and Lunga put pressure on the Chippa
   defence a number of times, with S.Dube doing the same from the opposite
   side of the field.

   The atacking play paid off in the 31st minute with Sibiya striking the
   ball well, keeping it low. It curved in towards the goal, catching
   Tignyemb off guard, struck the far post and bounced into the goals.

   A well fought for goal to take the team into the break with a lead.

   Coming out of the change rooms, it seemed to be Chippa who were
   fighting for the domaination on the field. They had a number of
   attacking plays that were well defended by Mathiane and Sibisi at the
   back.

   We conceded a penalty after a hand ball in the box, which Komane
   converted to equalise the scores with just 10 minutes of regulation
   play left.

   A solid final fight back from us left Mutizwa looking deflated as he
   missed an easy shot on goal, but instead of accepting defeat, he fought
   back and managed to guide the ball into the net to clinch a win for the
   side just 3 minutes into extra time.

   A good performance for the side today. They showed fight and character
   in all aspects of their game.

   The win will also give us confidence ahead of our game in just 4 days
   time against Orlando Pirates in Johannesburg.
   [story-chippa-24aug-2019-150x150.jpg]

   We get our weekend underway tomorrow afternoon with our third ABSA
   Premiership game against Chippa United. Kick off at 3pm, Sugar Ray Xulu
   Stadium.

   After a break in the league games for the MTN8, we have had some time
   to pull together and work on our game plan for tomorrows fixture.

   The technical staff and players have been working closely together as
   they look to bounce back in the 2019/20 campaign.

   We will be looking for 3 points at home and to add to the foundation of
   the campaign.

   Chippa United will be looking to secure their first win of the season
   after playing to two draws so far this season.

   Clinton Larsen has been reported to be expecting ‘his players to fight
   for every inch’ on the field, and is not expecting the game to be an
   easy one.

   The game should be an action packed encounter, so get to the stadium to
   experience it live.

   Tickets will be available at the stadium at R40 for adults and R15 for
   kids under 12. Gates open at 12:00
   [arrows-superposrt-25aug-2019-150x150.jpg]

   The Diski team take on SuperSport United at home on Sunday 25 August in
   the third game of the Multichoice Diski Challenge.

   The team has grown in confidence since kicking off their season and
   after losing to Kaizer Chiefs in their first outing, did well to fight
   back against Bloem Celtic last weekend, but eventually losing 3-1 after
   equalising.

   The home game could give the side the added confidence they need as
   they look for their first win for the season.

   SuperSport United have not yet lost a game, and will be looking to
   continue on their positive road on Sunday.

   In their first game they did well against Maritzburg United, with a
   convincing win at Harry Gwala Stadium. Their second encounter saw them
   draw against Stellenbosch FC.

   Entry to the game is free, so get to the stadium and come and watch the
   youngsters in action at Sugar Ray Stadium at 12pm on Sunday.
   [story-150x150.jpg]

   The Diski team take to the field again on Sunday with an away game
   against Bloem Celtic at Dr Molemela Stadium.

   After having a shaky start to the season last weekend against Kaizer
   Chiefs, the team has been working on a number of different aspects to
   improve their game ahead of Sundays encounter.

   It was a pressurised baptism into the folds of professional football
   for the youngsters, and one compacted by the fact that it was a
   Festival that they played their first game.

   This weekends game will be a more intimate affair and should be better
   handled when it comes to nerves.

   Bloemfontein Celtic will also be looking for their first win of the
   season after losing 3-0 in their opening game. Having home advantage
   could give them an upper hand but our players and technical team will
   hopefully have prepared for this in their game plan.

   We look forward to a positive result and wish the youngsters well in
   the weekends game.
   [coaches-comments-celtic-aug-2019-150x150.jpg]

   One of the most difficult and embarrassing matches to understand
   because of the outcome. The team performed very well creating numerous
   opportunities only to be denied by the goalkeeper.

   We had the worst start, almost similar to Sundowns last season in
   Pretoria. We concede a goal in 45” after start of the match, when Dube
   played the ball behind our midfield in build attack and the opponent
   went straight to our goals and Mabena scored to make it 1:0.

   The second goal was yet another mistake where we failed to guard the
   near post and were punished to a 2:0. We then took a decision to make a
   sub and chase the game. Indeed after the replacement of S.Dube by
   Mutizwa, another striker we immediately got three clear cut
   opportunities from Venter, the deflected shot, keeper made a brilliant
   save.

   Mutizwa had two one on ones with the keeper. Yet again the keeper made
   great saves. A game of football is cruel. You miss your chances, the
   opponent is ruthless, you pay the price. We did in this match. All the
   goals we conceded were pure elementary defensive errors and we failed
   to convert our own clear cut chances.

   We had better chances than the opponent but the opponent took their
   half chances and we failed. The errors were the same even in goal four
   and five.

   The center of our defense made the worse error in the fourth and fifth
   we could not deal with defending the far post. We played a great game
   but committed cardinal mistake and the opponent on the day was precise
   while their goalkeeper had a man of the match performance.

   The biggest challenge is to learn from this result and work on the
   players’ confidence and moral. Our next match is CHIPPA Utd at home.
   [celtic-arrows-11aug2019-150x150.jpg]

   A well executed game plan from Bloemfontein Celtic this afternoon kept
   us on the back-foot from kick off and did not allow us to get into the
   action.

   From kick off, the home side pushed up behind the defence and scored
   within the opening minute to open their account against us.

   For the full 90 minutes, we were closed down on the attack and punished
   for the mistakes we made on the field.

   Celtic countered quickly and used the ball and possession well.

   An early change in the first half, bringing Mutizwa onto the attack,
   created a number more chances for us, but the Celtic keeper played out
   of his boots to keep a clean sheet, and his team on a positive path in
   the game.

   With the break coming up, the side will have some time to correct the
   mistakes made this afternoon before we face Chippa United on the 24th
   at home.
   [ebmz-flwsaaah_5-150x150.jpg]

   We did not have the desired start to the Multichoice Diski season this
   afternoon with a 4-1 loss to Kaizer Chiefs at King Zwelithini Stadium.

   The game plan for us was to try and retain possession and put pressure
   on the visitors. Kaizer Chiefs game plan countered this from the
   beginning as they pushed the ball long and high over our defence,
   creating gaps and chances to score.

   We managed to open the scoring however in the 38th minute after a
   failed header from Dube was lobbed back into the box and Nala headered
   the ball into the back of the net.

   Amakhosi responded just two minutes later as Milazi nudged the ball
   into the back of the net. Team mate Hoala then scored from the opposite
   side only three minutes after that to go into the break a goal ahead.

   Returning after the break, we tried to change our method of attack, but
   could just not get into a position to cause any major threat. Nala
   almost had a second chance to score and Dube pushed into the box behind
   the Chiefs defence, but was closed down quickly.

   The game was over for us after Milazi got his brace and then Bunting
   converted a penalty in the 65th minute. The inexperienced players were
   just not able to turn the game around from this.

   There is a lot to build on from the game, and the technical staff have
   a bit of work to do ahead of next weekends game against Bloem Celtic
   next weekend at Dr. Molemela Stadium
   [story-celtic-150x150.jpg]

   Our second round of ABSA Premiership action takes place on Sunday as we
   face Bloemfontein Celtic at Dr Molemela Stadium at 15h00.

   After a 3 point win in the opening weekend of the competition against
   Maritzburg United, Coach Steve Komphela could be looking at using the
   new players in the side again after promising performances from the
   debutantes.

   The players executed the game plan well in the season opener, but there
   was room for improvement on converting the chances created.

   The team look positive ahead of Sundays clash and are looking to bag
   another 3 points in the competition and build up steam for the seasons
   objectives.

   Bloemfontein Celtic started off with a tough fixture against Orlando
   Pirates, and battled to perform against the Soweto Powerhouse. After 90
   minutes they went down 3-1 with Mahashe scoring their lone goal just
   minutes before the half time break.

   They will be looking to secure some points, and will be hoping to walk
   away the victors at home on Sunday.

   The game will be televised live on SS4. We will also cover the game
   across our social media platforms should you be unable to watch.
   [upcoming-150x150.jpg]

   Diski action kicks off this weekend with a Diski festival at King
   Zwelithini Stadium.

   We take on Amakhosi in the first game of the extended season being
   called ‘It’s Massive’, that sees teams playing each other both home and
   away.

   We get the whole season underway with this game that kicks off at 12pm
   on Saturday.

   Another season first for the Diski sides is that only u-21 players will
   be eligable to play in the tournament.

   Local support would be great, and tickets are available from King
   Zwelithini stadium from 13h00 today.

   All matches in the festival will also be broadcast on SS4 and SS10.

   Get to Umlazi and come and see some new local talent in action.
   [coachescomment-maritzburg-aug-2019-150x150.jpg]

   The result was a great start to the season after coming out of six
   weeks of preseason preparation. We had five debutantes in our team, who
   performed well on the day. We played well beginning of the match and
   defended sensibly. We went to half time well in control except moments
   where the opponent looked to play over the top behind our wingbacks.

   We also dealt with the aerial challenge from Moseamedi their top
   striker. We started with a positive goal injection right at the
   beginning second half. Gumede received a lobbed ball behind the defence
   from restart and calmly played the ball over the goalkeeper. Exactly
   what we work on at training. Something we highlighted as we were
   leaving the dressing room.

   After the goal we had problems controlled he Game as the opponent kept
   pushing to find an equalizer. We defended very well with lots of
   bravery and commitment. We dealt with the many corners we conceded
   where under circumstances we would have conceded. A great start to the
   beginning of the season. We looking forward to our next match against
   Celtic in Bloemfontein.
   [g040819g0037-150x150.jpg]

   After a goalless first half, it took just 30 seconds of the second half
   for Michael Gumede to open his scoring account for the team.

   This was to be the only goal in a well contested match this afternoon
   at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium between the KZN rivals.

   The first half of the game provided some entertaining football, with
   both sides working hard to secure possession and playing into attacking
   positions, but neither were able to capitalise on their chances.

   Coming out after the break, Gumede connected a lob from the near side
   of the field well and found the back of the net.

   The second half was high paced and entertaining. Maritzburg United
   seemed determined to equalise, but some solid defending from the team
   saw off their attack.

   Both the players and the coaching staff will be happy with the 3 points
   earned today, but will proabably be looking at the game and deciding on
   whats needed to change to convert more chances as they prepare for next
   weekends game against Bloemfontein Celtic
   [arrows-vs-maritzburg-4-aug-150x150.jpg]

   We kick of the 2019/20 season with a home KZN Derby against Maritzburg
   United tomorrow afternoon.

   After a positive pre season campaign the team is positive ahead of the
   clash, which kicks off at 3pm, Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium.

   The Derby game is always an important fixture in our calendar and the
   team is looking to continue in their winning record against the Team of
   Choice.

   Last season we were victorious against the team of choice on both
   occassions.

   The team is eager to continue the winning streak and secure 3 points in
   the opening game of the season.

   Tickets are available at the stadium at R40 for adults and R15 for kids
   u12.

   Goals from Romario Dlamini and newly signed Michael Gumede secured the
   title of 2019 Premier’s Cup champs for us this afternoon.

   After an entertaining game this morning, that saw us win 3-0 over
   Uthongathi FC, the team seemed positive about their pre-season training
   and fitness.

   Coach Steve Komphela took the opportunity to further test some player
   combinations and on the whole seemed satisfied with the teams efforts.

   Keeping two clean sheets in the competition was positive. In the first
   game Sibanda made his presence known with some well executed saves and
   Gumede gave a consistant 90 minutes in the final.

   After going into the break of the final at 0-0 the boys came back in
   the second half and were explosive on the ball from the whistle.

   We played some well executed attacking movements and were just not
   managing to find the finishng touches.

   Just 5 miutes in we had the first breakthrough with Dlamini converting
   a well delivered cross.

   Ten minutes later, Gumede doubled the lead.

   A solid effort from the team and some entertaining football.

   The team will continue preparations for the seasons opening game next
   Sunday against Maritzburg United this week.
   [b8b0e55e-93e1-4572-a1d0-5b7edcd1f794-150x150.jpg]

   Our u17 team are currently on their mid season break which happens in
   conjunction with the July school holidays.

   The youngsters have performed quite well in the SAFA Durban central
   League so far and sit 3rd on the log.

   They have achieved this after 8 games, having 6 wins,suffering 2 loses.

   KZN Academy are top of the log with a 9 point lead, but have played an
   extra 2 games more then us. We are confident of our ability to secure 3
   points from each of the encounters.

   The remainder of the season promises to be exciting as the team will
   fight for the top birth on the league table.

   The remainder of the log is as follows
   [bd810e5e-89a2-47bc-9d71-c8709630bc27-150x150.jpg]

   Our pre-season preparations continued this week with a series of tests
   being done with the players to asses different aspects of their
   agility, recovery and power.

   Yesterday the players started the testing session with a body
   composition test. The main objective of this test is to determine fat
   percentage and to build a diet and exercise regime around this going
   forward.

   Flexibility of the players was tested with a ‘sit and reach test and a
   vertical jump test checked the ‘off the mark’ power of the players.

   A speed session was then carried out with players taking part in 10m
   and 30m sprints. Their Anaerobic power was then put to the test with a
   repeated sprint test.

   Todays session will include the following. ‘Functional movement
   screening’ which is determined through 7 different tests, the players
   agility will be determined through the arrow head tests and then
   recovery with be tested by using the ‘yo-yo intermittent test’

   All of these will help to set up effective and personalised training
   schedules for each player in order to to achieve optimum performance
   for when the season kicks off on the 04th August against Maritzburg
   United.
   [784bf669-9ec6-44a7-97f3-a0286b3370e6-150x150.jpg]

   Rivalry at a football club does not stop when the first team have their
   off season, as we have junior teams that play their season during this
   period.

   This weekend sees a double header Derby weekend with the u17 side
   taking on AmaZulu FC both on Saturday 22 June and Sunday 23 June in
   their league in the morning.

   Saturday’s game sees our youngsters hosting AmaZulu at the outer fields
   at Moses Mabhida stadium, and then on Sunday we play amazulu again at
   Siripat

   Both games will be played at 10h15 in the morning.

   Our u17 side has performed well so far in the season, having won 5 of
   their 6 games, while losing to KZN Academy on a close 2-1 scoring game.

   If you would like to catch some of the young players in action, get to
   either of the fixtures and show your support.
   [b18hesm0527-150x150.jpg]

   What is your off season training schedule like? Do you exercise every
   day?

   LL: It’s not as intense as the usual training done during season after
   all I am on holiday, but i do make sure I keep my fitness up by
   training 3 times a week

   How did you get into soccer?

   LL: It started at a young age as a young boy from the village. I saw it
   as something that kept me busy and away from trouble. When I got to
   matric that’s when I really started to enjoy soccer for the sport it
   is.

   Who were some soccer role models you looked up to when you were growing
   up?

   LL: Jerry Skhosana is the 1st mentor I looked up to. He was my coach in
   the Vodacom League and he is the coach that built me into the player I
   am,  even teaching me the step over was a skill I perfected from him.

   Who is the sports icon that has influenced you the most in your career?

   LL: It still remains Jerry Skhosana.

   Do you have a special routine or superstition before you play a game?

   LL: I have been taught at a young age by my grandmother that the most
   important thing to do everyday is to pray no matter what the outcome is
   I always make sure to pray and ask God for guidance before every game.

   What do you do on your off time? Do you have a hobby?

   LL: The most important thing I do is give time to my family as they
   live in Joburg and i am Durban, so most of my time is spent with them.
   We have just come back from the Kruger from a mini holiday.

   Another thing close to my heart which I do every year is a tournament
   called the ‘Lerato Lamola Winter Games’ under the the Lerato Lamola
   Foundation.  It’s a way I give back to the community by hosting a
   soccer tournament which the main aim is collecting school shoes and
   pads for the kids in the community of Ivory Park and Mapela in Limpopo
   as a way to say thank you.

   How would you like to be remembered in the game?

   LL: I would like to be remembered as a player who played fair football,
   someone who never gave up on my dream of playing soccer despite the age
   that I started playing professional football and for scoring goals.

   Who is your favourite team mate and why?

   LL: Matome Mathiane! We have played together from ABC Motsepe League
   /Vodacom League and continued our friendship. Since then he has become
   more like a brother then a friend or teammate.

   Which coach has had the biggest impact on your game, and why?

   LL: I wouldn’t be able to pick one because each coach that has coached
   me has taught me something new and each had a impact on the player I am
   today
   [e0cb9cb0-9f09-40af-815a-c770d9c3acae-150x150.jpg]
     *
     *
     *
     *

   The squad returned to training today ahead of the 2019/2020 season. The
   players all look to have retained their fitness levels and will go
   through a rigorous assessment over the next two weeks to determine
   where we need to improve on their skills and fitness in the pre-season
   period.

   The coaching staff have complied an extensive program that will see the
   players put through a strict first week training that will form the
   foundation of endurance raining for the season. This will help to
   improve on match fitness as well as recovery rates of the players.

   The sessions that the lads will be taking part in will be carried on on
   the field, in the gym as well as a number of beach sessions.

   Over the next couple of weeks, the fitness of players who were carrying
   injuries will also be assessed and training routines will be
   implemented to make sure that they will be match ready when the season
   starts in 7 weeks time.
   [da6d9d98-3919-4c42-a958-0fc4bbdeb3b4-150x150.jpg]

   What is your off season training schedule like? Do you exercise every
   day?

   DV: I practice 3 times in a week. The 1st day of my schedule is core
   training as well as injury prevention exercises.

   How did you get into soccer?

   DV:  My PSL career started in the 2009/2010 season when coach Clinton
   Larsen recruited me to Bloemfontein Celtics.

   Who were some soccer role models you looked up to when you were growing
   up?

   DV: I liked watching Steven Pienaar a lot and Kaka from Brazil.

   Who is the sports icon that has influenced you the most in your career?

   DV: Tefu Mashamaite, he has a good work ethic on the field.

   Do you have a special routine or superstition before you play a game?

   DV: My special routine before each and every game is calling my mother
   and listening to deep rap music to calm my nerves.

   What do you do on your off time? Do you have a hobby?

   DV: I usually watch movies and just relax on my off days. I don’t have
   a hobby.

   How would you like to be remembered in the game?

   DV: I would like to be remembered as a person that loved his job and
   gave 100% at each and every training session and game.

   Who is your favourite team mate and why?

   DV: Lerato Lamola and Nduduzo Sibiya. They welcomed me very well in the
   team and made it easier for me to get used to the city.
   [eeba8178-e81b-4357-9cbf-f02357f8eefd-150x150.jpg]
   [/vc_column]

   This weekend sees the annual #WeAreOneFestival taking place at Princess
   Magogo Stadium on both Saturday 15th and Sunday 16th June.

   With a wide variety of activities taking place over the two day period,
   from a fun walk to a day of music, there is sure to be some
   entertainment for all of the family.

   The weekend kicks off on Saturday 15 June with the Jeff Radebe Fun Walk
   from Rydavale grounds in Phoenix to Princess Magogo, in which the
   former minister will take part.

   Upon arrival at the Princess Magogo stadium there will be a 45 minute
   aerobics session rounded off with the following activities

   Phoenix LFA vs Kwamashu LFA (11:00)

   Newlands Gogo’s vs Kwa Mashu Gogo’s (12:30)

   Media game (Ukhozi vs Media) 13:00

   Amazulu U19 vs Royal Eagles U19 (14:00)

   Lamontville Golden Arrows legends vs Amazulu legends (15:00)

   Sunday 16 June sees a music festival at the Stadium with a wide variety
   of performers taking part including DJ Oros, Mondli Mzizi and other

   The festival is a social cohesion project aimed at breaking racial
   walls between the Inanda, Ntuzuma, KwaMashu, Phoenix and Newlands
   Communities.

   Get to Princess Magogo Stadium this weekend to enjoy this amazing
   initiative.
   [e7c05ae1-248c-48ea-9b56-eb91c1042843-150x150.jpg]

   What is your off season training schedule like? Do you exercise every
   day?

   MM: It is important to keep your fitness up. Although I dont train
   every day I do have a strict schedule that sees me training on Mondays,
   Tuesdays, Thursdays and Saturdays

   How did you get into soccer?

   MM: I got in to soccer while I was still young. When i was 8, my dad
   was playing soccer, he used to take me with to his games and that
   ignited the fire and passion in me for the game.

   Who were some soccer role models you looked up to when you were growing
   up?

   MM: Definately Lucas Rhoo Radebe and Doctor Khumalo

   Who is the sports icon that has influenced you the most in your career?

   MM: Tefu Mashamaite, he has a good work ethic on the field.

   Do you have a special routine or superstition before you play a game?

   MM: I dont have any superstitions, but I do put everything to God and
   pray for blessings and protection before anything.

   What do you do on your off time? Do you have a hobby?

   MM: I enjoy reading reading books and also like to motivate school kids
   in their lives.

   How would you like to be remembered in the game?

   MM: I would like to be remembered as that special player who’s always
   there to protect and encourage other players while being a good leader
   to them

   Who is your favourite team mate and why?

   MM: Thats got to be Siyabonga Dube. He is always committed to his job
   and respectseach and every team mate.

   Which coach has had the biggest impact on your game, and why?

   MM: Serame Letsoaka. He was like a father to every player and a good
   motivator. He allowed us to express ourselves.
   [8725d8aa-5c77-4a52-b20f-32c75b953540-150x150.jpg]

   Our Reserve side concluded their 2019 season over the weekend, playing
   their final two games in the SAB League.

   After playing 11 games, winning 7, drawing 2 and only losing 2 games,
   we finished on 23 points, Just 3 points behind Khawastan FC who
   finished top of the log

   While not progressing to the playoff section of the competition, Coach
   Lindani Shezi feels positive about the level of players and is happy
   with the overall results in a season that has had its own share of
   difficulties.

   ‘It’s been a great season and we have promising young players who are
   the future of the team as our main aim is to develop. Winning the
   league will be a bonus. Its doesn’t make sense to win at the end
   forgetting the purpose of development.’

   ‘And it was a tough short season as we were playing 2 games a week
   which was demanding on the young players. I was happy to achieve what
   we did.’

   ‘Next season we will have a better season as now we have a solid
   foundation, as well as having players who will do well for our MDC
   team.’

   With some of these young players coming through our ranks over the
   years, it will be great to see some of the aspiring talent progressing
   into next seasons MultiChoice Diski Side.
   [ff4d1a05-94e2-4b42-aec9-be8fddcd82df-150x150.jpg]

   Our Reserve side have been doing well in the SAB Central Stream F
   league and are aiming at toppling Khawastan FC to win the Stream and
   proceed to the next stage of thier competition.

   Sitting second on the log with equal points to Khawastan FC who are at
   the top of the table,only thing that differs is the goal difference.
   The team have a chance to proceed to the following stage of the
   competition if we finish top of the log.

   They have achieved this standing by winning 6 of their 8 games, drawing
   1 and losing just 1 to accumulate 19 points.

   In the next stage, all teams who have won their respective streams,
   play off against each other to represent the Ethekwini region in
   Provincial play offs.

   The two winning teams in the final part of the competition, win
   promotion to the ABC Motsepe League.
   [diski-shield-winners-2019-150x150.jpg]

   The Diski Shield final went down to the wire this afternoon, with a
   penalty from Siboniso Conco clinching the game before full time.

   An explosive first 45 saw Mamelodi Sundowns open the scoring in the 3rd
   minute after Conco won the ball, passed it back, but the ball was
   intercepted at the back and Khomotjo Rachoene took his opportunity,
   struck the ball well and found the back of the net.

   The team never sat back and accepted their position and fought back
   from the restart. After a number of plays into the final third Siboniso
   Conco then managed to get behind the defence and took his shot, beating
   Jayvin Chislom and equalising the score.

   The remainder of the half way an end to end affair. Both teams created
   a number of scoring opportunities but neither was able to extend the
   lead before the break

   Returning for the second 45, both sides tapped off on the pace of the
   game and seemed to be more conservative in their approach to the game.
   Still, neither were able to find the back of the net.

   Both keepers had a number of great saves to keep their teams in
   contention, and Sundowns were unlucky when a shot hit the upright.

   Frustration on the field from all of the players was evident and this
   started showing in the number of free kicks being conceded. In the 88th
   minute though, Siboniso Conco was bought down in the box. The referee
   awarded a penalty and Conco stepped up to the 12 yard mark.

   He made no mistake with his shot and secured the late win and title for
   the team.

   Thank you to all who were at the stadium to support the team, it was an
   amazing atmosphere to be around and the club and team would like to
   extend their thanks for the support shown.
   [arrows-wits-11-may-2019-result-150x150.jpg]

   After playing a goalless first half, it took just one minute of play in
   the second half for Bidvest Wits to open their account and hold on for
   the full 90 minutes to dash our hopes of a Top 8 finish for the season.

   The first half saw some quick explosive paced play from both sides. The
   game plan looked similar from both teams. Each tried getting behind the
   defence and then attacking. The plan did not seem to work for either
   side, and although exciting play for the spectators, the frustration
   was evident from the players.

   Returning to field after the break, it took just a minute for Mhango to
   find the back of the net. Wits were awarded a free kick on the far side
   of the field. They played it up the wing, put a cross into the middle
   and Mhango found himself in enough space to take the shot.

   We fought hard to find an equaliser, and there were some great plays
   from us. But nothing we threw at the opposition created a clear cut
   chance for us.

   Not the end to the season we were hoping for. But we live to fight
   another season in the PSL.

   We would like to thank all of our supporters for your dedication to the
   team this season, and look forward to seeing you again for the 2019/20
   one
   [arrows-wits-11-may-2019-150x150.jpg]

   The climax of the season takes place tomorrow afternoon as we take on
   Bidvest Wits at Princess Magogo Stadium at 3pm. An important encounter
   for us, and our last opportunity to try and secure a Top 8 finish in
   the season.

   We will need to beat Bidvest Wits and hope that other results go our
   way as we look to bridge a two-point gap to eighth placed Highlands
   Park.

   Steve Komphela will need to look at starting with an attacking 11 if we
   have a hope of achieving a Top 8 finish to the season.

   The Clever Boys come off a win against Baroka FC and are keen to
   achieve as high a finish to the season as they can.

   Currently sitting just 4 points below Orlando Pirates, a win away from
   home could see them finishing second on the log depending on the
   results of the other games today.

   Gavin Hunt will be counting on their attack, which has kept them in
   contention for the greater deal of the season.

   We appeal to our supporters to fill the stadium and get behind the team
   in their final push of the season.

   We will be giving you a play by play feed on our social media
   platforms, so follow us if you want to keep up to date with the games
   proceedings.
   [shield-final-story-150x150.jpg]

   The seasons work for the Diski team comes to a head on Sunday as they
   face Mamelodi Sundowns in the final of the shield competition at King
   Zwelithini Stadium. Kick off will be at 13h00.

   The team has put the hard yards into the exciting cup style competition
   and are determined to walk away with the honours come 3pm on Sunday.

   The team beat Chippa FC, AmaZulu FC and lost to Maritzburg United in
   the first stage of the competition, then ousted Orlando Pirates
   at Kanyamazane Stadium in the semi final to secure a berth in this
   weekends game.

   Sundowns will be as eager to lift the Shield cup, last time we faced
   eachother in the competition. It was Sundowns who knocked us out in the
   Semi finals.

   Entry is free and tickets can be collected at the stadium on Thursday
   and Friday, 09 & 10 May 2019 from 13h00.
   [coachescomment-masandawana-150x150.jpg]

   A very bizarre and highly interesting match we played. We had the worst
   start of the season and conceded two goals within the first 6 minutes
   of the match even though the first goal was an offside. We failed to
   control our emotions and made serious technical errors and lost
   possession consistently while we kept slipping due to unplayable
   surface.

   It took us a while to settle and as soon as we settled, we looked the
   known Golden Arrows unfortunately we were already two goals down. We
   finished the first half with more confidence and all that was needed
   was frequent final third entries to try get a goal. The first half
   finished at 2:0 but we were clearly on ascendancy.

   We made a sub right at half time and changed our formation to a diamond
   midfield. We had good control of the second half, we created more
   chances even though not as clear cut. We kept good possession and
   varied our attack well. Our players played more as a team. The better
   second half failed to yield a result even though the opponent was put
   under severe pressure.

   We had big ambitions of gaining three points and fall within the Top 8
   bracket on the log. The defeat left us at position 10 from 29 matches
   with one match remaining. Our main objective is still to win our last
   home fixture and last match of the season against BIDVEST Wits on
   Saturday to try and attain a Top 8 position.
   [sundowns-2-0-arrows-07-may-2019-150x150.jpg]

   Two goal in the first 6 minutes of the game was enough to seal a
   victory for Mamelodi Sundowns at Loftus Stadium tonight.

   Coming out of the blocks firing,Sundowns caught us on the back foot and
   struck within the first three minutes of play. In what looked like a
   play that saw Kekana score from an off side position, this set the mood
   of the game for the first ten minutes. We failed to consolidate the
   defence and Sundowns took advantage of this.

   Just two minutes later we allowed Zwane into space and the home side
   extended their lead.

   The team seemed to pull themselves together, doing a better job turning
   over the ball in the mid field and feeding Lunga on the line. He
   managed to create a number of plays that saw some good delivery to the
   box, but we were unable to create any definate threat in the first 45.

   Returning to the field after the break, we seemed to look more
   composed. We created a number of chances but were unable to find the
   target once we got a shot off. With only 3 shots on target we never
   challenged Onyango enough to turn the score.

   We will return to Durban and prepare for the last game of the season
   against Bidvest Wits. the game will be played at Princess Magogo
   Stadium, with kick off being at 15h00.

   We appeal to our home support to get to the stadium in numbers and get
   behind the team in our last push to achieve a Top8 finish in the
   season.
   [pitso-komphela-armwrestle-150x150.jpg]

   We travel to Pretoria to take on Mamelodi Sundowns in our last away
   game of the 2018/19 season. The game will kick off tomorrow night at
   19h30.

   With the chase on for a Top 8 finish this season, the game is an
   important one for use to win. We are currently sitting at 10th place on
   the log, 2 points short of our season goal. Winning tomorrow nights
   encounter would place us in 8th position, just 1 point ahead of
   Highlands Park.

   With 2 draws and 3 wins in our last 5 games, Coach Steve Komphela will
   be hoping that the team can keep up a positive momentum come game time.

   Mamelodi Sundown will be throwing all of their attention on their last
   two games of the Premiership after bowing out of the CAF Champions
   League on Saturday afternoon. They are just a point off the top spot
   and can take a stand in the local competition with a win at home.

   It is a do or die situation for both teams and sets the stage for a
   promising match.

   The game will be televised live on SuperSport 4, with match build up
   starting at 19h00.

   A play by play feed on our social media platforms will also be
   available, and if you can not catch the action, follow us for all of
   the games news.
   [goldenarrows-pirates-shield-semi-150x150.jpg]

   The Diski team have secured their place in the 2018/19 final of the
   Diski Shield after beating Orlando Pirates this afternoon at
   Kanyamazane Stadium.

   The first half of the game saw neither team managing to find the back
   of the net. Orlando Pirates seemed to have decided to spend the first
   45 defending their goals and hoping to tire us out in the heat. We did
   well to get behind the defence, with Jingxi doing some exceptional work
   to get some pin-point crosses into the box.

   Non of the opportunities could be capitalised on, although there were
   some close calls. Conco had a blistering shot at goals that hit the bar
   and Sabelo was denied after his attempt was tipped over the bar.

   Coming back after the break, Pirates seemed to have changed their game
   plan and used their possession in more attacking play.

   We were denied a penalty appeal after Nkomo took Conco down in the box,
   however we were on the end of a favourable decision in the 76th minute
   when he committed the same offence.  Conco sent the keeper the wrong
   way and opened the scoring.

   Minutes later, Sabelo tapped in for the second after running onto a
   ball put through into the box by Maphumulo. In the end, as well
   deserved win for the team.

   We will now go through to the final of the competition on the 12 May at
   King Zwelithini Stadium where we will meet Mamelodi Sundowns to fight
   for the glory.
   [steve-komphela-quotes-750x375-150x150.jpg]

   The match was always going to be very difficult to play because the
   opponent was fighting to survive relegation and we were fighting to
   move into Top 8 for the first time this season. We had a few
   suspensions and we had to withdraw S. Dube on the last minute due to an
   ankle injury.

   We started very well and took the lead within first fifteen minutes
   when Mutizwa broke the line and got fouled by the goalkeeper. He
   converted the penalty to make it 1:0. Six minutes later he was fouled
   again outside the box and he converted the resulting free kick to make
   it 2:0.

   The opponent drew one back shortly and the score was 2:1 till end of
   first half. The second half was a contested affair with very little to
   show. Our team played in patches and managed to deal with the direct
   balls played to a Eleazar Rodgers. It was only towards the end of the
   match where the opponent was more forceful and applied more pressure to
   try win the match but we were more concentrated and dealt with the
   threat.

   The match ended 2:1 but still we couldn’t break into the Top 8 bracket
   because of the Celtic win against Kaizer Chiefs earlier on.

   Our next two matches for the season are Mamelodi Sundowns in nine days
   and later to be followed by Bidvest Wits as the last of the season.
   [pirates-arrows-shield-sem_2i-150x150.jpg]

   This Wednesday sees us taking part in the semi final of the 2018/19
   Diski Shield competition against Orlando Pirates at Kanyamazane Stadium
   in Mpumalanga.

   The game will kick off at 3pm on Workers Day.

   This innovative competition is in its second year and is proving to be
   one enjoyed by all of the club reserve sides.

   The youngsters road to the competition semi final saw them accumulate 6
   points with 2 wins in their table. After AmaZulu tried hard in their
   final group game to try and take the lead on points difference, it
   eventually went down to our head to head result with them to determine
   who would progress to the semi finals.

   We progressed to the semi’s last year before being knocked out by
   Mamelodi Sundowns, and are aiming to go to the final this year by
   knocking Orlando Pirates out on Wednesday.

   When we met the Buccaneers in the Diski Challenge in September, we
   secured a win at Orlando Stadium with a 2-1 win over them, and are
   confident that the same result can be achieved.

   Our opposition, Orlando Pirates are through to their first Shield semi
   final after having a closely contended group stage as well.

   The semi finals will be played as a festival fixture which sees the
   days first game kicking off at 12h00 between SuperSport United and
   Mamelodi Sundowns.

   The action will be live on SS4, but we will also be sharing the games
   progression over our social media platforms. So follow us and tune in
   if you are unable to watch the game.
   [lga-fss-150x150.jpg]

   A well deserved 3 points was collected at Princess Magogo Stadium as we
   beat Free State Stars 2-1 this afternoon.

   All of the goals were scored in the first half, however, the action on
   field kept the spectators on the edge well into the 3 minutes of
   additional time at the end of the game.

   Both teams made a slow start to the game, and it seemed to be more to
   try and determine the oppositions game plan. This didn’t last longer
   than 5 minutes though, and Free State Stars appeared to be trying to
   set some early dominance in play.

   They missed a chance to take the lead after Rodgers fired and missed in
   the 10th minute. This seemed to rattle us awake and we quickly got back
   into the game and attacked with our possession.

   In the 18th minute, Mutizwa, looking promising in the box, was hacked
   down by the Free State Stars keeper. We were awarded a penalty and
   Mutizwa made no mistake from the 12 yard mark.

   Extending on the lead in the 25th minute, he then curled an amazing
   free kick over the wall and into the near post securing an early lead
   for the team.

   Some undisciplined play then saw us lose our score advantage as Free
   State Stars were awarded a free kick. This was a well struck set piece
   from the edge of the area and Hlubi opened the scoring for his team.

   The score remained 2-1 until full time but the second half of the game
   was action packed.

   Ee Lla Koto came out of the change room looking lively. Jappie and
   Rodgers were linking up well, with Rodgers shooting a shot wide. The
   two players helped keep pressure on our defence while they searched for
   an equaliser.

   Good defensive play as well as some great keeping from Mbaeva saw us
   through these periods of play.

   We did have some opportunities that went begging. Mathenjwa and Mutizwa
   did well to keep on the attack, an try to find gaps to score, but we
   were just not able to extend the lead again.

   Sabelo also had a chance to help wrap up the game in the 78th minute,
   but put his attempt over the bar.

   The last minutes and extra time had to belong to Mbaeva for his
   keeping. The visitors well aware that they still had a sniff at a point
   bombarded the final third and threw all they had into trying to score.

   Mbaeva kept his head though and had some amazing saves to help retain
   the 3 pointer for us.

   We have a number of days now to prepare for our last away game of the
   season against Mamelodi Sundowns at Loftus.
   [u17-open-season-150x150.jpg]

   The u17 side start their 2019 season on Sunday with a home game against
   Isicelo Sports at Moses Mabhida Outer Fields. The game will get
   underway at 11am.

   Speaking to the u17 coach, Coach Mude, he seems confident with the
   group of players he has this year and is looking forward to finishing
   higher on the table than last years forth place.

   Coach thinks that the season will be a closely contended one between
   KZN Academy, AmaZulu and ourselves, but is not underestimating the
   other teams that he and his young players will face.

   We look forward to the season under the guidance of Coach Mude and hope
   that we will see some youngsters with great potential coming into the
   development team.
   [freestatestars-news-150x150.jpg]

   We look to keep our Top 8 hopes alive as we face Free State Stars on
   Sunday at Princess Magogo Stadium at 3pm. An important fixture for both
   sides who will be fighting to secure maximum points from the game.

   With a draw in our last match against Chiefs, and a crucial point from
   the game, the team will be now looking to build on that with home
   advantage. Scoring in 9 of our 10 last home games, we look to
   continuing in this form and taking the game to our Free State
   opponents.

   Ea Lla Koto come off a draw with Bidvest Wits in their last fixture,
   but Hlubi and Rodgers have both found some form late in the season and
   have netted goals lately for their side.

   Being only two points clear of 15th place on the log, our visitors need
   every point they can get to keep out of the relegation zone.

   The encounter will be televised live on SS4 but we encourage you to get
   to the stadium, get behind the team and help encourage them in the
   drive to achieve a Top 8 finish.
   [9df52efe-8d15-47ac-931d-71eccba9669c-150x150.jpg]

   A very challenging match in many ways, playing away to Chiefs at FNB
   stadium, we just lost in the semi-final to TS Galaxy and fighting to
   get into the Top 8 spot. The match was more mental than otherwise.

   We had only one day to prepare the team and the opponent was more
   confident after winning 2:4 away to Chippa in the semifinal. We started
   well and it was clear the opponent were playing a diamond shaped
   midfield looking to stretch our central defenders to allow deep runners
   from midfield.

   We had to adapt quickly by allowing our central midfielders to cover
   the opponent Wingbacks while we dropped our wide attackers inside to
   add numbers. This helped us a lot even though it appeared
   unconventional. A very tactical game which we dominated defensively and
   the opponent has a false sense of possession. We scored first through a
   beautiful curling shot from Sibiya. We went to half time leading 0:1.

   We knew the opponent would want to respond. Indeed start of second half
   they played three strikers in Moon, Parker, Zuma. We dealt wit that
   threat as well. We were very well organized tactically especially
   defending but we needed more belief and arrogance to play with ease.
   Our lack of mental resilience showed once more when we could not
   protect our lead. Yet again conceding from a set play.

   Our team seems to have serious difficulties in basic defense of set
   plays. We lost or drew many matches unnecessarily through lack of
   proper defending on set plays. We are not brave enough to engage in
   combats and win 1v1. The opponent equalized and in as much as they
   seemed to be dominant in possession, it was all in wrong areas.

   The match ended 1:1 and we were still two points behind Highlands Park
   with three matches to go before end of the season.

   Our next match is on Sunday against Free State Stars who are engaged in
   a relegation battle.
   [chiefs-arrows-april-23-2019-150x150.jpg]

   After heading into the break with a 1-0 lead we conceded a goal in the
   78th minute to share the spoils with Kaizer Chiefs at FNB Stadium
   tonight.

   In a game that saw Chiefs attacking with every opportunity they had, we
   managed to open the scoring in the 33rd minute. Although we had less
   shots on target than our hosts, we managed to go ahead with just over
   10 minutes left in the first half. Mathenjwa won the ball, did well to
   get a back pass to Sibiya who took his shot and beat the keeper to take
   the lead.

   Chiefs were strong on the ball tonight. In the first half they had
   almost twice as many shots on target than we did. Mbaeva did well to
   defend his line and some great defending from Bilankulu, Mzava, Lunga
   and Sibisi saw us go into the break in a positive position.

   Returning after the break, Chiefs continued to dominate possession of
   the ball as well as field position. We once again defended well and
   used our possession to push up in a structured fashion.

   Kaizer Chiefs were unlucky and had a number of shots that hit the
   upright. Their luck changed in the 78th minute though when Moleko
   headed the ball in from a corner to equalise.

   With 12 minutes left on the clock, it was evident that both sides were
   looking for the extra points. In the end though neither could find the
   mark again and a point a piece would be the reward for the nights
   efforts.

   We return home to take on Free State Stars on Sunday. We return to
   Princess Magogo Stadium for the game and would like to call on as much
   support as possible in our second to last home game of the season.
   [chiefs-arrows-23-april-2019-150x150.jpg]

   Our quest for a Top8 finish continues tomorrow night with an away game
   against Kaizer Chiefs, set to kick off at 19h30.

   With full concentration from the coaching staff and the players on the
   final objective for the season, that being a Top 8 finish, we are in
   for a feisty game tomorrow night at FNB Stadium.

   We have collected 7 points off the last three ABSA Premiership games,
   with wins against Cape Town City and Bloem Celtic and then drawn most
   recently at home against AmaZulu FC. Another three points away from
   home would be most welcome at this stage of the competition and for us,
   another step closer to our current objective.

   It will be the second game in four days, and the players will have to
   dig deep to keep their energy levels up in what will be a demanding
   week that ends with another home game on Sunday. But, we know that the
   players are capable of performing under the demand.

   Kaizer Chiefs will also be wanting to rally points. With only a few
   games left before the season ends, every team in the PSL will be
   looking to gain on positions, no matter where they are on the log. They
   have managed only two points off their last three drawing to SuperSport
   United and Black Leopards, while suffering a loss to Baroka FC.

   The game will be televised live on SS4 (204) and coverage will be given
   to you on all of our social media channels.

   As soon as the draw was made and we had drawn TS GALAXY, there was an
   uneasy excitement that left a feeling we had already made the final.
   This feel and premature assumption was based on the fact that TS GALAXY
   were from a lower division.

   Little did we realize that it was a tricky fixture where the opponent
   had nothing to lose. We performed below our normal standards throughout
   the match. Even though we were not at our best we managed to create
   enough chances to win the match.

   Besides scoring from a penalty we had a great opportunity to kill the
   match off in the 90th minute. Mutizwa went 1v1 with the keeper and hit
   the upright. The opponent turned over possession and won a free kick in
   our defensive zone and furthermore conceded a corner.

   The resulting corner was headed into our own net by our own player and
   it was 1:1 and the 90 minutes came to an end. The match went to extra
   30 minutes.

   We were very poor in the last 30 minutes. Our team lacked the energy,
   started cramping and had no legs. The opponent was better on the ball
   and deep in the second half of the extra time they unlocked our defence
   and made it 1:2.

   We failed to respond and the third goal was conceded from what looked
   like an “out ball”. The score was 1:3. We never applied ourselves in
   this crucial match at a very unique position. We lost the match but a
   lot of lessons were learnt.

   We looking forward to the Tuesday encounter against KAIZER CHIEFS where
   we fighting to end in the Top 8 bracket.
   [arrows-tsgalaxy-nedbank-cup-semi-final-150x150.jpg]

   The road to the 2019 Nedbank Cup final came to an end for us this
   afternoon with a loss against TS Galaxy at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium.

   In a game that took 71 minutes to see the first goal scored off a
   penalty after Mathenjwa was bought down in the box, and then progressed
   to extra time, it was the visiting side who took the honours.

   The first half saw neither keeper troubled enough to rattle cages, and
   was rather uneventful from both of the teams. Play saw both teams
   looking to push up with their possession, but neither managed to find
   promising final touches.

   Only late in the half did we look to have any clear chances with snap
   shots from Venter and Bilankulu.

   After the break we were given an opportunity with a free kick. Venter’s
   attempt from outside the box did not put the Galaxy keeper in any
   danger.

   We were then awarded a penalty after Mathenjwa was unfairly challenged
   in the box. Mutizwa strepped up and sent Mpakumpaku the wrong way.

   Within a short period of time we missed two great opportunities to
   extend the lead. Mathenjwa had a shot which went wide, and then Mutizwa
   found himself one on one with the keeper, but hit the post with his
   shot.

   With extra time being played, Zuke had the unfortunate experience of
   heading the ball into our net, and sending the game into extra time.

   TS Galaxy stepped up their game in the extra 30 minutes of play. They
   drew on their hunger for the win and managed to put their substitute
   Lepasa into scoring positions twice, and he did not fail to convert.

   We congratulate them on their win and wish them well in the final.

   We will now shift all our focus and concentration on the PSL and our
   objective of achieving another Top 8 finish for the season.
   [golden-arrows-u19-april-150x150.jpg]

   Our u19 side have kicked off their 2019 season with some positive
   results over the last month.

   Having played four games so far the youngsters have not lost a game,
   and currently sit top of the SAB Central Stream F log at the moment
   with 10 points. They have won 3 games and drawn 1 after kicking the
   season off in March.

   With development being an important aspect of the clubs philosophy, the
   u19 side share a number of their training days with the Diski team.
   This helps build depth in the club, as well as allowing us the
   opportunity to assess and develop players who have the potential to
   grow in the sport.

   Under the watchful eye of Lindani Shezi, the team looks set to produce
   yet another positive season this year and we are looking forward to the
   results that they will produce.

   View the log
   here http://www.goldenarrowsfc.com/reserve-squad/reserves-log/
   [reminder-150x150.jpg]

   We take on TS Galaxy in our first home fixture of the 2019 Nedbank Cup
   on Saturday. The semi final will kick off at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium at
   15h00.

   The road to the semi’s have seen us secure three away wins against
   Tjakastad Junior Shepard in the Last 32, Witbank Spurs in the last 16
   and then Bloemfontein Celtic in the quarterfinal.

   Both the coaching staff and players are confident ahead of the game,
   but know that TS Galaxy need to be treated with respect on Saturday, as
   they could be a dark horse in the competition with the amount of
   determination they are showing at the moment.

   That being said, the team will be looking to secure a positive result
   in the 90 minutes of play on Saturday.

   TS Galaxy will be wanting to be added to the list of second teams that
   have reached the finals of the competition. Following in the footsteps
   of Mpumalanga Black Aces, AmaTuks and Black Leopards.

   Their coach, Dan Malesela is no stranger to the semi final pressures of
   the competition, having led United FC (2013) and Chippa United (2017)
   to the same position. He has not yet gone further in the competition
   and will be wanting his team to progress to the final this year.

   Having beaten Umvoti FC, Jomo Cosmos and Cape Umoya to reach the
   semi’s, we will be the first top-flight opposition they face in this
   years competition.

   Tickets are on sale at TicketPro outlets, so make sure to purchase
   yours and get to Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium to catch all of the semi
   action.

   The game will be televise on both SuperSport and SABC should you not be
   able to make it. As well as this, we will be posting play by play
   action on our social media platforms to ensure you wont miss any of the
   action.
   [amazulu-coaches-comment-150x150.jpg]

   We needed to win the Durban derby to push us into the Top 8 bracket
   with 34 points, position 8. This 1:1 draw leaves us at position 9 with
   four matches to play.

   We started very well controlling all phases of the match. Our attacks
   as usual were well structured as we built from the back. We controlled
   the build attack in a way that we did not suffer Counter attacks. Our
   defense was also well structured with all players taking part in their
   individual defensive responsibilities.

   The opponent had the first corner and it was clear in that situation
   was Akoriko’s position was and we didn’t deal with it precisely. The
   second corner we conceded a goal from lack of proper marking in the box
   and Akoriko got a free header. The opponent lead did not last long, we
   won a free kick on the side of the box, Matloga delivered a great ball
   that hit the cross bar and was finished by Lunga to make it 1:1.

   Both teams went to half time at 1:1. We introduced Mutizwa at the
   beginning of the second half for Matloga who fell sick and had to be
   withdrawn. We continued the control to the match and had a few chances
   from Venter, S.Dube and a possible penalty when Akoriko clearly fouled
   Lamola inside the box and the referee chose to ignore.

   It was not not the first foul inside the box to be ignored by the
   referee. Several calls were left uncalled, maybe the referee could have
   been braver. The match ended 1:1, both teams shared the spoils and we
   could not break into the Top 8 bracket.

   Our next encounter is a semi-final match against TS GALAXY in the
   Nedbank Cup at home.
   [fnal-story-derby-150x150.jpg]

   We shared the spoils with Amazulu in todays Durban Derby at Sugar Ray
   Xulu Stadium

   In what was a fast paced game in the first half with the legendary
   rivalry between the two teams evident in the play, the 22 players threw
   all that they had into the task at hand.

   After a number of promising plays into the opposing last third, but not
   managing to capitalise on them, it was Usuthu who drew first blood as
   Ouro-Akoriko headed it into the goals off a corner.

   Not being put off by the score, the team showed their determination to
   get back into the game and we equalised just minutes later when Lunga
   poked a rebound home off a free kick taken by Matloga.

   Both teams played a tough remaining half and created a number of
   chances to score. Defence proved to be a final hurdle that neither team
   could get past and although there were chances for both us and AmaZulu
   to score it would just not be.

   After being forced to replace Matloga at half time with Mutizwa, coach
   Komphela then brought on both Lamola and Jooste, hoping to enhance our
   striking abilities.

   AmaZulu looked to adopt a similar approach in the game, bringing
   Nomvete onto the attack, but the change did not pay off for them
   either.

   Although not the point we would have liked, the single point will
   become important as we start finalising the season.

   We now shift our focus To the Nedbank semi final game against TS
   Galaxy, which will take place Saturday 20 April at Sugar Ray Xulu
   stadium at 15:00. Tickets sold at TicketPro
   [d4b61wkx4aanwka-150x150.jpg]

   Lack of finishing cost us the KZN Derby today at Mpumalanga Stadium in
   Hammersdale against Maritzburg United. It was an unexpected result
   based on our performance so far in the competition, but the team could
   just not get behind the defence and convert our opportunities that were
   created.

   The first half saw both sides in an end to end battle to try and find
   space and position to score, but neither side created any clear cut
   plays to put them in that position until the last minute of the half
   when Hlongwane narrowly put the ball wide of the mark.

   The second half seemed to pick up in pace. Both teams put in some work
   on the ball and pushed into the last third. We dominated play and
   position, but the heavy defence from Maritzburg made it difficult to
   find the space to put the shots in.

   When in the last third, we failed to finish off in a favourable manner
   and then allowed Maritzburg to counter easily. Frustration set in for
   both sides, which saw some yellow cards being issued on both sides.

   Maritzburg broke the deadlock in the 86th minute off a free kick just
   in our half. A well placed kick from the set piece gave Sithole the
   opportunity to lobby the ball into the net and he executed the shot
   well.

   We now have to wait for AmaZulu to play Chippa United tomorrow to see
   whether we qualify for the semi finals, which will be played on the
   22nd of April.
   [durban-derby-story-150x150.jpg]

   All eyes will be on Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium on Sunday at 15h00 as we
   take on AmaZulu FC in the ABSA Premiership. The return game see us
   looking to settle the score after losing 2-0 to Usuthu in December last
   year.

   A confident squad has performed well under the guidance of Steve
   Komphela since the beginning of the year and are currently on a three
   game winning streak, one they will want to continue on our home
   ground on Sunday afternoon.

   We have looked good up front, with the younger team members playing an
   important role in our game strategy. With a lot of  positive work being
   done both offensively and defensively on the field, it has given the
   techincal staff an opportunity to asses the games and then substitute
   accordingly in order to secure the wins.

   AmaZulu will be aiming for a double Derby win. They have looked strong
   on field in their last games, but have made enough errors to allow
   their opposing teams to take advantage and score from them.

   Our fellow Durban neighbors last played home game against Chippa
   United, where they lost 1-0 in a game that could have gone either way.

   With a string of losses under their belt of late, the side will be
   eager to claim 3 points from the encounter.

   Coverage for the game will be done by both SuperSport and SABC,
   however, we would love to see you at the stadium in support of the
   team.

   For those of you unable to make it, or catch the action on TV, follow
   us on social media for live updates on the game.
   [maritzburg-news-shield-150x150.jpg]

   Its KZN Derby action this weekend in the Diski Shield competition as we
   face Maritzburg United in the Festival weekend. The game kicks off on
   Saturday 13 April at 12h00.

   After 2 successful wins in their campaign, the youngsters will be
   looking to make a clean sweep of the regional stage of the competition.

   Based on the points accumulated so far in the competition, the team are
   placed to secure a place in the semi finals with a win or draw on
   Saturday.

   The team of Choice have not yet had a win in the competition, and have
   just one point of the first two games.

   They will be wanting to save some face in the KZN Derby and will be
   eager to walk away with both bragging rights and the knowledge of
   slowing our road to the semi’s.

   Entry to the Festival is free, but you do require a ticket to enter the
   stadium. These can be collected from the Mpumalanga Stadium today and
   Friday from 1pm.

   Matches will be televised live on SS4 and SS10 should you be unable to
   get to the stadium.

   We will also cover the game on all of our social media channels.
   [coaches-comment-steve-komphela-cape-town-city-150x150.jpg]

   A very tactical match from two teams playing a similar style of
   attacking football. There were very few opportunities in the match
   except later when we had done our tactical substitutions.

   Both teams pressed high denying each other the opportunity to build
   from the back. We were the better in building from long balls played
   into the midfield. The opponent keeper was not as accurate with long
   passes. The biggest challenge from the opponent was their wing play
   especially on their right. We needed good communication and
   coordination between our fullbacks and wingers to deal with the
   opponent movement in the wide areas.

   The first half finished 0:0 and a true reflection of the match in the
   first half. We had a good start to the second half. Our team dealt
   better with the opponent wing play and we started to dominate better.
   We changed Mathenjwa with Mutizwa and dropped a Sibeko into second
   striker position. We still looked good and kept great shape that only
   needed to be complimented by an appropriate attacking.

   Our wingers were starting to get tired and we introduced a new pairing
   in Jooste and Lamola. We placed Sibeko wide on the left and Lamola
   played alongside Mutizwa. We were more threatening and it wasn’t long,
   we broke from a break and scored in the 82nd minute.

   The score was 1:0 and all we needed do was to manage the match. The
   team showed lots of maturity and managed the lead very well. We almost
   got a second but we squandered the chance. The match ended 1:0 in our
   favor but players worked extremely well in both defense and offense.
   They maintained a very high level of tactical discipline.
   [frame-for-image-150x150.jpg]

   An epic Derby battle took place today as we took on AmaZulu FC at King
   Zwelithini Stadium in the Diski Shield competition.

   After being 3 goals up, we were holding on in the end for the win as
   AmaZulu threw all that they had at us in the dying minutes looking for
   an equaliser.

   From the first minute it was clear that we were in for an entertaining
   game of soccer today. AmaZulu came onto the pitch and showed early
   intentions of opening the scoring. A well organised defence made sure
   that this would not be the case, and they worked hard to make sure that
   the attacking plays from Ntsundwana were dealt with as he pushed into
   the final third.

   After consolidating on the park and finding their rhythm, we began to
   gain some confidence. This was evident in the play as we began
   attacking the hosts lines.

   Khwela opened the scoring off a well struck range attempt that caught
   AmaZulu keeper, Boshoff, off guard. This turned the game for us and the
   boys began playing more fluidly.

   Ten minutes later Conco doubled the lead as he found the back of the
   net. AmaZulu had a number of chances to pull one back before the break,
   but were unable to do so.

   In the second half it was once again us who struck first. Pushing into
   the final third and frustrating the opponents, they eventually conceded
   a penalty after Maphumulo was brought down in the box. Conco made sure
   of his mark and took the lead up to three.

   The persistence of the hosts paid off in the 65th minute though, with
   Shangase finding the back of the net.

   We were then reduced to 10 players as Mgwazela made a dangerous late
   tackle on Shangase on the side line. AmaZulu took advantage of this by
   putting pressure on the defenders. Another late tackle in the box gave
   the home side the opportunity to pull another goal back and Shangase
   did the honours for the club. Reducing the lead to just a goal with 8
   minutes of official time left.

   The team dug deep to defend the lead, and managed to do so for the
   remainder of the time left to play.

   Another 3 points in the bag and a strong win once again for the boys

   The next game in the Shield competition is next weekend, against
   Maritzburg United.
   [final-story-win-over-cape-town-city-150x150.jpg]

   Another super sub goal in the 82nd minute from Lerato Lamola secured 3
   important home points in the ABSA Premiership this afternoon.

   The first half seemed to begin relatively slowly. All of the action was
   in the midfield with neither side making any telling plays.

   Venter provided the first promising shot after some well executed build
   up play. With The Citizens not threatening on the field, we opened up
   some opportunities. Our second from Sibeko in the 33rd minute off a
   well weighted cross from Matloga.

   Cape Town City’s first threat came just before the break, as Mthembu
   missed a header attempt from a corner.

   After the break, Cape town City seemed to be playing with more
   conviction. They had closed more of the gaps and came on the attack
   more. Working the ball well on the counter play, Venter failed to find
   the mark in the 47th minute off a cross from S.Dube.

   Minutes later Venter found himself in a scoring position, he took his
   shot, but Citys keeper, Leeuwenburg, did well to deny him the opening
   goal.

   A steady end to end battle took place and it was after substitutions
   that we had the desired break through with Mutizwa, Jooste an Lamola
   involved in the movement that won us the game.

   A well executed game from the team and coaching staff and a great
   confidence booster ahead of the Durban Derby against AmaZulu FC next
   Sunday.

   Thanks to the support at the stadium today. As seen after the game, the
   team were glad to have had some numbers in the stands.
   [shield-durban-derby-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski side will take part in the second Diski Shield regional games
   on Sunday afternoon as we are hosted by Amazulu FC at King Zwelithini
   Stadium. Kick off will be at 12h00.

   The team had a positive start to their shield campaign with a 6-1 win
   over Chippa United last weekend. A stunning performance by the
   youngsters saw them open the scoring in the 2nd minute and set up
   dominant play for the remainder of the game.

   Siboniso Conco scored 4 of the goals, with the remaining two coming
   from Mfanafuthi Mkhize and Thando Khwela.

   The team will be looking to set up a winning streak with a win over
   Amazulu and paving the way for a clean sweep in the regional part of
   the competition.

   Amazulu have also got onto the table after a win over Maritzburg United
   in their first game.

   This is an exciting format competition, and as with game, anything can
   happen on the day.

   We would love to see some support at the stadium, and with all Diski
   games, entrance will be free on the day.

   It is not a televised game, so get to the stadium or follow us on our
   social media platforms for all of the action come game time.
   [arrows-vs-capetowncity-150x150.jpg]

   It’s back to league action as we take on Cape Ton City at Sugar Ray
   Xulu stadium on Saturday at 15h00.

   As we get into the tail end of the season, points become important for
   all teams, whether at the top of the log or wrestling for position
   above the relegation zone.

   Saturday’s encounter is no different as we fight for points to achieve
   a Top 8 position, while Cape town City look to secure points to stay in
   contention for the top spot.

   The team has been showing their fight in the past few encounters and
   will be wanting to bring that mindset to the field on Saturday’s home
   game.

   In our first encounter of the season we played to a goalless draw with
   The Citizens. After a game that saw us having to contend with an
   attacking opponent, we managed to defend well to secure an away point.

   Cape Town City will have to work hard to break our defence that has
   been proving to be strong of late.

   The game will be televised on SABC, and should you not be able to
   watch, follow the live action on our social media channels.
   [coaches-comment-nedbank-bloem-150x150.jpg]

   The third Nedbank away match in a row. There were three changes in the
   starting line up, Musa Bilankulu, Wayde Jooste and Sanele Mathenjwa.
   The team performed very well under circumstances.

   The weather was hot and the field dry with grass that was not cut well.
   We had a very good and disciplined performance in both defense and
   attack. The first opportunity to break the deadlock came after 24
   minutes with a free-kick from Danny Venter that sailed inches wide of
   the upright. Sibusiso Sibeko had the best chance of the first half in
   the 33rd minute after going clear on goal, but instead of using the
   space and time by picking his spot, he shot straight at Celtic
   goalkeeper Patrick Tignyemb. Our only challenge in the half was from
   the opponent left side where Dlamini dropped to No 10, behind Venter
   and Phiri. The teams went to half time at 0:0 and hoping the heat will
   ease in the second half.

   We continued and had a good start to the second half after addressing
   the Dlamini problem by reorganizing the team defence. We made a sub,
   brought in Mutizwa for Sibeko and the change paid off as Mutizwa broke
   the deadlock on 68 minutes with a neat finish from close range after
   some good work by fellow substitute Lerato Lamola, who replaced
   Ndwandwe.

   The opponent pulled one to equalize via Sam. It didn’t take long we
   secured the win in the 90th minute as Mutizwa completed his brace by
   curling a free-kick around the wall and into the far corner to send us
   into the NEDBANK semifinals. We are awaiting the final match and hear
   who we meeting in the semifinals.
   [quarter-final-win-nedbank-cup-150x150.jpg]

   A tactical move from Coach Steve Komphela to bring both Knox Mutizwa
   and Lerato Lamola into the game late in the second half saw us secure a
   win in the Nedbank Cup quarter final against Bloemfontein Celtic this
   afternoon.

   Although we did well to dominate the game from the kick off, we were
   just unable to convert the chances created to find the back of the net.
   We did well to keep the ball and moved it around looking to create
   spaces in the Celtic defence.

   This game plan worked well, and saw Celtic committing their players to
   a defensive mindset, not wanting to play up on attack when they could
   have. Even with the numbers back, we still managed to create chances.
   Moving the ball around well and spreading it wide when needed.

   This saw a great opportunity created but Ndwandwe who took to much time
   to commit to a shot, and lost the chance created. The loose ball then
   ended up at Sibeko’s feet. He also failed to shoot from the first touch
   and gave Tignyemb time to recover for the save.

   The second half saw both teams getting into the game more and a
   substitution that saw Mabena come onto the field for the hosts saw the
   game change in pace for the home side.

   Mutizwa was also brought off the bench to replace Sibeko. He made an
   impact on the field which was heightened once Lamola joined him. The
   two made quick impact and Lamola played a fantastic assist in Mutizwa’s
   first goal.

   Bloemfontein Celtic then equalised 12 minutes later and threated to
   force the game into extra time with just 9 minutes of official time
   left.

   As full time was about to tick over, Lingwati fouled Mathenjwa just
   outside of the box and conceded a free kick. Venter and Mutizwa
   prepared to take the set piece but it was Knox who ended up curling the
   ball around the wall and getting his brace and the win for the day.

   A well executed game today from both the technical team and the players
   who will be interested to find out who they will need to prepare for in
   the semi finals.
   [story-image-150x150.jpg]

   A confident Diski side defeated Chippa United 6-1 in their first Shield
   game this morning at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   Showing confidence from the first minute, the side scored off an early
   corner which they took short, then played back into the box. Mfanafuthi
   Mkhize made sure of his mark and gave the team an early lead. Just four
   minutes later, Khwela and Maphumulo took the opportunity to go on a
   counter attack from a midfield interception. Maphumulo layed off to
   Khwela on his left and Jaftha had no chance in making a save.

   The lead boosted confidence on the field and the Diski boys attacked
   the Chippa goals at will. They received little resistance from the
   visiting defenders and Conco began his scoring spree.

   Twenty six minutes in he opened his account, taking the lead up to
   three goals. Just before the break, Chippa were awarded a goal after a
   mix up in defence gave Tofile an opportunity to gain a bit of momentum
   for the visitors.

   The celebration was short lived for them as Conco slotted his brace
   just 3 minutes later.

   Returning from the break, the visitors looked a little more confident,
   but still lost possession too often and allowed us to attack from all
   angles.

   Conco was then lucky enough to score his hat-trick and then fourth goal
   in the 79th and 89th minute of the game.

   Chippa United did have a couple of chances, with Maarman coming up
   strong on the attack, however Mlungwana made a great save on the one
   attempt and his other just lacked enough punch to make any definite
   threat.

   A fantastic team effort from the youngsters today and a confident start
   to the Shield competition for them this season.A confident Diski side
   saw off Chippa United 6-1 in their first Shield game this morning at
   Princess Magogo Stadium.

   Showing confidence from the first minute, the side scored off an early
   corner which they took short, then played back into the box. Mfanafuthi
   Mkhize made sure of his mark and gave the team an early lead. Just four
   minutes later, Khwela and Maphumulo took the opportunity to go on a
   counter attack from a mid field interception. Maphumulo layed off to
   Khwela on his left and Jaftha had no chance in making a save.

   The lead boosted confidence on the field and the Diski boys attacked
   the Chippa goals at will. They received little resistance fro the
   visiting defenders and Conco began his scoring spree.

   Twenty six minutes in he opened his account, taking the lead up to
   three goals. Just before the break, Chippa were awarded a goal after a
   mix up in defence gave Tofile an opportunity to gain a bit of momentum
   for the visitors.

   The celebration was short lived for them as Conco slotted his brace
   just 3 minutes later.

   Returning from the break, the visitors looked a little more confident,
   but still lost possession too often and allowed us to attack from all
   angles.

   Conco was then lucky enough to score his hat-trick and then fourth goal
   in the 79th and 89th minute of the game.

   Chippa United did have a couple of chances, with Maarman coming up
   strong on the attack, however Mlungwana made a great save on the one
   attempt and his other just lacked enough punch to make any definite
   threat.

   A fantastic team effort from the youngsters today and a confident start
   to the Shield competition for them this season.
   [nedbank-bloemceltic-vs-goldenarrows-150x150.jpg]

   We play our Nedbank Cup quarter final against Bloemfontein Celtic on
   Saturday afternoon at Dr Molemela Stadium, kick-off at 15h00.

   This game will be the first ever knockout match between Abafana
   Bes’thende and Phunya Sele Sele, having not ever clashed in club
   football before.

   The team have been preparing hard for this weekends encounter. Coach
   Steve Komphela has been running a number of different moves an
   combinations with the players. Each group of players from defence
   through to the forwards have been running different plays and
   scenario’s in preparation for the game as we face a determined
   Bloemfontein Celtic who are holding their own in the league,

   Celtic should have a large home support present, an this will be a
   great morale booster to them. We would love to see some of our support
   in the grounds, and number of green and gold jerseys will be a much
   needed injection of positive energy to the team as they take to the
   field.

   There is a supporters bus that will be making the trip. Should you be
   interested in making the trip, please contact Mbuso Sosibo on +27 (78)
   916-7818 to book your seat before 12pm on Friday.

   Catch the game on SABC or if you are not able to, then follow one of
   our social media platforms for up-to-date scores during the game.
   [diski-chippa-story-150x150.jpg]

   The Diski Shield competition kicks off this weekend with the side
   taking on Chippa United in their opening game. The action kicks off
   Saturday 30 March, at 10am at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   The competition boasts a total of 24 games from beginning to end and
   runs on a knockout basis.

   There are four pools that will play. These will be ‘Central’, Coastal
   East’, ‘Coastal West’ and ‘Northern’ pools.

   Abafana Bes’thende fall under the Coastal East pool along with Amazulu,
   Maritzburg United and Chippa United.

   In the first round of the competition, clubs play each other once and
   the club with the most points at the end of the pool stage proceeds to
   the semi finals.

   We last played Chippa United in the last game of the Diski Challenge
   competition and we ended up playing to a goalless draw.

   The stakes will be raised as we head into this game with both sides
   wanting to walk away with maximum points from the start of the
   competition.

   Entry to the game will be free and we would like to see as much support
   at the stadium as the youngsters kick off their Shield campaign.

   As it’s not a festival game, there will be no television coverage. We
   will be covering the game on our social media platforms should you not
   be able to get to the stadium.

   We kick off the U19 season on Sunday with a KZN derby, Abafana
   Bes’thende vs Usuthu, at Moses Mabhida outer fields at 15:00.

   The team will be looking to improve on last seasons position when they
   finished 2nd on the log after a very competitive season.

   The club is looking at building depth from the u19 side for the
   Multichoice Diski side, and in the long term the club as a whole in the
   season. At the same time, the team has set themselves a target of
   contending the season and acquiring top position on the log come the
   end of the season.

   The opening encounter will produce a well contended 90 minutes with
   both of the sides looking to get off on the right foot and not giving
   any love for the opposing sides.

   The game is free to come and watch and we would encourage anyone who
   would like to watch the encounter, to get to the stadium to support the
   youngsters.
   [sabc-news-steve-komphela-twitter-ntsimbimakwakwa-150x150.png]

   Our team played this match at the back of a 2:0 loss against Plk City
   on Sunday just two days ago. It was clear that the match was more
   mental than otherwise with the opponent fighting to survive relegation.
   Our team played good positive football and threatened the opponents
   goal more.

   We had a few chances where Dube could have put us in the lead. Another
   missed opportunity was a final pass from Ndwandwe to Lunga which was
   overweighted and an opportunity was lost. The opponent depended on
   their physicality and were reckless in their game. The officials failed
   to take control of the match and we lost Ndwandwe, as a result, when
   Mosele applied excessive force in the tackle and almost broke
   Ndwandwe’s ankle. We replaced him with a Matloga and ended the first
   half positively though we were still 0:0.

   We controlled the second half well and played for a win but never a
   loss. We made another sub where a Jooste went in for Dube. Lunga was
   then instructed not to be too aggressive in attacking. We then opted to
   play on Counter and abandoning a bit of possession. We were rewarded
   late in the 94th minute when Jooste pounced on a loose ball from a free
   kick rebound. He struck the ball from outside the box and found the top
   corner to make it 0:1. The opponent was left with no time and we won
   the match 0:1 and moved to 28 points, further from the bottom and only
   three points away from the top 8 position.

   Steve Komphela
   [final-story-image-baroka-150x150.jpg]

   A cracking goal in the final minute of referee’s additional time from
   Wayde Jooste saw us secure 3 points in our game against Baroka FC.

   It was a very physical game this evening against Baroka, with a number
   of stop in play for treatment to players from both sides. From the
   first minute it was clear that the game would be a tough physical
   challenge. This was evident with the hard tackles that were being
   dished out from the hosts.

   Baroka applied early pressure and were in a favourable position to
   score in the 10th minute off the boot of Sodi. He struck wide of target
   from a corner kick.

   We created some chances, but our first clear opportunity came in the
   30th minute as Dube went up for a header attempt, but failed to direct
   the ball on target.

   We lost Ndwandwe just before the break after a dangerous tackle on him
   from Mosele left him feeling uneasy on his newly healed leg.

   Richard Matloga received his first cap against his former team and
   performed well in the reaminder of the game, being involved in a number
   of well executed plays.

   After the break the game changed in pace slightly, but we had to defend
   hard against an attacking home side.

   Dickens had a number of attempts at goal for the home side, but some
   solid defending and good work from Mbaeva saw these attempts thwarted.

   With the game looking to end in a draw, Jooste took the opportunity
   from the edge of the box off a loose ball.

   His attempt found the back of the net and we secured the win and 3
   important away points.

   The team return to Durban and will have two weeks to prepare for the
   upcoming Nedbank Cup quarter final against bloem Celtic on the 30th
   March.
   [baroka-story-12march-150x150.jpg]

   The team will be wanting to gather some points tomorrow night as we
   head back to Peter Mokabal Stadium to take on Baroka FC at 19h30.

   After dropping points on the weekend against Polokwane City, the boys
   will be looking to convert scoring chances and secure a win on the
   road. In the last outing, after not having the best start to the game,
   they bounced back in the second half creating chances. It was our
   finishing that let us down and a lot of the preparation for tomorrow
   nights game will be to change this.

   The fight for a Top 8 finish is far from over, but the team is going to
   have to dig deep and show a fighting character to do so. We have the
   depth in the side, and are more than capable of obtaining these
   objectives.

   Baroka have collected 5 points in their last 5 games, but have lost
   their last two outings against Highlands Park and Polokwane City. They
   are sitting 13th on the log and are desperate for points in order to
   stay out of the relegation zone.

   This will make them a dangerous team to contend with at home and it’s
   something we are well aware of heading into the fixture.

   The game is an important one to win for us and we will be doing all we
   can to return with 3 points in the bag.

   Catch our coverage on our social media platforms to keep up to date
   with the happenings in the game.
   [polokwane-coaches-comment-150x150.jpg]

   A very difficult and intense match during a period where mental
   strength is required. We had a terrible start to the match where we
   failed to connect passes. We gave away possession at a very high rate
   resulting in the opponent getting break attacks. The result of our
   consistent loss of possession led to us conceding a goal.

   After conceding the goal we had a great chance to score and like
   against O.Pirates we failed to beat the keeper. A crucial miss by
   Lamola that could have brought us back into the match. We still could
   not change our rhythm and we then opted to contemplate change in our
   structure.

   We immediately dropped Phiri into the defense and pushed Sibisi wider
   and higher, our midfield was marshal led by Venter and Parusnath, where
   we were checking the possibility of playing with three at the back and
   two wingbacks. It looked better and the rate of loss of possession was
   lesser.

   Coming back from half time we changed Phiri for S. Dube and our game
   changed for the better. We were more attacking and cohesive. We created
   more final third entries especially from our left side. The
   introduction of Sibeko upfront injected our team with lots of energy
   and we should have pulled one at least.

   We then went on to concede the second goal from a corner kick. We lost
   the match 2:0.
   [polokwane-result-09march-150x150.jpg]

   A slow start in the first 20 minutes of the game and conceding a goal
   in that time frame put the team on the back foot this afternoon at
   Peter Mokaba Stadium.

   Polokwane City set early domination in the game this afternoon putting
   pressure on our goal from the opening minute of the game. They held
   onto their ball possession well and attacked the last third from all
   angles. This put us into a defensive period of play and the hosts
   pushed their game plan well.

   A well weighted strike form outside the box, saw Mohammed Anas open the
   scoring for the home side. This put the team in a bad mind space for
   the remainder of the half.

   Our best opportunity of the half came off a free kick from Venter. He
   struck the ball well from the set piece, cleared the wall but was
   denied by a well timed dive from Chigova.

   Polokwane City tried to take advantage of their position in the closing
   minutes of the half with a late push towards our goals but were not
   able to extend the lead before the break.

   A tactical change from the break saw Coach Komphela bring on Siyabonga
   Dube to replace Phiri. The player configuration changed and we looked
   more confident on the ball.

   This saw a considerable change in our play, with a good number of
   attacking plays up the flanks. Early in the half we had a chance to
   equalise, Lamola tried to cut in when he found himself one on one with
   the keeper an ultimately gave the Polokwane defenders enough time to
   fall back and clear the ball.

   We dominated the play in the second 45 but were not able to create the
   spaces to allow ourselves clear attacking chances. We created a number
   of opportunities that just never evolved into anything that looked
   threatening enough.

   Polokwane City were quick on the counter in the half. In the 77th
   minute they managed to score off a corner. replacement Mashumba toed
   the ball into the right hand side of the net to seal the win for the
   home side.

   We have only a couple of days to consolidate and prepare for our next
   game at the same venue on Wednesday as we take on Baroka FC
   [polokwane-vs-arrows-09-march-2019-150x150.jpg]

   Our ABSA Premiership game against Polokwane City kicks off tomorrow
   afternoon at 15h30 at the Peter Mokaba Stadium.

   Coming off a loss to Orlando Pirates at home, the team will be looking
   to continue their positive fluid play as we travel to Polokwane

   The work rate and positive attacking play from the squad made for an
   entertaining game against Pirates. Seth Parusnath had a great shot at
   goal which was saved and an awkward rebound off the keeper could not be
   taken advantage of by Mutizwa, but this type of positive attacking play
   has worked its way back into the squad and is creating a positive vibe
   amongst the team.

   The boys are remaining level headed going into the match though and are
   not expecting an easy encounter against Polokwane City.

   Our opponents have been playing a strong game of late too, this sees
   them currently enjoying the 6th position on the PSL log at present.

   Polokwane City have suffered only one loss since November last year,
   and have shown themselves to be motivated to perform against any team
   they face.

   They will be looking to secure a home win before their next league
   fixture against Cape Town City.

   We will be looking to upset the home side as we fight to reach a Top8
   finish for the season.

   The game will be televised live on SABC Sport, and we will be keeping
   you up to date on the proceedings over all of our social media
   platforms.
   [coaches-comments-pirates-150x150.jpg]

   The team played against an opponent who’s been on a high and had won
   their previous match by 4:1. Their confidence was very high and their
   game model very fluid and dynamic.

   We had prepared very well for the match. We had covered all the aspects
   where they are a threat. We played a very good and tactical match. The
   opponent failed to impose themselves on us and we were clearly capable
   of dealing with all their threats.

   We were unfortunate to concede from a quick restart from a corner.
   Something we had addressed and put emphasis on but football being
   football, we committed the error and paid the prize for lapse of
   concentration.

   Apart from the goal, we had a very good control of the first half both
   in defense and attack. We missed a great opportunity to equalize when
   Mutizwa could not finish a rebound from Parusnath shot at goalkeeper.

   The second half was no different. We maintained same structure except
   the strikers were slightly away from the rest of the team and as a
   result we couldn’t find the desired cohesion on counterattacks. The
   opponent then introduced the third midfielder to lock the game.

   We attempted in many ways to break them down but at the end victory
   eluded us. Great lessons can  be learnt from this encounter and a few
   youngsters got to feel how it is playing in a big match environment. We
   lost the match 0:1.

   A goal in the 20th minute from Justin Shonga was enough to secure a win
   for Orlando Pirates tonight at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium.

   Both teams battled to find chances early on in the game, but a pass
   from Memela to Shonga was curled into the back of the net to produce
   the only goal of the game.

   We responded well, and took control of the remainder of the half, but
   were just not able to find the finishing touches we wanted.

   Some enterprising play from the team once again saw a number of well
   executed plays into the final third. this saw opportunities created.
   Mutizwa was unlucky not to score off a rebound, with the ball falling
   awkwardly at his boot. The team looked positive on the field, and took
   their chances but it was just not our night.

   Pirates seemed to dominate play in the second half but were unable to
   extend their lead. Solid defensive play from Bilankulu, Mzava and
   Sibisi was the thorn in the side of the attacking Pirates players.

   A good overall performance tonight from the team, who should have
   scored at least once against a confident Pirates side.

   The team will now concentrate on securing some points on the road as
   they travel to face Polokwane City next Saturday afternoon.
   [story-150x150.jpg]

   All eyes will be on the Sugar Ray Stadium tomorrow night as we take on
   Orlando Pirates in the ABSA Premiership. The much anticipated game will
   kick off at 20h15.

   The team has been playing some free attacking football of late and have
   performed well in both the Premier League as well as the Nedbank Cup.
   The team seems to have found some confidence and rhythm under the
   guidance of Steve Komphela, with some fans believing that this is the
   real playing style of Abafana Bes’thende that is once again surfacing.

   Chasing a Top 8 finish again this season, the boys will need to pull
   together and use this new found confidence against an Orlando Pirates
   team that is coming off a 4-1 win against Amazulu and who seem
   determined to administer the same medicine to us.

   Although a decent win in their last outing, the Buccaneers have had
   mixed results lately. They exited the Nedbank Cup early, after losing
   on penalties to Black Leopards, then drew their derby game against
   Kaizer Chiefs before losing a mid-week fixture against SuperSport
   United. Arguably this could have all been influenced by their
   involvement in the CAF Champions League, but non the less shows that
   they are not always the powerhouse that they are made out to be, and
   most definately can be beaten on the day.

   Match tickets are available from TicketPros online, as well as their
   outlets (Spar, Edgar’s, Jet) and we would love to see a good green and
   gold turnout in the stands.

   Our social media channels will be keeping you updated on the games
   progress should you not be able to join us in Cleremont or catch the
   game on television.
   [cc-chippa-150x150.jpg]

   A match of two halves where in the first half we played with dominance
   and created sufficient chances but failed to utilize them.

   We managed to pull one goal on the 23rd minute when Lunga made an
   underlapping run and beat his defender, played a cut back to Mutizwa
   who was running near post and he took the chance to make it 0:1. The
   rest of the remaining first half was played with fluidity and chances
   were created but we failed to convert.

   Ndwandwe played his first match after a long period (9 months to be
   precise) and had a good game. He had a great run into the box,
   dribbling his way through and only needed to pass the net when the
   defender made a last minute interception.

   The second didn’t start well. The opponent started pressing high and we
   needed the right levels of arrogance to impose our game model. The
   opponent had a slight edge and started putting us under pressure which
   we finally succumbed to when they scored the equalizer on the 70th
   minute.

   The subs we made did not give us the necessary injection instead they
   struggled to cope with the tempo of the match. There are areas we need
   to work more on defensively and among many are defending higher than
   too deep, dealing with diagonal balls to fullbacks so as to avoid
   crosses.

   Almost all the goals we’ve conceded had come predominantly from crosses
   and we lacked dominance in dealing with such crosses inside the box.
   Another positive is that we’ve been scoring in all the matches we
   played.
   [result-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski team played to a goalless draw this morning in their MDC game
   against Chippa United at Wolfson Stadium.

   Neither of the teams managed to set up dominant play in the 90 minutes.
   Each had a number of chances to score but lacked on their finishing
   chances.

   We had passages of play that kept our opponents on the back foot, but
   once getting behind defence and taking our chances, were either denied
   by not being on target or by the keeping skills from Mothwa of Chippa.

   Mlungwana also had a good game between the sticks for us. He did well
   to keep a clean sheet against a team who counter played quickly.

   This match draws our 2018/19 Challenge season to a conclusion.
   [5d87b5285d92433a3a1f558326d6d200-150x150.jpg]

   A game of two halves saw the spoils shared at the Nelson Mandela Bay
   stadium tonight against Chippa United.

   We took control of the game in the first half and enjoyed some well
   controlled play. Chippa were under pressure and fell back in numbers as
   they defended their line. Some well thought out positional play and
   movement of the ball saw us take some good chances. We took an early
   lead in the 22nd minute as Lunga cut inside the box beat the defenders
   and cut it back to Mutizwa who found the back of the net.

   Only two minutes later Ndwandwe was denied the chance to extend the
   lead after some great footwork saw him one on one with the keeper. As
   he was lining his shot up, Macheke, who had fallen back quickly on
   defence manged to play the ball out from under Ndwandwe’s feet.

   Chippa started playing themselves back into the game and were hungry to
   equalise before the break. Unable to, they returned to the change room
   to plan their tactics for the second half.

   The second half saw the home side do just that. With no changes from
   either team, Chippa returned to the field with an aggressive attacking
   game plan.

   They executed this well, and managed to starve us of ball and keep us
   on the back foot. They were unlucky not to score off a shot from
   Gamildien, with his attempt hitting the upright, but they stuck to
   their plans.

   In the 69th minute they reaped the benefits of their determination as
   Manzini managed to get the ball past Gumede.

   Not letting up on their pace, the Chilli Boys starved us of possession
   and attacked from any angle possible. In the end though, they were
   unable to score for a second time and clinch the game.

   We had some positive aspects of play tonight, and we will need to build
   on those and work on our defensive play ahead of our fixture next week
   at home against Orlando Pirates.
   [story-1-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski team conclude their MultiChoice Diski Challenge season at
   10am tomorrow morning with a game against Chippa United at Wolfson
   Stadium.

   The boys have had a fairly successful season. They started off their
   2018/19 campaign as a unit who has not had much playing time together.
   This saw them struggling to find the back of the net in a number of
   their opening games of the season. Although playing good attacking
   soccer, they were letting themselves down with their finishing in the
   final third.

   This meant losing some vital points and being in a position that saw
   them having to win more games to be in a position to contend for the
   Multichoice Diski Challenge crown. Although showing some determination,
   they just could not accumulate the points needed and currently sit 7
   points off of the top of the log.

   They will be looking to finish the season on a high as they take on the
   Chilli Boys who have only managed to win 2 games in their season.

   As the game is not part of a Festival, it will not be televised. We
   will however let you know how the game progresses over our social media
   channels.
   [chippa-story-150x150.jpg]

   We return to the ABSA Premiership tomorrow night as we travel to Port
   Elizabeth to take on Chippa United. The game is set to kick off at
   20h00.

   The team has been doing well under Coach Steven Komphela since the
   beginning of the year and have shown some fight when in trying
   situations. We saw this in the last ABSA Premiership game against
   SuperSport United.

   Our last outing, a Nedbank Cup game, saw a determined team take the win
   and progress to the quarter finals of the competition.

   The mentor ship and guidance from the coaching staff is showing in
   confidence on the field and the players look to collect some more
   points as we take on Chippa United.

   Chippa too, have been growing in confidence since Clinton Larsen took
   over the reigns. He has guided the side to victory in their Nedbank Cup
   games as well as wins against Maritzburg United and Free State Stars in
   the Premiership.

   Confidence will be high among their players an we will have to address
   the game with some caution an discipline.

   The game will be televised live on SuperSport 4 (channel 204) and we
   will be posting the games proceedings on our social network channels.
   [coaches-comment-witbank-spurs-150x150.jpg]

   The match was played under trying rainy conditions. The opponent
   approach suited the conditions better because they played direct. Our
   defence did very well in dealing with the direct balls. It took us 8
   minutes to find the back of the net. A corner kick sequence resulted in
   Lamola opening the score to make it 0:1.

   We also missed two clear cut chances which could have put the game
   beyond in the first half. The opponent as expected started the second
   half on a high but we dealt with the pressure very well. We then got
   ourselves the second goal from Lamola again and the score was 0:2.

   We failed to kill the match and the opponent kept growing in confidence
   and pulled one back to make it 1:2. We were forced to make a few
   changes in the midfield by taking MOLEFE out, Nkombelo in and pushed
   Lunga into central midfield alongside Parusnath.

   We had moments where we were put under undue pressure. The two other
   subs in Sabelo and Sibiya did not change our game much instead we were
   just defending deeper and deeper. We defended a bit too deep and failed
   to come out on Counter successfully.

   The few times we did, we missed great clear cut chances to bury the
   match. We finished the match 1:2 and moved into the quarterfinals of
   the Nedbank Cup.
   [last16-final-story-150x150.jpg]

   We are advancing to the quarter finals of the Nedbank Cup after an
   action packed game against Witbank Spurs this afternoon.

   It was a game of two halfs. We dominated the first half, getting onto
   the score board with a goal from Lerato Lamola. The goal came from a
   short corner, executed well by Parusnath. The ball landed at Lamola’s
   feet and he turned, took his shot and found the back of the net.

   Witbank Spurs showed determination to get back into the game and had
   passages of play that saw them get into the final third. They were
   however not able to capitalise.

   We created opportunities to extend the lead. Sibisi narrowly missed out
   on a chance from a free kick and we created other chances that just
   lacked on finishing.

   The second half saw Witbank Spurs come back onto the field showing
   renewed determination. They dominated the play by playing long balls up
   field to get behind the defence.

   We had a number of close calls, and managed to stand strong in our
   defence until the 85th minute when Mrawu received a ball in the box,
   split the defence and played a shot between Gumede’s leg to pull one
   back.

   This fired them up and they attacked into the final third with
   determination for the last minutes of play.

   We would like to thank our supporters who traveled up for the game.
   Your voices did not go unheard from the stands.
   [witbank-story-150x150.jpg]

   We travel to Puma Rugby Stadium tomorrow as we take on Witbank Spurs in
   the Last 16 stage of the Nedbank Cup. The game will kick off at 15h00
   and will be televised live on SABC 1

   We are approaching each stage of the competition with measured caution,
   and are prepared to come up against an unpredictable Witbank Spurs.
   They are a team that plays with determination under the guidance of
   Shakes Mashaba. This was evident in their last Nedbank Cup game when
   they beat Maritzburg United on penalties.

   We lost our first game under Steve Komphela’s guidance last weekend.
   But the fight and character of the team to come back from being 2-0
   down is a clear depiction of the confidence that he has already
   instilled in the players.

   We will be expecting direct and purposeful football from our opponents
   on Saturday. We know that they are capable of catching their opponents
   on the back foot and we will be expecting a competitive game from them.

   Catch the action on our social media platforms if you are unable to
   tune into the game on TV, we will be keeping you up to date by the
   minute on all of the action.
   [cc-ssu-150x150.jpg]

   This was a very unique performance by the team and a strange result. We
   struggled to deal with SS UTD two wingers in Modiba and Rusike dropping
   into the half spaces and cheating or not tracking back.

   This created problems for our midfield and on several occasions we
   suffered counter attacks because we couldn’t finish our attacks
   successfully nor counter pressed effectively and as a result we allowed
   SS UTD to play easily on counter attacks.

   We conceded two goals in two minutes because we failed to stop the
   crosses into the box. The crosses were played in our central zone. We
   then immediately made a sub where we introduced Bilankulu at the centre
   of defence and we were immediately settled.

   We went on but lost the first half 2:0. The second half was completely
   different.

   We dominated in attack right from the beginning and missed a great
   chance when Lunga made a brilliant cross. We had a lot of attacks and
   we scored two goals to make it 2:2. We kept probing and attacking for
   the whole second half and the opponent couldn’t react.

   We unfortunately suffered a blow when the opponent scored the third
   goal deep into stoppage time to make it 3:2. The goal was a superb
   strike from outside the box. We then suffered our first defeat. A good
   and much improved performance in the second half but unfortunately
   could not score enough to win the match.
   [final-story-150x150.jpg]

   A second half fight back saw us pull back 2 goals against SuperSport
   United and tie the game until a long range goal from Mokoena sealed the
   victory for the visitors today.

   SuperSport showed some dominance in the first 45 minutes of play and
   kept pressure on the defence until Rusike scored the opening goal in
   the 27th minute of play.

   A quick restart from us saw a close chance to level the score, but
   Mutizwa was judged offside. SuperSport saw an opportunity to take
   advantage of our frustration and increased their tally with a header
   from Machupu.

   A tactical change from the bench saw Coach Komphela replace Jooste with
   Bilankulu to stabilize the defence.

   The boys had set themselves a big target going into the break and came
   out determined to make good on their second half game plan.

   We put some early pressure on the visitors and continued to attack the
   goals from different angles. Quick one two’s in the box lead to Furman
   handeling the ball in the box and we were awarded a penalty. Mutizwa
   slotted home the opportunity and we continued the fight.

   We leveled the score four minutes later when Parusnath headed in a
   cross from Venter.

   We had a number of opportunities to score but Williams did well when
   called on and the defense of SuperSport was quick to fall back in
   numbers to defend their goals.

   In the closing stages of the game, Mokoena decided to take a chance
   with a long range shot. The ball curled in toward the top right of the
   goal and Gumede was unable to reach the shot.

   We would like to extend our thanks to the crowd that showed up this
   afternoon. Your voices could be heard when the team was down and needed
   encouragement, and for that we are appreciative.

   The team will change focus this week as we prepare for our Last 16 game
   against Witbank Spurs in the Nedbank Cup.
   [story-150x150.jpg]

   We are in action again on Sunday at Sugar Ray Stadium as we take on
   SuperSport United in the ABSA Premiership. Kick off will be at 15h30.

   It’s another opportunity for us to climb up the log as we take on the
   8th placed United. After the arrival of Coach Steve Komphela, the team
   seem to have found some form and pulled together to secure 2 wins and 2
   draws in the league since the beginning of the year.

   A positive vibe is prominent in the camp and the team know what the
   objectives are as we get into the meat of the second half of the
   competition.

   October saw us take SuperSport United on in the first round of the
   league that saw us draw 1-1. It was a game that should have belonged to
   us, but an unfortunate own goal from us just before the break saw us
   fighting for points in the second half. The equaliser was eventually
   scored by Conco in the 68th minute, but we were not able to find a
   winning goal before full time.

   SuperSport United are on the back foot at the moment. They have not
   secured the wins they have wanted in their past few games, losing 2 out
   of their last three fixtures and winning just one.

   The team will be hungry to secure points to stay in the top half of the
   log and will fight for this as they visit us.

   The game will be televised on SuperSport 4 (204) but we urge you to get
   to the stadium and enjoy the action live and get behind the boys.

   Tickets will be available at the stadium at R40 for adults and R15 for
   kids under 12.

   If you’re not able to get there, then follow us on Facebook, Twitter or
   Instagram for all of the game updates.
   [coach-comment-highlands-150x150.jpg]

   A very difficult match to play where two teams displayed two
   contrasting styles. Golden Arrows playing short interpasses with lots
   of movement and the opponent playing long balls directly into the box
   with the aim to find Mdala.

   The opponent were looking to dominate physically but we were more
   technical and had more tactical fluidity. We started well and had good
   control of the game and scored our first goal of the match via a
   beautiful strike from Venter outside the box to make it 1:0.

   We had a good first half and when we got back from half time, the
   opponent made a double change and started dominating us in wide areas.
   We then opted to manipulate our structure so as to deal with crosses by
   stopping the supply and closing down Mvala who is their threat.

   We scored the second goal to make it 2:0 after dispossessing Rae and
   going on Counter Attack where Mutizwa returned Lamola’s pass by
   crossing low into the box. Lamola made a deep penetrating run to the
   first post to make it 2:0 but just five minutes after scoring our
   second goal, we conceded from a set play and the score was 2:1.

   We had a nervy end to the match but we ended up winning 2:1 deservedly
   so.
   [story-highlands-win-150x150.jpg]

   Goals from Danny Venter and Lerato Lamola helped secure 3 points
   against Highlands Park at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium this afternoon.

   We came onto the field showing our determination this afternoon. From
   the kick off the side looked hungry and determined to secure the win,
   and this translated into the play on the field. We attacked early with
   Lunga making some good runs up the side and playing in behind the
   defence.

   This created a number of chances for us. Jooste, Sabelo and Mutizwa put
   a great deal of pressure on the defence, but just failed to get decent
   clean touches when it mattered.

   Our breakthrough came in the 24th minute when a similar  play tactic
   was used. Highlands Park defended well and the ball was played out of
   the final third. Venter played onto the ball well, struck it and it
   deflected off a Highlands player an kept its course. Kapini had little
   chance of the save and we had an important lead going into the break.

   The second half was a defensive one for us. Highlands Park came on the
   attack and had us on the back foot often.  We did well defensively,
   with the team communicating an closing gaps when needed. They also
   looked more composed on the defensive set pieces and managed the
   pressure of the attacking opposition well.

   A number of changes in the side saw Lamola come onto the field. He
   scored on his first touch of the game after turn over ball at the back.
   Mutizwa got fed the ball, he played it up field and held onto it just
   long enough for Lamola to be in the right position. Lamola tracked the
   ball well and although Kapini got some of his body on it, the loose
   ball had enough momentum to roll into the goals.

   We had a lapse of concentration just 5 minutes later, and where we had
   been so strong earlier conceded a goal. A free kick on the far side of
   the field was played to the near post, Rae was not marked that well and
   managed to get into the air and header one past Gumede.

   Highlands unleashed a late onslaught, looking to find at least a point
   with an equaliser but we held off for the victory.

   We will now plan for our next game which will also be at home, against
   SuperSport United next Sunday.
   [sundowns-diski-story-150x150.jpg]

   It was a game of two halves this morning in Ulundi against Mamelodi
   Sundowns in the Multichoice Diski Challenge.

   A well prepared Sundowns side took us to task in the first half. They
   came strong on attack and had us pinned back defensively for a large
   deal of the first half. Determined keeper, Mlungwana, had a battle on
   his hands as he fought to keep a clean sheet as Mamelodi Sundowns
   attacked from all angles.

   He managed to do this well, having a number of brilliant saves, and
   keeping the opponents at bay for the first 45.

   It was early in the second half that a missed pass in the midfield
   allowed Sundowns to counter quickly. We were caught lacking at the
   back, and the space created allowed Ngcongo to get a shot in past
   Mlungwana.

   The team then pulled together and with some positional changes on the
   field started having more luck on the field. The players created
   chances and pushed into the final third but were not able to convert
   chances.

   Late into the half we had a brilliant attempt at goal from Khwela who
   had been pushing hard the entire half. His shot was deflected and a lob
   back into the box found Nzuza under the ball.

   He struck the ball well in the air, and directed the header past
   Sundowns keeper to find the late equaliser.

   This resulted in a dynamic last 5 minutes of play where both sides
   threw all they had at the game to try and secure the win and three
   points.

   We however ended up sharing the points this morning and will return to
   Durban to prepare for our last Challenge game for 2019 against Chippa
   United on the 23rd of Feb at Wolfson Stadium
   [story-highlands-150x150.jpg]
   Golden Arrows vs Highlands North

   Its a battle of 9th and 10th spot on the log this weekend as we take on
   Highlands Park at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium tomorrow afternoon.

   The team has performed well so far in the second half of the season,
   collecting 5 points from the last three Premiership games played. They
   do however have the knowledge in the back of their minds that we need
   to collect maximum points to realise the aim of obtaining a top 8
   finish again this season.

   Our last encounter against Highlands Park ended in a 2-1 loss at
   Makhulong Stadium. After equalising in the 32nd minute, we ended up
   conceding a goal just 10 minutes before the break.

   The second half played out as a goalless battle once the team had
   pulled together properly and displayed the style of soccer that we are
   used to.

   We will be looking to get some revenge on the Lions of the North as
   they vist our backyard on Saturday afternoon.

   Highlands can be a formiddable opponent, and they have set their sights
   on proving this in the 2018/19 season.

   They have put in strong performances against every team they have
   faced, playing to draws against Orlando Pirates and Amazulu while
   losing their last fixture to Mamelodi Sundowns.

   They will be looking to make it two for two on Saturday and the
   coaching staff and team are prepared to come up against a determined 11
   come kick off time.

   The game will be televised on SuperSport 4 (204) live from the stadium.

   We will also be keeping you up to date with the game over our social
   media platforms.
   [draw16-150x150.jpg]

   The draw for the Last 16 stage of the 2019 Nedbank Cup took place
   tonight in Johannesburg.

   We drew another away fixture against Witbank Spurs for the second round
   of this years Cup competition.

   Spurs got through to the second round of the competition after knocking
   out Maritzburg United 5-4 on penalties after drawing 2 all after extra
   time.

   The exact fixture dates and times will be finalised and released in due
   course. Once we are informed of the details we will let you, our
   supporters, know.
   [story-3-150x150.jpg]

   Diski action heads to Ulundi’s Prince Mangosuthu Stadium for the
   penultimate Diski Festival of the 2018/19 season this weekend.

   We take on Mamelodi Sundowns on Saturday morning at 10am in the first
   game of the festival.

   The team has found their feet late in the season and unfortunately are
   not in contention for the title again. That being said, they are taking
   every game as an opportunity to strengthen tactics as we look ahead to
   the Shield competition later in the season.

   Sundowns find themselves 10 points off the top of the log too, so also
   have no chance of any contention in the competition. They are not a
   team to give in and will still fight for the win on the day.

   Entry is free on both days but tickets will be issued to supporters as
   part of access control. Tickets can be collected at the stadium’s
   ticket office on Thursday and Friday from 13h00

   Ulundi fans can also look forward to an exhilarating performance from
   the multi-award winning Khuzani ‘King Khuba’ Mpungose. The leader of
   the Blue Nation will thrill fans at half time of both Sunday fixtures.
   [comments-tjakastad-150x150.jpg]

   The third away match in a row and against an unknown opponent with
   unknown players in a crucial knockout competition. We had five players
   starting for the first time and we were not sure how they’d respond.
   However, we had a very strong start and created chances right at the
   beginning of the match, we scored our first goal via Moreira in the
   fifth minute.

   The team defended in good shape and the two front runners were always
   ready to pounce and our strategy yielded good moments in attack. It is
   only on few occasions where we missed precision in our counter-press,
   thus, momentarily this resulted in us being threatened but we dealt
   with that challenge very well.

   Our second goal came from a header from Sibisi in the 23rd minute.
   Similarly the third goal was scored just ten minutes into second half
   and came from yet another header from a set play to make it 3:0. The
   sequence and scheming of set plays was very good and we consistently
   threatened the opponent.

   A good result and good response from the changes we made. The biggest
   positive was the information gathered from the new striking pairings.

   There’s more positives to work from and the team is starting to gel
   well through their patient inter passing game with support from our
   wingbacks.

   A good result and we are through to the round of 16.
   [result-1-150x150.jpg]

   A brace from Thando Khwela in the first half, and a goal from super sub
   Nkosikhona Dube in the second half saw us secure a 3-0 win over Black
   Leopards in the MDC Challenge this morning.

   We dominated the play over the full 90 minutes.We did not allowing the
   home side many opportunities to get into any position where they looked
   dangerous and kept them on the back foot for the better part of the
   game.

   After missing some good chances in the opening minutes of the game to
   score, we eventually opened the scoring off a penalty in the 30th
   minute.

   Being under pressure for the majority of the half caused some
   frustration to the home side. A lack in their discipline and
   concentration in the box saw them concede the penalty after a late
   tackle in the box.

   Khwela took the spot kick and found the mark, beating the keeper.

   Shortly after he narrowly missed an opportunity to extend the lead as
   he fired one over the bar, but was eventually awarded his brace shortly
   before the half time break.

   Leopards had passages of play that looked as if they were going to
   fight back, but never got into a promising position. They had a chance
   to pull one back early in the second half, but messed the chance up
   after putting the attempt wide.

   A substitution from the bench saw Dube entering play. He made an
   immediate impact and scored minutes after coming onto the field.

   Another positive result from the side this morning.

   The boys will be in action again next weekend as they face Sundowns at
   the King Mangosuthu Regional Stadium. Kick off will be at 10am.
   [story-2-150x150.jpg]

   Goals from Moreira, Sibisi and Nkombelo tonight saw us take a win in
   the Last 32 round of the 2019 Nedbank Cup against Tjakastad Junior
   Shepard at Mbombela Stadium.

   The home side gave a good fight in a game that saw them go on the back
   foot in just the 5th minute as Moreira opened the scoring off a stray
   ball from an attempt from Sabelo.

   This saw Tjakastad slip into a desperate defensive mode for a number of
   minutes before finding their feet again and attempting to use their
   possession to push up. Their uneasiness almost cost them again just a
   minute after the opening goal as Sabelo found himself in front of the
   goals. It was some impressive keeping from Bhembe that kept the score
   down.

   In the 23rd minute, Sibisi was awarded with his first goal in the first
   team as he headed a well taken corner.

   The home side handled this better, and instead of losing concentration
   began a period of play that saw them grow in confidence. this saw them
   perform well in the last 10 minutes of the first half.

   Returning to the field, Tjakastad came back playing with determination
   and produced a better performance in the second half. They produced a
   number of attempts, but just lacked in finishing. They showed some
   great determination on the field and helped create an entertaining game
   for the crowd.

   Nkombelo was rewarded with a goal in the 56th minute. He had a good
   game back, and had some outstanding supporting plays throughout the
   game. His work rate was recognised with him being awarded the Man of
   the Match tonight.

   The draw for the last 16 will be done on Thursday night, and we will
   let you know as it happens on the night.
   [diski-vs-leopards-150x150.jpg]

   The Diski team travel to Thohoyandou Stadium on Sunday morning to face
   Black Leopards in their third to last game of the Diski Challenge, The
   game will kick off at 10am.

   With the majority of the Diski Challenge under our belts, it is evident
   that the team will not be able to retain our title this season.
   Although a determined team have played well over the season, they have
   not managed to finish off well in a number of games, resulting in a
   number of draws over the season.

   This has affected the points haul and not given us the edge we would
   have liked to have had.

   Some form has been found in the later part of the season though, with
   two wins in our last three games. This has seen us push into 7th
   position on the log.

   The team is determined to collect as many points possible in the last
   three games. Using the games as preparation for the Shield competition
   later in the season.

   Black Leopards have not proven to be a strong team in the competition,
   having only won one game so far. This sees them sitting at the bottom
   of the log. However, they are a determined team and home game advantage
   could work to their favour.

   The game is not televised on Sunday, but we will keep you up to date
   with the proceedings over our social networks.
   [tjakastad-js-nedbank-cup-150x150.jpg]

   We shift our focus this weekend as we face Tjakastad Junior Shepard in
   the Last-32 of the Nedbank Cup. The game will be played Saturday night
   at Mbombela Stadium, Kick off at 20h15.

   The Nedbank Cup is a competition that creates entertaining football,
   with smaller clubs getting a rare opportunity to put themselves to the
   test against the cream of the crop of South African soccer.

   The underdogs often perform on this stage and over the years this has
   created some upsets.

   Tjakastad, will be drawing on the hype and excitement of being able to
   perform on this stage, and will be taking this to the pitch on
   Saturday. As always the opportunity gives the smaller teams an
   opportunity to play extra hard on the night as they look to progress
   through the stages of the competition.

   The game will be televised live on SABC 1 and we will be posting about
   the games progression from the first minute.

   If you’re in the area, get to the stadium and show your support. We
   would greatly appreciate it. Tickets are sold at Ticketpro outlets,
   Edgar’s, Jet, Spar. R40 adults, R15 kids U12
   [cc-steve-komphela-e1548047008911-150x150.jpg]

   The team gave a fairly good performance and played decent football
   after a day long trip from Durban to Venda. The match was played at
   night, under rain, typical of Thohoyandou, it was still hot but much
   better than what it would have been during the day.

   We had a good first half with lots of clear cut chances to take the
   lead in the match but we failed. The opponent kept pushing and piling
   pressure but we showed lots of maturity in defending. As a result the
   opponent did not create too many opportunities.

   Of the chances we had, we could immediately remember the Venter ball
   that hit the upright, Parusnath had his ball parried by the keeper,
   Sibiya’s shot going over the bar, Lamola had an easy tap in to make and
   many more which occurred in the second half. We simply lacked composure
   in front of Goals.

   Our goal came early in the second half and we deservedly took the lead.
   We were fairly in control of the match but lacked the right connection
   between winning the ball, the stabilizing or forward pass to create a
   scoring opportunity. Something we seriously need to work on.

   Our good work was undone by lapse of concentration when we conceded a
   corner with 4 minutes to go before end of the match. The resulting
   corner was flicked from near post to far and found Lamola and Sibisi
   not ready. The opponent got a late equalizer and the match ended 1:1.
   [fss-story-e1547981253284.jpg]

   A hat-trick from Siphamandla Sabelo secured a home win for the Diski
   team against Free State Stars this morning at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium.

   The contribution of a determined team effort, that saw the visitors
   score only once after a slight lack of concentration after the break
   did well to secure 3 points in todays Asidlali game.

   In the first half it took just 8 minutes for us to open the scoring.
   Some great positional play put pressure on the visitors defence, and
   opened up space on the left side. Sabelo was open and controlled the
   ball well, taking a shot that kept low and finding the back of the net.

   Free State were put on he back foot and took a while to get back into
   the game, but fought back in the last 5 minutes of the half as they
   looked to find an eqauliser.

   Coming back from the break, their intention was strong and they managed
   to find a small gap in our positional play. Moloi took his shot and the
   ball just went under a diving Mlungwana’s glove.

   Not even a minute later, we took the lead again. Sabelo scored his
   brace after an outstanding assist from Mathenjwa.

   He was awarded his third for the day in the 63rd minute. Once again,
   great positioning play from the side saw him able to attack the goals
   from the right hand side where a huge space had opened.

   A great team effort from the youngsters today and a well deserved win.
   [leopards-result-19jan.jpg]
   Absa Premiership: Black Leopards v Golden Arrows

   An action packed and entertaining game tonight at Thohoyandou Stadium
   saw us play to a draw against Black Leopards.

   From kick off, it was clear that the game was going to be one that went
   to the wire with both sides fighting to use possession to the maximum.

   We had a number of scoring opportunities in the first 45, but it was
   Leopards who created more space and were denied the lead off an offside
   play that saw them put the ball in the back of the net.

   The toe to toe action carried through until the break, with the sides
   going into the break with no score on the board.

   The second half started a bit slower. But it took only 5 minutes for
   the pace to pick up to the same of the first 45.

   We used our position and possession well, and pushed up into the last
   third. We eventually got the break through in the 53rd minute as Lamola
   found space on the near side and put the ball past the hard working
   Ndlovu.

   Three minutes later the keeper denied Sibiya extending the lead from a
   similar position with an outstanding save.

   The battle lines were drawn and Leopards did all they could to attack
   when they had the ball on foot. We had a number of close calls, with
   the defence doing well to clear the ball from the danger area when a
   determined Leopards came on the attack.

   The persistance of the home side paid off though as Mwape Musonda
   eventually found the equaliser for the home side just 5 minutes before
   full time.

   This set the tone for an explosive final minutes. We handled some close
   calls as Black Leopards pushed hard to find a winner while using our
   ball to try find the space to clench a win.

   In the end the scoreline reflected the nights battle with the teams
   walking away with a point each.

   The team will now change their concentration to next weeks Nedbank Cup
   encounter against Tjakastad JS at Mbombela Stadium.
   [diski-fss-story-150x150.jpg]

   It’s action time again in the Diski Challenge this weekend as we host
   Free State Stars at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium on Sunday at 10am.

   We are heading to the end of the Challenge season and the team have not
   had as a successful season as they would have possibly liked. The team
   have played well game in and out, but have failed to score goals to win
   games. This has seen them win just four games, while drawing three and
   losing three.

   The positive from this is that we have seen some great development of
   younger players this season, many of whom will either strengthen the
   pool for the first team or be more used to the clubs style of play
   going into next season.

   We take on free State Stars who have been having a relatively positive
   season, sitting 4th on the log, just 3 points behind log leaders
   Bloemfontein Celtic.

   The incentive for them to secure the win on Sunday is great, as it will
   keep them in contention to win the competition this year.

   This will make them dangerous competitors at Sugar Ray Xulu.

   We would like to encourage you to get to the stadium. Entrance is free
   and the gates are open to anyone who would like to come and watch.
   [leopards-story-150x150.jpg]
   Leopards host Abafana Bes'thende

   A confident Black Leopards host us on Saturday night as we meet them in
   the ABSA Premiership at Thohoyandou Stadium at 20h15.

   With two games already under the belt in the new year, and 4 points
   taken from them, the team will be looking to break Leopards run on
   Saturday night and return to Durban with all 3 points.

   There has been a regeneration of enthusiasm in camp. A lot of work is
   being done with Steve Komphela in both our attacking game and
   defensively.

   This has been evident in the games against both Maritzburg United and
   Bloem Celtic.

   Another week has passed and that means 7 more days of working on
   improving elements of our game both offensively and defensively. A lot
   of strategy has been done in pin-pointing aspects of Black Leopards
   game that can be taken advantage of.

   The team is confident ahead of the fixture, but know that Black
   Leopards will be dangerous after their 3 game winning run of late.

   Lidoda Duvha have enjoyed wins against SuperSport United, Baroka and
   Amazulu and are brimming with confidence ahead of the game.

   This could have either a positive or negative affect on the side
   depending on how they handle it.

   Their winning run has seen them gain some place on the log, and sit
   just a position below us on 11th.

   The game should be an entertaining one to watch. You can catch it live
   on SuperSport 211 or follow us on our social media platforms for
   play-by-play posts.
   [coaches-comments-bloem-e1547449341602.jpg]

   A very difficult away match against Celtic who’ve been on a good run of
   form. The match was further complicated by the fact that both teams had
   a similar approach and played the same system but Celtic were more used
   to it than us.

   Such conditions made the match even more difficult to break down and
   win. We conceded right at the end of first half which is a critical
   phase of the match but we never dropped our heads. Dlamini received a
   pass from the free kick restart and continued on one-two combination
   unmarked and finished to make it 1:0.

   Our first substitute was made immediately at the beginning of the
   second half when Sibiya got in for Conco. Our game changed for the
   better. We had a better second half and also did a few tactical
   switches to manipulate the match. Through consistent probing we got a
   free kick on top of the box in the central area, which was supposed to
   have been a penalty yet awarded as free kick, Mutizwa converted to make
   it 1:1.

   Despite the fact that the match ended in a draw we finished the match
   strong though there still a lot of work to be covered.
   [bloem-celtic-result-e1547394343115.jpg]

   A well placed free kick in the second half saw us equalise with
   Bloemfontein Celtic at Dr Molemela Stadium this afternoon.

   In the first 45 we managed to dominate play and should have gone at
   least a goal up after some well executed plays and attempts. Conco did
   well on the right hand side, feeding the ball into the box and finding
   Lamola and Mutizwa.

   Some solid defence and the experience of Tignyemb in the goals for
   Celtic saw them deny us attack after attack.

   It was on the counter that Dlamini was put through by Baloyi and
   managed to drag the ball across the goals and past Gumede to take the
   lead just three minutes before the break.

   Coming out of the changeroom, Coach Komphela looked at changing some
   tactic with the introduction of Sibiya onto the field.

   This introduction of fresh legs made some difference and we committed
   to playing up on the attack more. Play up the left from Sibisi and
   Lunga also saw an increase in the cross attempts to feed the box.

   In the 64th minute we were awarded a free kick after Lamola was pulled
   down just on the edge of the box. Mutizwa did well to curl the ball
   around the right side of the wall, and Tignyemb did not have enough
   time to react, allowing us to find the equaliser.

   Neither side were able to find a winning goal. We had a number of
   attempts on target but were denied by some good keeping from the Celtic
   keeper.

   Preparation will be intense this week as we prepare for another away
   game on Saturday next week against Black Leopards at the Thohoyandou
   stadium at 20:15
   [result.jpg]

   It was a tough day at the office for the Diski boys who were reduced to
   10 men and lost 1-0 to SuperSport United today.

   Today’s game started off level headed, with both sides controlling
   their ball well and creating creative scoring opportunities. We were
   unlucky not to open the scoring early on in the game off a free kick
   just outside the box, and missed a number of chances in the first 30
   minutes against a confident SuperSport team.

   In the 36th minute the game was turned on its head as Thabani Zuke
   received a red card and the home side was awarded a penalty. Zuke, the
   last man in defence pulled a player down in the box as SuperSport
   attacked. The referee handed him the maximum punishment and gave United
   the opportunity to take the lead.

   Coming out of the break, the side made an effort to find an equaliser,
   and although they were creating the opportunities were just not able to
   convert the chances.

   Being a man down also meant a great deal of defensive work needed to be
   carried out. This drained the team physically, not allowing them to
   push up at full throttle when they needed to.

   This was not the result that the team were hoping for, and will need to
   regroup as they prepare this week for their game against Free State
   Stars at Sugar Ray Stadium next week.
   [bloemceltic-goldenarrows-story.jpg]

   We travel to Dr Molemela Stadium to take on Bloemfontein Celtic on
   Sunday afternoon at 15h30.

   After the arrival of coach Steve Komphela and last weekends win against
   Maritzburg United, the team have a new spring in their step heading
   into the second half of the season.

   There has been some change in game plans and objectives, this was
   evident in last week’s encounter. The players took the ball to the
   oppositions in a more aggressive and determined way, resulting in two
   well executed goals.

   There were a number of opportunities created from all angles of the
   field, and once we were reduced to 10 men, the defence play from the
   team was second level.

   This play will carry the side well as we head to take on 6th placed
   Bloem celtic on the weekend.

   The coaching staff and team are carrying some positive energy and are
   feeling confident about returning to Durban with 3 points.

   Bloem Celtic are coming off a 1-0 win against Chippa United. This will
   add some confidence to a team that is dealing with some major issues at
   present.

   Celtic can be unpredictable, and will be wanting to send a positive
   message of encouragement to their fans with a win at home.

   The game will be televised on both SuperSport4 and SABC.

   We will also be keeping you up to date with play by play action on our
   social media channels.
   [diski-story-supersport-arrows.jpg]

   The Multichoice Diski challenge kicks off the 2019 half of the
   competition this weekend. We are hosted by SuperSport United at TUT
   Stadium with kick off at 12:00.

   Its a battle of 7th and 8th place for us.

   After accumulating 15 points off the first half of the season, with 4
   wins 3 draws and 3 losses, we sit just a point below Matsatsantsa

   The team will be aiming to secure as many wins as possible heading into
   the second half of the competition to have any hope of topping the log.

   In a year that has seen a number of our juniors being promoted to
   senior team in the club, the remaining and new players have done well
   to prove themselves and have adapted quickly to the clubs style of
   play.

   They have matured quickly and found their feet over the last couple of
   games.

   SuperSport have secured 16 points from their first 10 games of the
   season. Thay have had the same number of wins, but have drawn one less
   than us to sit at 7th on the log at present.

   They are also an ambitious team in the competition and will be looking
   to secure full points at home.

   The game is not part of a festival and therefore will not televised. We
   will keep you up to date on the progress of the game via all of our
   social media platforms.
   [coaches-comments-maritzburg.jpg]

   A good and crucial victory for the club and a confidence boost for the
   team going forward.

   The team applied itself very well in the first half, a solid and clear
   structure, good ball retention, even though there’s still a lot of work
   to be done. We maintained good attacking shape and were well organized
   in defense, managing the match phases precisely.

   Our structured attack culminated in an early lead when Venter picked
   Mutizwa inside the box to give us a 1:0 lead through a perfectly placed
   header. The Midfield and defence had good structure and from the
   structure another opportunity but Mutizwa failed to make it count.

   We had to wait for the start of the second half after Moreira replaced
   Mutizwa who got injured in the first half. He combined well with Lamola
   to make it 2:0.

   Deep in the second half we suffered a red card when Jooste got sent off
   for a reckless tackle. We had to change the team shape and manage the
   match for the remaining 30 minutes of the match.

   We did what was required then and maintained great tactical shape in
   defense and had to show resilience and mental strength to win the
   match. The match ended 2:0 in our favor.
   [story-1-e1546790094488.jpg]

   Goals from Knox Mutizwa and Joao Moreira secured us a win in the KZN
   Derby game this afternoon against Maritzburg United.

   It took just 10 minutes for us to open the scoring in the game this
   afternoon after some early pressure and good combination play saw us
   push up into the last third and put pressure on the Maritzburg defence.

   Mutizwa headed the ball into the net off a cross from Danny Venter to
   take the lead. There were a number of chances before that, where we put
   pressure on Ofori. Seth Parusnath had an attempt and Lamola unleashed a
   shot. But it was the brilliant cross that gave us the opportunity to
   open the scoring.

   Danny Venter also had a shot on target in the half, but Ofori managed
   to top the ball over the bar, an then later denie Mutizwa his brace
   with some good defending under pressure.

   There was not much fight from the visitors in the first half, and only
   fought back in the last 5 minutes of the first half looking for the
   equalizer.

   It was not to be, and heading into the break with a lead encouraged the
   team.

   After the break, we substituted Mutizwa for Moreira and it was just 2
   minutes after the break that he played a ball across the face of the
   goal after a through ball from Lamola.

   Ofori failed to make the save, allowing us to extend the lead early on
   in the second half.

   Maritzburg then seemed determined to fight back and the true colors of
   a Derby game began emerging.

   The attacking play from them changed our game into a defensive one.
   This saw us tackling more than attacking and Jooste unfortunately fell
   short of the referee and received a red card for what was deemed a
   dangerous tackle.

   This seemed to give Maritzburg the encouragement they needed and they
   fought back for a great deal of the half to try and pull at least one
   goal back.

   Solid defence from the team denied them the opportunities, and when
   they did have the chances, Gumede stood solid in the goal mouth.

   A well deserved win for the club today and a good start to 2019.

   Todays result will be encouraging as we head off to face Bloem Celtic
   on Sunday 13th at 15h30.

   On Sunday We kick off the year and the second part of the season with a
   home KZN Derby against Maritzburg United at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium.The
   game kicks off at 15h30.

   Both sides are looking to get fresh starts to the second part of the
   season, and will be wanting to see results from the new coaches.

   It will be Steve Komphela’s first game as head coach of Golden Arrows
   and Mushin Ertugral’s first game for Maritzburg United’s an both teams
   will be expecting results from the game.

   This will add another layer to the normal pressures of Derby games and
   will make for an exciting and interesting game.

   There seems to be a positive vibe to the remainder of the season and a
   home win against The Team of Choice will set a positive level to the
   remainder of the season.

   Maritzburg will also be wanting to see some positive results. They have
   secured the services of Ertugral to attempt to climb out of the
   relegation zone.

   They will be hoping for a positive result, and an away win for them
   could boost the morale in their camp.

   Maritzburg will be looking for only their second win of the season and
   what better platform to look at securing the points than a Derby game.

   We would like to get the year off to a bang, and call on all of our
   supporters to get to Sugar Ray Xulu in numbers.

   Tickets will be available at the stadium at the normal price of R40 for
   adults and R15 for kids under 12 years of age.
   [620x349-1-150x150.jpg]

   Lamontville Golden Arrows would like to announce that we have parted
   ways with head Coach Clinton Larsen, by mutual agreement between both
   parties.

   After careful consideration, both the club and Clinton agree that this
   is in the best interest of both parties for the relationship to end
   with immediate effect.

   Clinton has been totally professional in his approach to his work and
   in parting ways, we wish him all the best for his future. Clinton
   responded, by sincerely thanking the Chairlady, management, technical
   staff and players at the club, for the time that he spent at the helm
   of a young and exciting team and wished them well for the rest of the
   season.
   [cochescomamazulu-150x150.jpg]

   A disappointing end to the first round but still one that we can take
   many positives from. The match itself was an entertaining one for the
   fans with both teams attacking at will.

   An early defensive lapse handed our opponents an early lead but we
   immediately showed intent to come back and almost did when Seth
   Parusnath missed a header after some good build up play. We continued
   to probe for an equalizer but the game was handed to Amazulu when Ntuli
   blatantly dragged the ball with his hand before being fouled, an
   incident that took place right in front of the referee.

   We then had a mountain to climb and were unable to convert any of the
   chances we created.

   We now look forward to having back our injured and suspended players
   for the 2nd round, namely: Buthelezi, Nkombelo, Zuke, Ndwandwe, Phiri
   and Bilankulu.
   [g221218f0313-150x150.jpg]

   A fourth minute goal and a penalty just minutes before the break, both
   from Bongi Ntuli saw AmaZulu secure a win in the Durban Derby this
   afternoon.

   Usuthu opened the scoring as Ntuli was put through after a turn over
   ball flicked through by Morton. He slipped between our defence and kept
   the ball low to beat Mbaeva and take an early lead.

   The home side dominated play for the next 15 minutes, not allowing us
   much time on the ball or opportunity to create any plays.

   We seemed to spring back though and had a great chance, but the strike
   from Lunga went just wide off the target. This seemed to give us some
   headway onto the game again though as we chased the equaliser going
   into the break.

   Lamola had an opportunity to score off a through-ball from Lunga but
   put the effort over the cross bars.

   Into the second minute of extra time, Victor Gomes awarded Amazulu a
   penalty after Mnagengwe took down Ntuli in the box.

   Ntuli took the shot from the mark and sent Mabeva the wrong way ,
   securing his brace and giving the home side a 2-0 lead going into the
   break.

   This set the tone for the second half that saw both sides going at each
   other for goals.

   Amazulu had a number of chances in the second half but were denied by
   Mbaeva or their attempts not being on target.

   We continued to fight back and created a number of decent chances but
   were unable to break the Usuthu defence.

   We go into the festive break with the knowledge that we will have to
   prepare for another Derby in the new year as we face Maritzburg United
   at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium January 6th.
   [story-150x150.jpg]

   We finish off 2018 with a Durban Derby match against AmaZulu FC at King
   Zwelithini Stadium tomorrow at 15h30.

   Durban can expect a clash of the KZN Titans as both teams will want to
   claim boasting rights after 90 minutes on Saturday.

   In the last two Derby outings against each other, each of the teams has
   claimed a win. We defeated AmaZulu 4-1 last season at home in September
   and Usuthu replied with a 2-1 win in February this year.

   We have found some strong form in the last 2 games, and the boys had a
   great fight back against Wits from being down 2-0 to securing a draw
   away against the Clever Boys.

   The squad have pulled together well and found some confidence on the
   field which has showed on the field. Confidence has improved and this
   has been evident in their play.

   It is a mindset that they will be encouraged to carry onto the field on
   Saturday when facing AmaZulu in Umlazi.

   Our opponents have been riding the crest of some good play as well.
   And, up until a 3-1 defeat to Black Leopards had gone 3-for-3, managing
   to collect some needed points.

   This has seen them climb to 11th place on the log, just 3 points behind
   us.

   This makes the pressure for a win just that much more for both teams,
   and makes the Derby so much more important.

   We would love to see our supporters out in force on Saturday, getting
   behind the team as we play our last game before the Festive break.

   Should you not be there, we will be covering the game from the stadium,
   and you will be able to follow it on our social media channels.

   After a poor opening 25 minutes and conceding two goals we gave
   ourselves an uphill task to salvage anything from the game,especially
   against a team renowned for seeing out a lead.

   However after tweaking our system we got back into the game and started
   making some inroads. At the break we sorted out a few issues and
   immediately started to impose ourselves.

   We fought our way back scoring two and deservedly got a good point away
   from home. Another debutant was given an opportunity,Seth Parasnath and
   he put in a sterling performance capping it off with a goal.

   A solid second half performance saw us fight back from 2-0 down at half
   time and secure an important away point tonight against Bidvest Wits.

   In a game of two halves it was The Clever Boys who took the lead in the
   first half, a half that they dominated. In the 13th minute they were
   awarded a penalty as the ball was played in the box, striking Divine
   Lunga’s arm as he was going down after a defensive play.

   Although we appealed the decision, referee Abongile Tom waved us away
   as he awarded a penalty for a hand ball. Simon Murray stepped up to the
   mark and converted for the home side.

   This put us on the back foot and we struggled against some clever play
   from Wits who kept us on the back foot with Murray pushing up and
   creating gaps for Deon Hotto and Gift Motupa. This game plan payed off
   for them just 13 minutes later as Motupa slotted a cross from Hotto.

   We almost managed to pull one back just before the break as we were
   awarded a free kick on the edge of the box, but the attempt from Seth
   Parusnath went wide of the mark.

   Clinton Larsen decided on making a substitution from the change room,
   bringing Wayde Jooste on for Siboniso Conco. He had some impact plays
   from the first minute and the dominance of the game began to swing in
   our favour.

   Just two minutes into the stanza we pulled our first goal back as
   debutant Seth Parusnath found the back of the net after a great assist
   from Lerato Lamola.

   Confidence on the field climbed and we began meeting our hosts play for
   play, bringing the game back to them and breaking their dominance on
   the field.

   Jooste was then called on just over 10 minutes later, to convert a
   penalty after Parusnath was fouled in the box. He made no mistake,
   beating Keet and putting us back in contention for a win.

   We went toe to toe from here on. Wits fought hard to find their mark
   again, and had a number of opportunities but were unable to find the
   back of the net, while we had a chance to take the lead.

   In the last 10 minutes we missed a possible winning goal as Keet denied
   replacement Nduduzo Sibiya’s shot.

   A great performance from the boys tonight as they showed some
   determination in their fight back against Wits.

   We will need to put in a big performance again on the 22nd December as
   finish the year off with a KZN derby against AmaZulu FC at King
   Zwelithini Stadium.
   [bidvestwits-vs-abafana-150x150.jpg]

   We play our second to last game before the mid season break on
   Wednesday night against Bidvest Wits at the Bidvest Stadium. Kick off
   at 19h30.

   Coming off our win against Kaizer Chiefs at the beginning of the month,
   the team is feeling confident that they will be able to come away with
   points from the midweek encounter on Wednesday night.

   It will be a big ask, but the target of climbing into a top 8 berth on
   the league log is one that the entire squad are looking to achieve.

   This drive will be the foundation of the game plan when we meet the
   Clever Boys.

   Wits have been consistant over the first half of the season and this
   sees them sitting second on the log, with 2 games in hand behind log
   leaders Orlando Pirates.

   The incentive for them to retain 3 points at home is big for them and
   would see them go 2 points ahead at the top of the log.

   This will make the side even more difficult to beat.

   The Clever Boys will also be looking to regain some dominance on the
   field. They secured a 1-0 win against struggling Bleack Leopards, but
   were on the end of a 2-1 loss to Bloem Celtic in November.

   Clinton Larsen and his technical team will be asking for 110% of the
   team as they take to the pitch on Wednesday, and any support from our
   Gauteng based followers would be a boost for the lads as they give
   their all in the 90 minutes.

   The game will be televised on SABC, and we will also be giving a
   play-by-play feed on our social media platforms.
   [coaches-chiefs-150x150.jpg]


   A much needed victory under trying playing conditions. We acquitted
   ourselves well and began the match with good intensity and attack
   minded play. Our offensive players pressed collectively and with good
   co-ordination ,and as a result restricted Chiefs from developing any
   rhythm during their build up phase.

   We looked dangerous on the break and without trying to sound arrogant
   could have gone into the break 3 or 4 goals up. We deservedly took a
   two nil lead into the half time break.We had to show dogged
   determination and defensive tenacity as Chiefs threw everything at us
   in the final 15-20 minutes.

   Our defensive unit were sound as our opponents went the aerial route in
   search of an equalizer.A massive three points in the bigger scheme of
   things as again it’s quite tight at the bottom and mid table as we
   approach the half way mark.
   [9cb8955f-41ae-4544-aa98-837b12c1362f-150x150.jpg]

   A solid team effort saw us win 2-1 against Cape Town City at Princess
   Magogo Stadium in the Multichoice Diski Challenge.

   The team dominated the play throughout the 90 minutes of play but were
   failing to find those final touches to put us in the lead in the first
   half. We had a number of well executed plays that put us into the
   opposition last third, however we could just not find the back of the
   net.

   We closed down any play that Cape Town City came at us with and
   frustrated them on the field.

   Going into the break there was no score on the board.

   Returning to the field we maintained dominance but it was in the 60th
   minute against the run of play that City managed to get behind out
   defence and took a shot at goal from a tight angle. The ball deflected
   off the near post and into the goals to give them the lead.

   We retaliated quickly and almost equalised a minute later, but some
   good work from their keeper Anderson saw the attack off.

   Sabelo eventually found the back of the net in the 67th minute and then
   settled matters off a penalty awarded for a foul in the box against
   Ngcongo to secure the win against the log leaders.

   The Diski team now break until the new year when they return to the
   field against Supersport United at TUT Stadium on the 12th of January.
   [arrowsvschiefs-result-150x150.jpg]

   We secured 3 important home points this evening against Kaizer Chiefs
   at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   A well contended game from the first minute, it was Chiefs who had the
   opportunity to open the scoring in the 20th minute as a shot from
   Mahlasela attempted to lob the ball past Mbaeva, but just missing.

   We were then awarded a penalty in the 27th minute as Lamola was brought
   down in the box by Mathoho. Mzava stepped up and got enough power on
   the ball to get past Khune, who managed to get a glove on it.

   Just 5 minutes we were awarded another penalty as Hadebe’s challenge on
   Conco in the box was deemed unfair. Again Mzava stepped up to the mark
   and made no mistake to extend our lead.

   Chiefs continued their attack up the left hand side, putting pressure
   on the young Sibisi. This saw them gain advantage in the last third a
   couple of times and eventually in the 61st minute this attack plan paid
   off as castro managed to get a close range shot in.

   Chiefs increased their pressure and maintained their attack in our
   half. A number of times, they gained the upper hand and threatened our
   goals.

   Four minutes before full time, Billiat just missed an opportunity to
   equalise, but Mbaeva tipped the well weighted shot over the bar.

   We held out for the win and the points after putting up a great fight
   against the Glamour boys.

   The team will be hoping to continue their positive play in our next
   encounter which is against Bidvest Wits on the 12th of December at
   Bidvest Stadium.
   [story-1-150x150.jpg]

   We return to the field after a 3 week international break, with a home
   fixture against Kaizer Chiefs at Princess Magogo Stadium tomorrow
   night.

   The break has given our Coaching staff time to work on aspects of our
   game where we have fallen short in the season so far. We have drawn 6
   of our 12 games, endured 4 losses and secured maximum points from only
   2 games.

   With three tough games before the festive break, the teams objective of
   a top 8 place going into the break is still possible. They will however
   need to dig deep to achieve this and Saturdays game against Kaizer
   Chiefs is the first hurdle.

   Chiefs are 6th on the log with 18 points. In their last three
   encounters in the PSL they have beaten SuperSport and Black Leopards
   while drawing to Chippa United.

   They are not unbeatable and the team are out to prove that when we take
   to the field at 6pm.

   The game will be broadcast live on SuperSport (SS4) should you not be
   at the stadium or you can follow us on our social media channels for
   up-to-date info on the game.

   We would however love to see you at the stadium in your green and gold
   to get behind the team.

   Tickets are on sale from TicketPro outlets only, which include CNA,
   Edgars and Jet. Adults will be R40 and u12’s pay R15.

   We appeal for you not to purchase tickets outside the gate at the risk
   of purchasing counterfeit tickets and being denied access to the game.

   For a full list of outlets can be viewed here
   https://www.ticketpros.co.za/portal/web/index.php/outlets/
   [story-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski boys will be playing a home game on Sunday morning when they
   take on MDC log leaders Cape Town City at Princess Magogo Stadium. Kick
   off is at 10am.

   Coming off two away wins, the side is looking forward to playing in
   front of a home crowd. They will be looking to upset The Citizens who
   have had a solid season so far.

   The Cape side have won seven of their encounters, while drawing one
   game and suffering only one loss. This sees them top of the Diski
   Challenge log with 22 points.

   The youngsters have made some headway in the past weeks. With away wins
   against AmaZulu FC and Bloem Celtic, it seems as if they have managed
   to overcome the issues they were encountering when it came to
   finishing.

   This has seen a climb on the log to 9th position, but the determination
   from the youngsters to improve on that is evident heading into this
   weekends game.

   The team is confident that they can secure a home win and have appealed
   to you, our supporters to come to the stadium and get behind them.

   Entry to the Multichoice Diski games are free, and all you need to do
   is bring your friends and family and come enjoy some entertaining
   football.

   The game will not be televised, as it is not a festival game. You can
   follow us on our social media platforms for play-by-play posts.
   [finalstory-150x150.jpg]

   A brace from Siphamandla Sabelo and a 66th minute goal from substitute
   Sibonelo Ngcongo saw us secure another 3 points away from home in our
   2018/19 Diski campaign.

   A well fought first half saw us scoring late in the the half to go into
   the break with a 1-0 lead.

   Bloem Celtic however, answered early in the second half with Mangweni
   scoring the first of his goals just 5 minutes into the second stanza.

   This opened the game up, with both sides increasing their work rate.
   This paid off with Sabelo scoring his brace in the 60th minute off a
   well placed cross from Siyabonga Dube.

   Coach Vilakazi then made a technical change up front, putting Sibonelo
   Ngcongo on the field. Fresh legs and a different approach paid off as
   he scored just 5 minutes after being on the park.

   A late fight back from Siwelele saw them pull one back with just ten
   minutes left on the clock.

   This made for an exciting last period of play as we defended the three
   points.

   A successful day for us on the field, and positive play heading into
   our next game against log leaders Cape Town City next Sunday at home.
   [storyimage-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski boys are in action this weekend as they face Bloemfontein
   Celtic at the Dr Molemela Stadium on Saturday at 10h00.

   After a successful Derby game against AmaZulu last weekend, where the
   team were triumphant on the field, they will be looking to continue
   their positive play on Saturday. All of the pieces of the game-plan
   seemed to fall in place for the team, and they achieved the win they
   have so narrowly missed in most of their outings so far this season.
   The youngsters have played with determination, but have failed to
   finish off in the last third. Last Saturdays game saw a change in that
   trend, and the team managed a 2-1 win, with Siyabonga Dube and
   Siphamandla Sabelo finding the back of the net.

   It was a team effort that won the game, and should they be able to
   carry this over to the weekend, they should bring another 3 points home
   against bloem.

   Celtic are having a promising season and are presently in the running
   for the top spot on the log.

   Having also played 8 games so far they sit second on the log, just
   three points away from Cape town City who sit at the top. They have 5
   wins, 2 draws and only 1 loss so far in the season.

   Both this and a home advantage will be two hurdles that the Diski team
   will need to overcome to clinch a win away from a side who will be
   wanting to take top spot on the log.

   We will be keeping you up to date with the proceedings of the game as
   they happen, so follow us on Facebook and Twitter for minute by minute
   proceedings.
   [a6633952-ef82-4200-acce-bb92f7ac5da8-150x150.jpg]

   Determination paid off for the Diski boys this morning as they fought
   back for a Derby win after being 1-0 down ten minutes into the game.

   The first half kicked off and had promises of a Derby game from the
   first minute as the teams seemed to shrug off the heat and go toe to
   toe.

   We took the ball up early but faltered slightly, allowing AmaZulu to
   play on the counter and keeping us off guard. This found us scrambling
   at the back to get our defence sorted out, and in the process of
   clearing the ball of the line we played the ball onto Mgwazela’s arm.

   The referee took no time in awarding AmaZulu a penalty and Maduna
   stepped up and fired his shot past Mlungwana to take an early lead.

   We dominated the play however and took the ball into the last third on
   a number of occasions. Khwela found himself one on one with Boshoff
   twice, but the ball stopper for Amazulu used his size well to stop the
   ball from being put past him.

   Our perseverance paid off 20 minutes later as Siyabonga Dube managed to
   control a lose ball in the box, place it well on his strong foot and
   took a shot into the top corner of the goals. Boshoff went of the save
   but could not get a glove on it and we secured the equaliser going into
   the break.

   The second half delivered as much action as the first. Both teams
   pushed into opposition territory and put pressure on the defence. This
   forced errors from both sides and we managed to survive a number of
   free kicks.

   In the 63rd minute AmaZulu were not as lucky and Khoza received a
   second yellow for his transgressions, and his exit off the pitch.

   Amazulu were forced to try and close the gaps and looked like they were
   ready to park the bus.

   We continued our attack on them and Falakhe was unfortunate not to
   score off a free kick on the edge of the box. He cleared the wall but
   the ball hit the crossbar.

   Persistence eventually paid off in the 77th minute as Sabelo found the
   back of the net to secure the lead in the game.

   A well executed team effort on the field today which paid off with a
   well deserved win for the youngsters.

   The team will return to Durban and prepare for another away game o the
   24th as we face Blowmfontein Celtic at Dr.Molemela Stadium.
   [vosloorus-derby-150x150.jpg]

   This weekend we kick off the Diski action in Vosloorus with a Derby
   game against AmaZulu at 10am tomorrow morning.

   With the youngsters not reaping the rewards of their efforts that they
   have been putting in on the field, and finding themselves sitting 12th
   on the log, they will be looking to return home with full points after
   their Derby encounter.

   They have been unfortunate on the pitch and have not found the back of
   the net as often as they would like. This has seen the techincal team
   working with the team on finishing leading up to tomorrows encounter.

   AmaZulu have won four of their Multichoice Diski encounters, drawn two
   and lost just one to give them 14 points in this seasons competition.

   It puts them just two points off the lead behind Cape Town City and
   Bidvest Wits, a position they will be keen to build on.

   The game will be an exciting start to the Festival at Vosloorus Stadium
   for the weekend, and another action packed encounter between the two
   teams.

   The game will be televised on Supersport 4, and we will also be keeping
   you updated with live play by play of the game on Twitter and Facebook
   [cc-baroka-150x150.jpg]

   Probably the most disappointing result of this season. We had a huge
   opportunity to put daylight between ourselves and the bottom 5 teams,
   but we also had an opportunity to cement a top eight place so to say
   we’re disappointed would be an understatement.

   We created enough chances to win this match but lost it eventually
   after conceding two of the softest goals you’re likely to see, one from
   a defender slipping and the other a goalkeeping error. I can’t be too
   hard on the boys because they are trying their best in the absence of
   Nkombelo, Lunga, Zuke, Phiri, Ndwandwe and Buthelezi who are all out
   injured
   [diski-baroka-11nov-150x150.jpg]

   The Diski team were held to a goalless draw this morning by Baroka FC
   at Princess Magogo Stadium. Although we dominated possession, it was
   some solid goalkeeping from Baroka that denied us the points.

   After coming onto the field and looking to set the tempo of the game,
   Baroka were shortly on the back foot as the Diski boys answered their
   attacking play with calculated counter attacks. For periods of play, we
   held the visitors in their last third as we spread the ball and looked
   for opportunities to create spaces to score.

   This game plan served us well and saw us create a healthy number of
   scoring chances. Baroka’s keeper, Molapo, was determined to keep a
   clean sheet though and played out of his boots to achieve his goal.

   He saw goal attempts from Ndelu, Mathenjwa and N.Dube in the first
   half.

   We maintained a good work rate throughout the game and gave the
   visitors little chance to counter, but had to survive two well executed
   offensive plays from the Limpopo outfit. Cebekhulu looked confident and
   calm as he managed to control the ball from their attacking plays and
   only once faltered, but the shot was just off target an found the side
   netting.

   The result is not indicative of the play from the Diski team, however
   they will have to settle for just the one point for their efforts.
   They will prepare this week for their upcoming Derby game against
   Amazulu on the 17th which is to be played at Vosloorus Stadium at
   10h00.
   [b18kjss0891-150x150.jpg]

   A resurgence in play in the last 10 minutes of play was not enough to
   pull back an equaliser against a determined Baroka FC this afternoon.

   After having started the game confidently this afternoon and taking
   advantage of some well executed plays with Conco heading up the attack,
   we forced errors from the visitors and won a free kick.

   Cele took the set piece, played a fantastic ball into the box that
   Lamola managed to get a header on and flick past Chipezeze for the
   lead. This set up a good 30 minutes of attacking play that saw us use
   the ball well, getting behind the defence and putting pressure on their
   goals.

   Chipezeze did well to deny us a number of shots and then set a counter
   play us that saw Dickens equalise just 10 minutes before the half time
   break.

   Baroka took the lead just two minutes after returning from the break as
   Vusi Sibiya rose to meet a free kick and headed it past Gumede.

   We had a number of attempts at goals. Conco had a shot which was well
   defended by Chipezeze. Sibeko then managed to get into position and
   unleash a shot, but came up wide.

   Coach Larsen then substituted both Sibeko and Sibiya, looking to change
   the angle of attack with the introduction of Venter and Mutizwa.

   The dynamics of the game changed a bit, but strong defending and
   unconvincing attacking plays saw us suffer another loss at home.

   We have another lengthy break until December when we return to the
   field to face Kaizer Chiefs at home on the 1st.
   [baroka-story-10-11-2018-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow we take to the field as we face off against Baroka FC in our
   only ABSA Premiership game of the month. We kick off at Princess Magogo
   Stadium at 15h30.

   The side have been in preparation for the game since coming off 2 away
   draws on the road against Free State Stars and SuperSport United. Two
   important league points were accumulated, however a home win would be
   good for the morale of the side as we head towards the season break.

   We last played Baroka in the first round of the Telkom Cup. We lost the
   game 2-0.

   The objective tomorrow will be a home win and a full points for Coach
   Larsen and the team.

   Baroka FC have been running on a high lately, with two wins in the
   Telkom Knockout rounds, however, have not enjoyed the same form in
   their Premiership games.

   They have lost two of their encounters and drawn one coming into
   tomorrows game. They are a fighting team though, and will not give an
   inch on the field as they look to secure a win.

   Sitting at 15th on the log, they will want to claw their way from the
   bottom at any opportunity they have.

   We are sure to be in for a spectacular game, and would like to
   encourage our supporters to be there in numbers. The boys are looking
   forward to playing at home and would be encouraged by a great turn out.

   We will be keeping you informed on the games proceeding over our social
   media platforms should you be unable to attend.
   [baroka-story-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski Boys are back in action this weekend as they kick off their
   7th MDC game against 8th placed Baroka, on Sunday at 10:00 at the
   Princess Magogo stadium.

   The boys have performed well so far on the field this season but have
   struggled to translate that performance into goals and positive
   results.

   The coaches however, have been impressed with the consistent play and
   have been working on the finishing of the youngsters to try and
   encourage them and boost their confidence as the season progresses.

   The team is confident ahead of Sundays home game and are keen to
   impress a home crowd against the Polokwane outfit.

   We would like to encourage our supporters to get to the stadium and get
   behind the youngsters as they take to the field. Entry to the game is
   free.

   Keep up to date on the game with our social media platforms should you
   not be able to be there.
   [coaches-comments-ssu-150x150.jpg]

   Finally our players can get some deserved rest after a grueling 9 days
   where played 3 consecutive away games against Baroka in the cup then
   Free State Stars away and finally Supersport.

   At a time when we have been hard hit by injuries our players have shown
   great resolve and commitment in two extremely difficult games against
   Stars and Supersport. Getting two draws away from home is a credible
   achievement under the current circumstances.

   The players deserve all the credit for putting in such a sterling
   effort. We could have won both games with a bit of luck but are
   nevertheless happy to have got something out of both games.
   [story-ssu-oct2018-150x150.jpg]

   We managed to bring another point home this afternoon as we played to
   an exciting draw to SuperSport United at Mbombela Stadium.

   In what was a game of two halves that, in the last 10 minutes could
   have gone either way, we managed to hold out and secure the draw.

   SuperSport United looked to set an early dominance in the first
   half.They attacked consistently in the first ten minutes of play and
   had us on the back foot defensively. We managed to hold them off and
   successful took the ball up on the counter trying to open their defence
   up.

   We were able to create some chances but non that were enough to rattle
   them.

   The end to end play continued and saw SuperSport open the scoring as
   Keene headed the ball past Sibisi as he defended an open goal.

   With two minutes until the half time break, this was a promising
   position for the home side to be in.

   Returning to the field, United continued their attacking play. Coach
   Larsen made a tactical change at the break, bringing on Sibeko and this
   move saw a change in our attacking play.

   He utilised the ball well and started to put pressure on a strong
   SuperSport defence. This saw spaces opening up, and along with Lamola
   and Conco we continued this avenue of attack.

   We got the rewards in the 68th minute as Sibeko received the ball,
   played up the centre and layed off to Conco coming up on the attack.
   Conco took his chance, made the shot and equalised.

   We created a number of opportunities in much the same way, and had
   shots on target from Sibeko, Lamola and Conco. Williams however
   defended his goal well and we could just not get the winning shot we
   were seeking.

   SuperSport were not letting us take the game and too had some
   threatening plays. Keene was close to scoring a brace twice, and Gumede
   had his work cut out until the last minute of extra time to keep us in
   the points.

   A positive result, even though only a draw, but coming back from a goal
   down saw some fire return to our play.

   We have a two week break now to build on this and prepare for our home
   game against Baroka FC at home on the 10th November.
   [ss-story-150x150.jpg]

   We end of a grueling travelling week with our game against SuperSport
   United being played at Mbombela Stadium tomorrow afternoon at 15h30.

   After a mid week clash that saw us return to Durban with a point
   against Free State Stars, the team has had a busy two days preparing
   for the game.

   It has been ‘all hands on deck’ as the technical team have dealt with
   player recovery and preparation ahead of Sundays game.

   More points away from home will be important in the teams season
   aspirations and a win against the 4th placed Matsatsantsa will go a
   long way in keeping that on track.

   SuperSport should be well rested after a week break since their Telkom
   Knockout game against Polokwane City.

   In their last two league games against Baroka FC and Polokwane City,
   they drew both games and a home win for them could see them climb a
   place on the log.

   The game will be televised on SS4 (204) and we will also do the normal
   updates on our social media channels.
   [story-150x150.jpg]

   A last minute goal from Daylon Claasen saw Bidvest Wits snatch the game
   away from us at Bidvest Stadium today.

   Both teams went head to head throughout the battle and had passages of
   play that promised a goal. Both Mlungwane and Goss, for Wits, had to
   make some decent saves to keep their team in contention.

   We took the game to them with our possession and did well to use the
   ball constructively but we were not able to find the target.

   In the second half, play went from end to end, as both teams fought
   hard to create space.

   In the end it was the last play of the game that saw Wits win the ball,
   play into the box and get a match winning shot on target.

   The team will have a couple of weeks break before playing at home
   against Baroka FC at home on the 11th November.
   [story-wits-150x150.jpg]

   The Diski Boys get back into action tomorrow as they face off against
   Bidvest Wits in their 6th encounter of the season. The game will be
   played at Bidvest Stadium with a 10am kick off.

   The youngsters have not been lucky so far this season and have lost two
   games and drawn two due to their finishing in the last third.

   It has been a major point of concentration in the break since their
   last encounter at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium against Highlands Park.

   The style of play that has seen the team take the title twice is so
   prevalent in the side, but it has just been the final touches that have
   let them down in the last third.

   This sees them sitting 11th on the league table at the moment, three
   positions behind a Bidvest Wits side that is looking confident on the
   field.

   The Clever Boy’s side has won three and drawn two so far this season
   and are taking each game at a time in what is turning out to be one of
   the most closely contended Diski seasons so far.

   At 8th place they are just 3 points off the top of the log and will be
   fighting for a home win and maximum points.

   Last season we met the Joburg outfit in the last game of the season at
   Bidvest Stadium and managed to beat them 2-0. The team will look at
   replicating this performance on the field tomorrow.

   If you are near the stadium come and catch our aspiring Diski players
   in action or follow us on social media for updates on the game.
   [coachescomments-fss-150x150.jpg]

   Anytime a team concedes late from a winning position will always hurt,
   especially away from home. We held our own for the best part of 70
   minutes and weren’t too threatened except for two Moseamedi headers
   that were off target.

   We needed to get a second goal because we knew late on they would go
   the aerial route and cause us problems which they did.Credit to Stars
   they used their height advantage to good effect and after piling on the
   pressure in the last 20 minutes they got the equalizer with their 3
   subs Jantjie, Jappie and Rodgers all having a positive impact.

   What’s even more disappointing is that we could have gone 1 point
   behind Chiefs who are sitting 3rd in the league.
   [news-image-fss-24-oct-150x150.jpg]

   It was a game of two halves as we drew to a determined Free State Stars
   at Goble Park tonight.

   Both of the sides took some time to settle into the game tonight, each
   weighing up their opposition and trying to determine the game plan
   before settling into the game.

   We made a solid attempt in the 6th minute with a turn and shoot from
   Mutizwa but his attempt was wide of the mark.

   This set the pace for the first half and we fought hard to push up and
   seek opportunities to get behind the home defence.

   Our defence was solid, doing well against the aerial balls from Free
   State Stars, with Gumede working hard as the last line of defence.

   We lost Zwane early in the game after a collision with Stembiso
   Dlamini, giving Romario Dlamini his debut game. The youngster
   contributed well in the game both on the offensive and defensive side.

   In the 37th minute we secured the lead off a well placed free kick from
   Cele, that beat the players in the box, bounced and flew into goals,
   past a diving Sangare.

   This saw an increased attack from Free State Stars ahead of the break
   which we managed well, with Gumede tipping an attempt from Moseamedi
   over the bar.

   We had limited attempts in the second half. Mutizwa once again had a
   shot at goals but put it over in the 51st minute, but barring this
   there was nothing that we produced that threatened the hosts.

   The last 20 minutes of the game belonged to Ea Lla Koto. After they
   introduced Rodgers into the game, they increased the aerial attack,
   forcing us back in defence and fighting to keep them out of the last
   third.

   We did well to hold them off as they had wave after wave of play into
   our box, but eventually in the 87th minute their game plan payed off
   with a Rodgers cross finding Moseamedi placed well and he put the ball
   in the back of the net.

   There was not enough time in the half to try and find the win and the
   spoils were eventually shared.

   We travel back to Durban and prepare for our third game away in the
   week as we head off again to play SuperSport United at Mbombela Stadium
   on Sunday.
   [fss-away-150x150.jpg]

   We get the second away game in a row underway with a trip to the Free
   State where we face Free State Stars tomorrow night at Goble Park. Kick
   off will be at 19h30.

   We currently sit a point behind Ea Lla Koto on the log, but with a game
   in hand. An away win would give the team a chance of climbing back into
   contention for a top 8 position.

   The team will be looking to secure as many points as possible on the
   road.

   Free State Stars have had mixed results, much the same as us, and will
   be hoping to continue on a winning streak after thier last 2-0 League
   win against Bloemfontein Celtic.

   The game will be an important one for both sides morale after coming
   off first round exits in the Telkom Knockout Cup.

   The game will be televised live on SuperSport4, and there will be the
   usual coverage from us on all social media channels.
   [coaches-comment-tko-last16-150x150.jpg]

   We used this opportunity to give game time to our players who have not
   played much this season. We gave ourselves a mountain to climb after
   conceding in the first minute of the game.

   Taking into account that we fielded most of our players who have not
   got much game time this season, we grew into the game but lacked any
   cutting edge in the final 3rd.

   We got a lot of information from this exercise as some players showed
   they are closer to selection while others still have some way to go. We
   now look forward to being competitive in the league.
   [abc5740457d40f6fa480b7d030c1d6b1-150x150.jpg]

   We suffered another first round exit in the Telkom Knockout tonight
   against Baroka FC at Old Peter Mokaba Stadium.

   In a disruptive weekend that saw the kick off time of the game being
   changed after only arriving in Polokwane in the early hours of the
   morning after a delay in travel, the weekend just did not improve for
   us as we went a goal down in the first minute against Bakgaga.

   From the kick off, they played to the right and then put a well placed
   cross in for Makagaka. He made no mistake and put the home side in the
   lead.

   We took some time to get back into the game but dominated play in the
   last 25 minutes of the first half as we fought to break the defence and
   find an equaliser going into the break.

   This did not pay off for us and we needed to come back in the second
   stanza, and ensure that we scored first in the half in hope of having a
   chance of coming back into the game.

   Once again we had a spike in our play as Sabelo, Jooste and Magubane
   entered the game, but their impact was not enough to find the back of
   the net.

   Baroka managed to seal the game in the 80th minute with a well placed
   header from Sodi, ensuring our exit from the 2018 competition.

   We had a number of appeals for fouls in the box, but referee Ndaba did
   not agree with our appeals, and waved the game on.

   An unfortunate result for the team tonight.

   Our focus will change again to our League commitments as we head into a
   busy week with 2 away games over the next 7 days. the first against
   Free State Stars on Wednesday night and then SuperSport United next
   Sunday.
   [last16-150x150.jpg]

   We take a break from the league this weekend as we take part in our
   first round of the Telkom Knockout Cup fixture tomorrow against Baroka
   FC at the Old Peter Mokaba Stadium, kick off at 15h30.

   We have an opportunity to chase some silverware for the season, and our
   first round draw against Baroka FC is a positive first step in
   advancing in the competition.

   Baroka are not an easy club to play and do not give away games. They
   also fight for their place when it comes to the Cup competitions and
   Tomorrow’s encounter will be an exciting game to watch.

   Coach Larsen is positive about the fixture and believes its an
   opportunity for the team to perform and reap the reward for their
   efforts.

   “Every small team is always looking forward to cup competitions. We are
   also a small team. We will try and have a good run and see if we can
   have the silverware.” Coach Larsen told IOL news.

   The game will be televised on SABC 1, and for those of you not able to
   watch, you can follow us on either Facebook or Twitter as we provide
   you with an up to the minute feed.
   [juniors-oct-2018-150x150.jpg]

   The under17 side have had a busy season this year. They have played 25
   games to date in their League and currently sit 4th on the log.

   The season has seen some promising players come out of their shell in
   the side. We have had some stellar performances from the team with a
   total of 61 goals being scored in the season. Contributing to this has
   been Kyle Tyssen, Mnqobi Luthuli, Jazmin Stapelfeldt and Nkonzenhle
   Hlongwa who have all contributed over 10 goals each.

   It has been a solid team effort that has enabled this, and in the
   process seen the team achieve an admiral work rate. They have won 14 of
   their encounters, drawn 7 and lost just 4 to see them accumulate 49
   points in the league.

   This is at present 10 points short of the top of the log, but only 3
   from securing at least a third spot in the seasons league.

   We would like to congratulate the coach and team on their results so
   far as well as thank the parents who support these young players week
   in and week out from the side of the field.
                  P  W  D L  GF GA GD  Pts
   Amazulu        24 17 4 3  89 38 51  55
   KZN Academy    25 18 5 2  67 13 24  59
   Golden Arrows  25 14 7 4  61 24 37  49
   Bissa FA       26 16 4 6  58 33 25  52
   Fistoz 11      25 13 4 8  54 30 24  43
   Durban FC      25 13 4 8  58 30 28  43
   Shooting Stars 22 9  8 5  31 23 8   35
   Barcelona FC   22 8  3 11 38 44 -6  27
   Q Stars Utd    24 7  7 10 32 49 -17 28
   PSG Academy    26 4  2 20 19 55 -36 14
   Manor Barca FC 25 7  3 15 34 80 -46 24
   Newlands FC    25 5  3 17 19 57 -38 18
   Supreme Utd FC 24 7  3 14 32 68 -36 24
   11 Men FC      26 4  3 19 30 78 -48 15
   [arrows-highlands-diski-150x150.jpg]

   A goalless draw was the result of our efforts at Sugar Ray Stadium this
   morning against Highlands Park.

   Both teams answered each other play for play in the 90 minutes of game
   time. Each creating opportunities to score but failing to capitalise on
   the opportunities.

   The team looked good on attack and took the game to their opponents
   from every angle, but at times seemed indecisive at the finish,
   ultimately costing them the game.

   Defensively we were strong. We handled the high ball better than usual
   and managed to turn this attack into counter plays.

   Only in the last 15 minutes did we seem more confident with our shots
   at target. Sabelo had a beautiful left footed shot which had the
   Highlands keeper diving up and to his left to make the save. Ndaba and
   Khwela too had some great passages of pressure with convincing shots.
   But it was all too late an effort.

   The team have a 2 week break before their next match against Bidvest
   Wits at the Bidvest Stadium and will need to come up with a solid game
   plan in order to secure some needed points in the competition.
   [diski-sugar-ray-news-150x150.jpg]

   This weekend sees the Diski action come to Cleremont as Sugar Ray Xulu
   Stadium hosts a Diski Festival on Saturday and Sunday.

   The team take to the pitch in Sundays mornings first game at 10am, as
   we take on Highlands Park.

   The Diski side have not had a successful start to the season as they
   would have liked. After 4 games, they have won just one encounter,
   drawn one and lost two. This sees them sitting 11th on the Diski log at
   present.

   They have been unlucky not to score more, as their game has been a
   consistant and disciplined one since the start of the season. It has
   been finishing that has let the side down, and they have been working
   on their finishing in the last 3rd to try and change this.

   Highlands Park could be the hungrier of the sides as they sit at the
   bottom of the log, just one place above Maritzburg United. They have
   yet to secure a win in the season and have only a point off a draw so
   far.

   Tickets are available from the Stadium this afternoon. So please make
   sure you get yours and come and enjoy the day with us and the
   Multichoice Diski competition.

   All games in the festival will be shown live on SuperSport 4 (204) if
   you are elsewhere in the country and would like to catch the action.
   [tko2018-150x150.jpg]

   The Telkom Knockout Cup 2018 last 16 draw took place at the SuperSport
   studios this evening.

   The draw saw each of the clubs represented by their relevent coaches as
   Lux September once again headed up proceedings.

   We had to wait until the end to learn our fate as the fixtures were
   drawn one by one.

   We drew an away game against Baroka FC for our first fixture in this
   seasons installment of the competition.

   The remainder of the draw is as follows, with the first team being the
   home team:

   AmaZulu FC vs Cape Town City
   Mamelodi Sundowns vs Bloemfontein celtic
   Polokwane City vs SuperSport United
   Freestate Stars v Bidvest Wits
   Orlando Pirates v Chippa United
   Kaizer Chiefs v Black Leopards
   Maritzburg Utd v Highlands Park

   Fixture times will be confirmed as soon as they are released but games
   should get underway on the 21st October.
   [b18hrrw0041-150x150.jpg]

   Finally we get a win after a dominant home performance. Still not
   converting at a good ratio but again solid defensively,3rd straight
   clean sheet and a very attacking display.

   We pleased for the players that all their hard work has finally paid
   dividends .A strong attitude and well executed tactical approach was
   evident in today’s performance.

   Happy that finally our supporters have something to smile about.
   [34b81993d1c45590e56d0a500dc33f5c-150x150.jpg]

   A 63rd minute goal from Knox Mutizwa saw us secure full points against
   Black Leopards this afternoon at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   We started the game strong an forced Black Leopards to defend from the
   first minute as we pushed into their half, looking to create space and
   scoring opportunities.

   Danny Venter, Siboniso Conco and Knox Mutizwa all had shots at goals,
   but were just not able to convert the opportunities. Ndlovu did well
   between the sticks for the visitors and had more to contend with than
   Gumede on the opposite side of the field.

   We were forced to make an early change just before the break, as Venter
   left the field after twisting his knee. He was replaced by Sibiya.

   It was a seamless change as our offensive game plan continued just
   minutes after as Lamola had a shot on target.

   The second half saw an impressive work rate from the team. Conco once
   again did well to play the ball into favourable positions.

   His work rate and skill got us into the box, he played a great cut back
   to Mutizwa who made no mistake to find the back of the net.

   We had a number of other shots at goals, to no avail, and had to deal
   with a last ditch attempt by Leopards to break our defence as we fought
   to retain the win.

   A well deserved Man of the Match award for Conco, and a deserved win
   for the team this afternoon.

   We have a break now until the 24th of October when we travel to take on
   Free State Stars at Goble Park, 19h30 kick off.
   [do5q1wyw4aasuas-e1538906481721-150x150.jpg]

   We were unlucky not to open the scoring in the 13th minute as we
   capitalised on a turn over ball. N.Dube was fed a long ball on the
   counter. Mpandle came out of the box in defence, failed to connect an
   clear the ball, this allowed Dube to run around him an have a shot on
   at goals.

   Farmer was back in defence quickly for the home side however and made a
   telling clear off the line to deny us a goal.

   Both sides did well to get into the last third for the remainder of the
   half. Neither managed to capitalise on their chances though, with The
   Team of Choice only seriously testing Mlungwana once, as he dived to
   make a save to his left.

   Returning to the field, the sides once again took some time to settle
   but once they were in the zone it was a battle from both sides.

   We created a number of opportunities to score. Mpandle kept Maritzburg
   in the game though with some solid keeping. If it was not for him, we
   could have been 4 goals up at the end of the game.

   Maritzburg United are always a tough contender, and todays game was no
   different. They used their ball well and put us under pressure a number
   of times.

   Our defence was solid and Mlungwana did a great job to keep their shots
   on target out of goals.

   Although a win would have been preferred, it was a solid performance
   from the boys who prepare for their next game against Highland Park at
   the Diski Festival at Sugar Ray Xulu stadium next weekend.
   [blackleopards-e1538763876907-150x150.jpg]

   We are hoping to capitalize on home advantage tomorrow as we face Black
   Leopards at 15h30 in Kwa-Mashu.

   After a positive performance on Wednesday night against Orlando
   Pirates, Coach Larsen and his man are looking to execute a floor-less
   game plan at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   The team has shown determination in the outings so far this season, but
   have not reaped the full reward for their efforts.

   Tomorrows game should be a turn around in fortune for the side as they
   take on Lidoda Duvha, however they should not be treated as underdogs.

   After returning to the top flight of football, they have fought hard to
   secure 8 points in 7 games so far.

   They have beaten Baroka and Polokwane City , while drawing with
   Highlands Park and Chippa United to add to their point tally.

   Their losses have been to SuperSport United, Bloem Celtic and Orlando
   Pirates.

   The Limpopo outfit play with guts and determination and will be looking
   to upset us at home come game time.

   The game will be televised live on SuperSport10 (210), but we would
   encourage you to come to the stadium to get behind the side.

   Tickets will be R40 for Adults and R15 for u12’s at the gates.

   As always, follow us on our social media platforms should you not be
   able to get to the stadium and enjoy our play-by-play commentary on the
   game.
   [diskipmb-e1538710688534-150x150.jpg]

   We have Diski action this weekend as we take on Maritzburg United on
   Sunday morning in a Derby game at Harry Gwala Stadium. Kick off at
   10am.

   The side has not had the strongest start to the season, securing just
   one win after three games. With a number of young new players in the
   side, this is not the worst scenario to be in, however, it is important
   for us to add points to our tally.

   The team of Choice could very possibly be hard to beat. They have
   nothing to lose and all to win as they have not yet secured any points
   in the competition so far this season.

   They have played three games and lost all, and only scored one goal in
   the process.

   This should make them hungry for the win come game time.

   If you are in the province capital, get to the stadium and get behind
   our Diski boys as they continue their 2018 campaign.
   The game is not televised, but we will be keeping you up to date with
   play by play of the game on our social media twitter and Facebook
   [cc-opirates-04-oct-e1538648161571-150x150.jpg]

   Another clean sheet,another good performance and still can’t get that
   elusive win.

   We had a huge opportunity to get all three points had we again taken
   one of the chances we created. Our team organization was on point as
   the players executed our game plan with high focus and concentration.

   Pirates failed to test Gumede at any point of the match and that says a
   lot about the teams structure and tactical organization.

   Our players deserve all the credit for once more fighting
   wholeheartedly for the badge.
   [orlando-pirates-03-oct-2018-150x150.jpg]

   We have played to a goalless draw with Orlando Pirates tonight at
   Orlando Stadium.

   We created a number of opportunities in the first half with Phiri
   narrowly missing a chance in the 13th minute and then Conco and Sibeko
   managed to get shots away.

   A minute before half time, Sibiya lined up a free kick on the edge of
   the box, but fired it straight to Mpontshane.

   The Buccaneers enjoyed possession in the first 45 but failed to find
   penetrative passes as our defensive players managed to close down the
   majority of their plays.

   Orlando Pirates came out firing in the first couple of minutes in the
   second half. They put pressure on our defence and kept us on the back
   foot, having to defend on both sides of the park as Lorch and Pule
   attacking the goals.

   We used our counter attack well and had an opportunity when Sibeko had
   a header from a flick on. Again Mpontshane made the save and kept the
   game goalless.

   Lamola was introduced off the bench to attempt to change the game for
   us. It had limited affect for us as we failed to use the change of pace
   to our advantage.

   A solid performance from our defence tonight, and good execution of
   Coach Larsen’s game plan. But we just failed to convert the chances
   again to secure full points from the encounter.

   We return to Durban and will prepare for our weekend game at home
   against Black Leopards on Sunday at 15h30.
   [orlandopiratesaway-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow night we return to the field as we take on Orlando Pirates at
   Orlando Stadium. The mid-week encounter will kick off at 19h30.

   Coming off a draw in our last game against Chippa United, the team is
   needing to find some additional points in the 2018/19 campaign.

   This is not an impossible mission against the Buccaneers, who have had
   mixed results so far this season, although sitting top of the log. With
   draws against Highlands Park and Cape Town City as well as losses to
   Bloem Celtic and Bidvest Wits, they have proven they can be vulnerable
   on game days.

   We have struggled to find form so far. Although we have had some
   promising games, it has just not been a great start to the season.

   That being said, we have the ability to bounce back and the opportunity
   to do this against the log leading team

   We would encourage our Gauteng supporters to get to Soweto and support
   the team. Your presence at the stadium would be greatly appreciated.

   The game will be televised on SuperSport 4 (Channel 204) and we will be
   keeping you close to the game with our play-by-play feed on our social
   media platforms.
   [coaches-comments-chippa-150x150.jpg]

   Two points dropped at home feels like a loss. Again we dominated but
   failed to break the deadlock.

   Credit to the players for the enthusiasm and energy with which they
   approached this game. Being the 3rd game in 7days we still ran
   tirelessly until the final whistle. Credit too must go to our fitness
   trainer Pedro Picarro for a great job in not only conditioning the team
   the way he has but also for getting us to recover in time to compete
   again.

   As the head coach I take full responsibility for the poor results we’ve
   had of late.
   [divine-lunga-180922-dribbles-g-1050-150x150.jpg]

   It was another tough battle for us today in the rain soaked Princess
   Magogo Stadium where we played to a goalless draw against Chippa
   United.

   We came out at the start of the game showing good intention, and
   narrowly missed an opportunity to open the scoring when Lamola had a
   shot which narrowly passed across the face of the goals.

   The team did well to execute well planned moves, often getting into the
   last third but then facing the defence of the visitors who fell back
   quickly and closed down any clear shots on goal.

   It was then a missed shot on target from Venter that kept us out of the
   scoring in the 22nd minute. Shortly after we allowed Lentjies to have
   Chippa’s first real chance at target, which he proceeded to put over
   the bar.

   Chippa then had a flourish of play before the break, where they pushed
   into the half from different angles and created an opportunity for
   Mbenyane which had Gumede diving to make the save.

   This style of play continued for both sides in the second half.

   We created a number of chances and play livened up with the
   introduction of Sibiya, Jooste and Zuke, but nothing we threw at the
   visitors was enough to catch them off guard.

   A valuable point earned before the almost two week break, after which
   we return to the field with a midweek game against Orlando Pirates in
   Soweto.
   [finimage-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski side have lost another away game today against a 10 man
   Polokwane City at Old Peter Mokaba Stadium.

   The first half of the game saw the feisty home side reduced to 10 men a
   number of minutes after they failed to take the lead off a penalty.

   This did not dampen their determination to secure a win, and they
   fought valiantly to ensure that we did not get the opportunity to take
   the lead.

   Their keeper, Meschak Radebe, stood as a pillar between the sticks and
   denied us shot after shot to keep his side alive.

   We dominated possession, but Polokwane played quick and precise counter
   moves that put us on the back foot as they tried to force the errors.

   In the second half, they managed to pull off a well executed counter,
   get in behind the defence and create an opportunity.

   Mlungwana made no mistake in the 83rd minute, securing the home win for
   Polokwane City.

   We return home and have 2 weeks to prepare for our Diski Derby match
   against Maritzburg United at Harry Gwala Stadium on October 7th.
   [diskipolokwane-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski Boys have another opportunity to get some points on the board
   as they travel to Polokwane to take on Polokwane City in the Diski
   Challenge tomorrow at 10am, at the Old Peter Mokaba stadium.

   Coming off a successful game against Orlando Pirates last weekend, the
   side will be looking to bring home another 3 points and increasing
   their goal difference after tomorrows game.

   It will be a tough game against a side who have remained unbeaten so
   far in their campaign, securing a win and a draw so far, to accumulate
   4 points.

   The side are confident of a positive result after their 90 minutes
   tomorrow, and another win away will go a long way in defending the
   title.

   The game will not be televised so Follow us on Facebook and twitter for
   updates and results tomorrow morning.
   [chippahome-150x150.jpg]

   We end off a busy last 7 days tomorrow with a home game against Chippa
   United.The game will get underway at 3pm at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   After 2 defeats in our last two encounters against Highlands Park and
   Mamelodi Sundowns, Coach Larsen will be looking at his chosen 11 to
   secure some much needed points in this last game of the month of
   September

   In his post match message, the Coach said ‘credit must go to the
   players for their performance although again the result was a negative
   one. A performance like this against Chippa on Saturday and I’m sure we
   will get the result we all want.’

   This is a clear indication of his confidence in the players to deliver
   on what he knows they are capable of as a unit.

   Chippa are currently sitting on 4 points after 5 games.In their last 3
   encounters they have won one, lost one and drawn one. They will be
   hoping to collect some points away from home and as we know, are
   capable of creating upsets.

   On the day, they can be a tough opponent to beat.

   We would like to call on our supporters to get behind the side at home.
   Numbers in the stands would be an encouragement to the club as a whole.
   Tickets are R40 adults and R10 kids U12. You can buy your tickets at
   the stadium on match day

   We will be covering the game once again on Twitter and Facebook should
   you be unable to get to the game.
   [sundowns-coaches-comment-150x150.jpg]

   There was never a better time to get one over Sundowns than this match.

   For the first time we dominated them for long periods but failed to
   turn that dominance into goals and as is usually the case we conceded
   against the run of play.

   But credit must go to the players for their performance although again
   the result was a negative one. A performance like this against Chippa
   on Saturday and I’m sure we will get the result we all want.
   [sundowns-clinch-win-150x150.jpg]

   Sundowns got the upper hand on us tonight as they return home with 3
   points from the nights encounter.

   The team looked like they had renewed enthusiasm as they started the
   game tonight. They showed determination until the last minute of the
   game as they fought in the end to secure at least a draw.

   The first half saw Coach Larsen’s charges taking on Sundowns, with
   Lamola missing out on an opportunity to grab the lead off a poorly
   played ball back to Pieterse. Lamola lost his balance and was not able
   to get his foot to the ball.

   With the visitors trying to establish rhythm, Mngwengwe’s men were able
   to remain quick and dangerous on the counter.

   Still, we allowed Masandawana chances and they used their possession
   advantage to have shots at goal. Silva was allowed some space in the
   30th minute, but found the side netting.

   The pressure paid off for them in the 43rd minute as Maboe, with a run
   against play, took a low shot, beating Gumede and giving the visitors
   the lead just minutes before the break.

   The second half saw us defending more than we would have liked. Mzava
   and Mngwengwe had work to do at the back and were assisted well by
   Sibisi and Lunga.

   We did have a number of strong plays into the last third. We were
   caught off side a number of times as we pushed the attacking line, and
   on other occasions failed once again to finish off on any chances we
   created.

   The introduction of Zuke seemed to add some punch to the play, but this
   was not enough to give us the upper hand on the park.

   We will finish off a demanding 7 days with our third game on Saturday,
   at home, against Chippa United. Kick off will be at 3pm, and we appeal
   to all of our supporters to come and get behind the side again as we
   fight to break this unrewarding period of play.
   [masandawanahome-150x150.jpg]

   It’s action stations at home tomorrow night as we host Mamelodi
   Sundowns at Princess Magogo Stadium in our mid-week ABSA Premiership
   match. Kick-off at 19h30.

   Coming off a disappointing away game to Highlands Park, Coach Larsen
   will be wanting the team to bounce back in front of a home crowd
   against Masandawana.

   The determination and fight in the side is one that can see them secure
   3points at home against the travelling team. With senior players
   stepping up and leading the youngsters, it’s a combination that could
   see us producing positive play over 90 minutes.

   Three points at home would do us the world of good at the moment, and
   that is the major objective tomorrow nights encounter.

   Sundowns will be hunting to accumulate more points away from home after
   playing to a 3-all draw with AmaZulu FC on Sunday afternoon.

   With a game in hand at the moment, the Brazillians are sitting just a
   point out of the top 8 at present. Any points gained will see them
   climb in contention for top spot on the table again.

   The game will be televised on SuperSport 11 (Channel 211), but we
   encourage you to get to the stadium to catch the game live.

   Tickets are available from TicketPro outlets (Spar, Jet, CNA, Edgars
   Active, Postnet) at R40 for adults and R15 for kids u12.
   [b251c593-31bc-4974-b19c-e4921be9a5c8-150x150.jpg]

   Based on our overall performance I don’t think we deserved anything
   from this game. For the first time this season I can say we did not
   fight like we usually do.

   That was disappointing because that’s the foundation upon which we
   build our performances. We need to play with more belief and with more
   composure and maturity.

   Highly disappointing result against a team that only really threatened
   on set plays and crosses. Credit to Highlands for being strong in those
   two areas of their play..
   [highlandsnews-150x150.jpg]

   A brace from Mvala helped to see Highlands Park to a home win this
   afternoon at Makhulong Stadium.

   With the pressure being put onto us from the first whistle, we
   struggled to find any rhythm in our game.

   We were tried defensively throughout the first half and were not able
   to use our possession constructively. This caused us frustration on the
   field, which resulted in us conceding a penalty in the 20th minute.
   Mvala stepped up to the mark and made no mistake in finding the back of
   the net.

   Twelve minutes later, we managed to equalise off a free kick. Danny
   Venter did well to beat the wall and score the first half equaliser.

   We barely had time to regroup as Mvala scored his brace just nine
   minutes before the half time break.

   Coming back from the break, the team seemed to consolidate slightly.

   We looked more confident on attack and managed to get behind the
   defence and create chances. We could just not finish the way we would
   have liked to though.

   Coach Larsen introduced both Lamola and Moreira into play. This helped
   in creating chances and staying in the opponent’s last third, however
   nothing we threw at them managed to get past Kapini.

   A tough loss this afternoon but the team need to regroup and prepare as
   we look toward our game against Sundowns on Wednesday night at Princess
   Magogo stadium
   [9533970f-25c7-453a-b33f-417ca62a5dfa-150x150.jpg]

   Another thrilling installment of the Multichoice Diski Challenge took
   place today as we faced Orlando Pirates at Orlando Stadium.

   The teams took to the field and went head to head in a battle that
   could have lead to either team opening the scoring in the first ten
   minutes. Poor finishing from both sides denied them this advantage.

   We played a well executed game plan, and managed to get behind the
   opponents defence, but had a number of shots that just lacked the right
   touch to convert into a goal.

   Our attacking game pus the lead for the rest of the half.

   Returning to the field, it did not take long for us to go on the attack
   again. Pirates were ready for this and countered our plays well.
   Looking to get into the gaps and take advantage. This allowed them to
   play into our last third a number of times.

   Tshanini made a hard tackle on one movement, and being in the box, was
   penalised for the infringement. Mabaso placed the ball and converted it
   for the home side to equalise.

   We managed to see off a number of attacks on goal by Pirates after
   that. They had us on the back foot for a decent amount of time, but
   perseverance eventually paid off in the last 10 minutes as we countered
   well and found the winning goal off the boot of Dube.

   A positive day for the side as they return home to prepare for next
   weeks game against Polokwane City.
   [99a01f41-661a-4f1d-8fdb-56880c4075f9-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski boys take on Orlando Pirates in the seasons second game on
   Sunday at 12h00.

   After an unfortunate loss last Sunday to Kaizer Chiefs, the team are
   looking to get onto the points board as they face Orlando Pirates in
   Soweto.

   It is still early in the season, but the Multichoice Diski season is
   only 15 games long, so every point that can be accumulated is
   important.

   With the team looking to successfully defend their MDC Title for the
   season, they will have to dig deep down and work at returning home with
   a full 3 points on Sunday.

   Pirates never had a great start to their season either, and will also
   be keen to get points behind them on Sunday.

   Fans should be in store for another great entertaining game and are
   encouraged to get to the Orlando Stadium to catch all of the action on
   the day.

   Follow us on our Facebook and Twitter for all of the game action before
   we move across to Makhulong Stadium for the first team game against
   Highlands North at 15h00.
   [65aad7dd-9b6e-4b46-8acb-8da4330c8720-150x150.jpg]

   We return to ABSA Premiership action on Sunday with a game against
   Highlands Park at Makhulong Stadium, kick off at 15h00.

   Our fifth ABSA action sees us taking on 11th placed Highlands Park in a
   game in which we need to come home with full points.

   After having a great win against Maritzburg United in our opening game
   we have only managed to secure 2 points from our last three games. This
   has been from draws with Cape Toen City and Polokwane City.

   The coaching staff and players have been concentrating on finishing off
   our chances in the last third over the past 2 weeks of training.
   Converting chances into goals has been an important strategy at
   practice, and this now needs to be pulled into our game and put that
   practice into action.

   Highlands park have had a fighting start to their campaign. In saying
   that they have yet to lose a game in the season, having played a draw
   againt Pirates, Black Leopards, Sundowns and Baroka FC.

   This team is one that shows up to the fight, and Sunday will be no
   different for them as they look to secure their first home win on
   Sunday.

   The game will not be televised, however, we will be keeping you close
   to the action as we give you play-by-play news on our social media
   platforms.
   [arrowsvschiefsresult-150x150.jpg]

   The Multichoice Diski Challenge got underway for us today as we took on
   Kaizer Chiefs at Hammersdale Stadium.

   With a game that saw both sides creating chances early on in the first
   half, but failing to capitalise on them, it ended in a game filled with
   drama as we finished off the last 10 minutes a man short.

   The playing conditions were not optimal at the stadium today. The long
   grass on the field meant that the ball did not carry well and slowed
   down a lot off the boot.

   We created a number of chances to score, but our decision making in the
   last third and finishing was poor this afternoon.

   Taking all of this into consideration, the turning point of the game
   was when Conco failed to convert a penalty awarded after Khwela was
   taken down just inside the box.

   He placed the ball and took his shot. Mbuva made the save, but he
   looked off his line and at this stage the frustration of the players
   started to boil.

   Shortly after this, The Glamour Boys managed to play a quick counter
   move, get positioned well and Lekoatsa took a shot that found the back
   of the net.

   The frustration got the better of Kaleb Parusnath who was booked for
   dissent after voicing his opinion after a Chiefs player went down as a
   time wasting tactic.

   This compounded our fight and made it more difficult to get back into
   the last third while needing to close gaps in the field.

   We were not able to find an equaliser and after 5 minutes of additional
   play, succumbed to a 1-0 defeat to Amakhosi.

   There were however a number of positives to take from the game. There
   were stellar performances from some players who made their debut today
   Samkelo Mgwazela, Thandokwakhe Hlabisa, N.Dube did well on the ball,
   looking to create scoring chances, Siphamandla Nzuza had a solid
   defensive game, Tshanini also did well to read play well and move the
   ball.

   It will be back to the drawing board for Coaches as they prepare for
   the match against Orlando Pirates on the 16th of September.

   We would like to thank all supporters who attended the Festival today.
   It was encouraging to see the numbers in the stadium, and we are sure
   that in the seasons to come, Hammersdale Stadium will be visited once
   again.
   [diskichiefs-150x150.jpg]

   The 2018/19 MultiChoice Diski Challenge season gets underway with an
   opening festival at Hammersdale Stadium on Sunday 09 September.

   We get the opportunity to kick off our defence of the title as we host
   Kaizer Chiefs, with the game kicking off at 15h00.

   Chiefs finished their last Diski season off at 5th place after having
   played 15 games in the season.

   We will be looking to get a solid start and positive momentum on the
   season. We started our previous season against the same opponent, with
   the game being played at Sugar Ray Stadium and walked off the field 3-2
   winners after a hard played game.

   The Coaches and team will be looking to secure the same result in our
   opening game on Sunday.

   Six clubs will battle it out on the day, with all KZN clubs taking part
   on the day.

   Maritzburg United will play Mamelodi Sundowns at 10h00, AmaZulu FC will
   take on Orlando Pirates at 12h30, with our game finishing off the days
   proceedings at 15:00.

   All games will be live on Supersport 4, and we will also be giving you
   live play by play of our game on our social media

   We would like to encourage you to get to the stadium and enjoy the day
   of football, and getting behind the team as we kick the season off.
   [u17logstory-150x150.jpg]

   Once again the u17 season is turning out to be a close and competitive
   one between the teams involved.

   With the season into full swing, its clear that there is a battle for
   the top position between Amazulu, KZN Academy and Lamontville Golden
   Arrows.

   We have played 17 games so far, and secured full points for 10 of the
   games. We have drawn 6 games and lost only 1 to accumulate 36 points so
   far in the season.

   This sees us sitting only 4 points behind the current log leaders,
   Amazulu who have 40 points after 19 games.

   KZN Academy are also in close contention with 39 points after winning
   12 of their matches.

   KZN Academy and Ourselves have played 2 less games then log leader
   amazulu who have played a total of 19 games, while KZN academy and
   Ourselves have played 17.

   The team has done well week in and week out with our games. Solid
   performances by the team as a whole has seen us get into scoring
   positions on the field and allowed Kyle Thyssen and Rowen Mathabeli to
   get into double figures with their number of goals.

   Jazmin Stapelfeldt and Nkonzenhle Hlongwa are close behind with 8 goals
   each.

   With 9 games left in the season, the coaches are working hard with the
   players to keep focus and maintain their objectives of winning the
   league.

   We look forward to seeing how the team carries itself in the remainder
   of the season and we are positive that we will deliver the results
   expected.
   [polokwanecoachescolumn-150x150.jpg]

   We definitely look at this game as two points dropped instead of a
   point gained. After a positive start,a missed penalty and numerous
   squandered chances we broke the deadlock when Mngwengwe headed home
   from a Venter corner kick.

   We allowed our visitors to come back into the match after dominating
   the opening 30 minutes and they equalized just before the break.

   The second half was just the same as we squandered chance after chance
   although credit must also go to Chigova for keeping his team in the
   game with some telling saves.
   [vspolokwanefinal-150x150.jpg]

   An early goal from skipper Nkanyiso Mngwengwe was not enough against a
   determined Polokwane City tonight, as we finished with a draw at full
   time.

   We missed an opportunity to open the scoring in the 6th minute after
   Conco was bought down just inside the box, and were awarded a penalty.
   Limbikani Mzava took the kick, but Polokwane City’s keeper, George
   Chigova did well to dive low to his right and make a telling save.

   A well placed corner kick in the following play saw Mngwengwe go up,
   connect the ball well and find the back of the net off a well executed
   cross.

   This set the pace of the first half, with Polokwane City fighting hard
   for an equaliser. We answered them play for play, getting into the last
   third, but being closed down by some good defending from the visitors.
   We had so many opportunities to add to the score board but yet again
   failed to convert our chances into goals, we had two opportunities that
   hit the cross bar.

   The determination from Rise and Shine paid off though. In the 41st
   minute, a play up the far side of the field saw Rodney Ramagalela take
   a shot from outside the box. Gumede who had come off his line a bit in
   defence, tried to block the ball and managed to get a leg in the way,
   but the deflection was not enough to change the overall direction of
   the ball and the equaliser was scored.

   Coming back onto the field in the second half, A change in tactic from
   Clinton Larsen saw the introduction of Wayde Jooste and Danny Phiri
   onto the field. Jooste’s introduction had a slight impact on the pace
   of the game and saw some promising plays between himself, Lamola and
   Mutizwa.

   Ultimately the opportunities created never turned into anything.
   Opportunities were to be had by Mutizwa, substitute Moreira as well as
   Jooste but a determined Chigova denied us at every turn.

   Polokwane City also had a number of chances in the second half, but it
   was not to be for either of the teams on the field tonight and in the
   end the points were once again shared.

   We will go back to the drawing board and prepare for an away game on
   September 16th against Highlands Park at Makhulong Stadium.
   [polokwaneupcoming-150x150.jpg]

   Wednesday night see us back in action at home against Polokwane City in
   a 19h30 kick off at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   The team have secured 4 points so far this season, with a win, a loss
   and a draw. Looking to collect our first 3 points at home of the
   season, the team has been preparing over the last 10 days under the
   watchful eye of coach Clinton Larsen.

   After a well earned point away in the last game against Cape Town City,
   the coach was happy with the performance of the players, but identified
   the need for the players to be more decisive in the attacking third.

   This would have been one of the points to work on in the training
   sessions over the last 10 days.

   Polokwane City have had a shaky start to their season. With a loss
   against Black Leopards and Mamelodi Sundowns, but they found form in
   their last encounter as they beat Baroka FC 2-0 at home.

   Rise and Shine can be a formidable team away from home, and will be
   wanting to increase their point tally as they travel to Durban this
   week.

   We would like to encourage all of our supporters to come to Princess
   Magogo Stadium in support of the team on Wednesday.

   The game will not be live on television, so If you’re around the
   country, follow us on Twitter or Facebook to catch our live play by
   play feed on the game.
   [coachescommentsctc-e1534672411723-150x150.jpg]

   Games in Cape Town are never easy and this was no different. Credit
   must go to the opposition as I believe they are a quality unit whom I
   believe will do very well this season.

   But we traveled knowing we can get something out of this game and even
   had chances to win it in the end. Again we defended well as a team but
   lacked in decisive quality in the attacking third.

   A clean sheet and a point away from home is not the worst result as we
   now look forward to hosting Polokwane at home.

   Very proud of the efforts our players gave as they continue to fight
   for the badge.
   [b18hrrw0159-150x150.jpg]

   A well fought encounter tonight saw us share the spoils with the
   Citizens at the Cape Town Stadium as we played to a nil-nil draw.

   Playing with less possession tonight, we put up a good fight against
   Cape Town City. The rivalry saw a full 90 minutes of head to head
   action, in a game that did not seem to slow in pace.

   The first half saw some promising end-to-end play from both sides.

   Although they managed to have more opportunities, we created some
   promising chances on goal. We were denied a goal in the 36th minute as
   Conco took a shot. On target, the City keeper managed to get a hand on
   it, and then unluckily it hit the cross bar.

   Both sides came out with determination in the second half. Again, a
   healthy encounter ensued that, neither of the sides managed to take
   advantage of opportunities created.

   Coach Larsen tried to change things up after the break by bringing in
   Phiri and strengthening the mid field, looking at securing more ball
   and then later bringing Jooste off the bench.

   This paid off on a number of moves, which saw both players doing well
   in getting the ball into the box. Finishing was our down fall though
   and none of the chances gave us clear opportunities on scoring.

   It was then just before full time that we missed a golden opportunity
   to take the win. A clean cross from the far side by Jooste found Venter
   on the ball. He tried to direct his shot away from the Cape Town City
   keeper, but put just too much on the ball, which went wide of the
   target.

   All in all, a positive point away from home.

   The team will return to Durban and begin preparations for our second
   home game on the 29th against Polokwane City.
   [capetowncity-150x150.jpg]

   We travel to Cape Town on the weekend to take on Cape Town City on
   Saturday evening. The game will be played at Cape Town Stadium, with
   kick-off at 18h00.

   Having started the season with a convincing win over Maritzburg United,
   the team have not managed to find the same form as they did in the
   Derby in their games against Bloem Celtic and Mamelodi Sundowns (MTN8).

   After the MTN8 fixture, Coach Larsen was positive regarding the
   position play from the side and the improvement in the build up play.

   This, as well as addressing the defensive issues regarding closing down
   play our opponent at the edge of the box would have been key factors in
   this weeks training ahead of our third ABSA Premiership clash of the
   season.

   It will be a battle of 7th and 8th place on the log, taking current
   standings into consideration.

   Cape Town City have had a similar performance to date, also having
   secured just 3 points from their two encounters. With a win over
   Supersport United (2-0) in their opening game, and then an away loss to
   Baroka (2-1), Benny McCarthy’s charges will be eager to notch up some
   points on their home turf.

   Statistically the game could go either way. Over the last 2 seasons, we
   have won 1, drawn 1 an lost twice to the Mother City team.

   It’s full points that we are looking for though.

   If you are in Cape town and are able to support, we would love to see
   you in the stands.

   You can catch the action on SuperSport 4 if you’re home. Or, follow us
   on Facebook or Twitter for a live play-by-play feed.
   [b18hesm0445-150x150.jpg]

   From the onset the boys really tried to go toe-to-toe with Sundowns

   I don’t think Sundowns expected us to play the way we did in the first
   half where we tried to be on the front foot and tried to play
   offensively. I thought playing (Danny) Venter a bit deeper as a
   playmaker worked and it improved our build-up play.

   I was very proud of the performance. Yes we could have done a bit
   better by closing (Sibusiso) Vilakazi down on the edge of the box with
   the first goal, but besides from that I thought the players did very
   well.

   In the second half we conceded a goal because we lost possession on the
   edge of the box and good teams are going to punish you if you lose the
   ball in those areas.

   It is a learning curve for the players, but I thought it was a huge
   improvement on our last match in terms of the team performance, so it
   is a step in the right direction.

   There are lots of positives to take from this game.
   [dkusvigx0aaoedn-150x150.jpg]

   We have been knoocked out of the MTN8 in the first round, with Sundowns
   managing to score twice to ensure a win.

   The team gave a good performance but just never managed to get into the
   firing zone and find accuracy on the shots we had at the Sundowns goal.

   Although we lost the game, coach Larsen was happy with the performance
   with the team who went toe-to-toe with Masandawana. The team tried
   playing offensively and also on the front foot but we made mistakes at
   the back and got punished for it.

   We allowed Vilakazi to open the scoring for the home side in the 40th
   minute. The persistance of the play from Sundowns and their domination
   of ball posession in the first half allowed them to get behind the
   defence, create a gap, and give Vilakazi a chance that he made no
   mistake on.

   Coming back onto the field in the second half, we had a flurry of play
   that saw us have some better opportunities to score. Sibiya did well on
   the field, playing the ball up and linking well with Lunga to create
   opportunities. We could just not find the mark and get an equaliser.

   Sirino then added pressure on us. He set up a number of plays for
   Mamelodi Sundowns and put us on the back foot in the last third. In the
   70th minute, Sirino came at us on the near side, put a cross in that
   went across the face of the goal where Arendse made a diving header
   shot on the low ball. He struck it well and found the back of the net.

   We will return home to prepare for our league match next weekend
   against Cape Town City in the mother city on Saturday 18th.
   [nmversion-150x150.jpg]

   We take a break from league action and we turn our attention to the
   MTN8 as we travel to Gauteng to take on Mamelodi Sundowns at Lucas
   Moripe Stadium tomorrow at 15h00.

   This will be the second consecutive year we will be paricipating in the
   Wafa Wafa (do or die) competition. Last yaer our first game of the
   season was an MTN encounter againt Bidvest Wits.

   The game ended up going to penalties to decide the winner after drawing
   2-all with the Clever Boys after full time. A dramatic ending saw us
   eventually knocked out in the quarter finals after Wits won 4-3 on
   penalties.

   A stronger start will be the aim for the side tomorrow, and Sundowns
   will be a tough opponent to beat. That said, we are more than capable
   of taking the win from the Brazilians.

   A level head is needed on the field, as well as determination to secure
   a win, but it is not an impossible task

   If you are a supporter and can get to the stadium, we would love to see
   you there in support of the boys in this important encounter in our
   2018/19 season.
   [loss-to-celtic-150x150.jpg]

   We have suffered a home defeat to Siwelele at the Princess Magogo
   Stadium tonight.

   From the first minute of the game, the team just did not seem to get
   into the groove of the game and allowed Bloem Celtic to get behind the
   defence.

   We had a couple of moments of promising play, but nothing that looked
   threatening enough to Tignyemb who had an easy night in the goals
   tonight.

   In the 23rd minute Celtics persistence in playing the ball deep up
   field paid off when Mabasa found himself one on one with Gumede and
   made no mistake in his shot, giving the visitors an early lead in the
   game.

   A half time substitution from us saw Conco replace Sabelo in an attempt
   to up the tempo of the game, which did not have the results that we
   wanted.

   Although we seemed to dominate the field in the second half, we could
   just not break past the defence of our opponents.

   Lamola had a chance to pull one back, but Tignyemb managed to fall on
   the ball, killing it and denying the one decent attempt we had on
   target.

   Celtic sealed the game in the 50th minute. Dlamini scored for them and
   made sure that we had to fight back hard to just stay in the game.

   Not a great result from us, and it will cause unnecessary pressure as
   we prepare for the Cup game on Sundowns at Lucas Moripe Stadium.
   [bloemgame02-150x150.jpg]

   We start our week off tomorrow with our first home game in the 2018/19
   ABSA Premiership season against Bloemfontein Celtic. The mid-week
   encounter kicks off at 19h30.

   We got off to a solid start on Sunday, with a 2-nil win against
   Maritzburg United. A 90 minute team performance saw Knox Mutizwa open
   the scoring on the 71st minute and after some amazing defending and
   goal keeping to deny an equaliser, we sealed the game 2 minutes into
   extra time as Lamola found the back of the net.

   Celtic similarly had a good start to the season as they beat Chippa
   2-nil at home.

   Last season, we played to a 1-all draw at home to Celtic and then lost
   2-1 when we met them at Dr Molemela Stadium.

   We will be looking to secure a win against them and continue on a
   positive start to the season.

   We call on all our support to get to the stadium tomorrow night and get
   behind the team as we strive to lay the foundation to a strong 2018/19
   season.

   The game will not be televised, so as always, a live play by play feed
   will be available on our social media platforms.

   Tickets will be sold at the stadium, R40 adults and R10 kids U12
   [ccomment1-150x150.jpg]

   As expected we were in for a torrid 90 minutes against a very
   impressive Maritzburg team. I was very pleased with our structure and
   in particular, the work ethic of the entire team.. Our attacking
   players worked selflessly for the team and deserve a lot of credit.

   Still we were careless on the break turning over too much possession. A
   lot better in the second half,with two well taken goals.

   A great start to the season.
   [game01-story-150x150.jpg]

   We have secured 3 points in our opening game of the season against
   Maritzburg United at the Harry Gwala Stadium this afternoon, breaking a
   drought of wins in the province capital since 2010.

   A brilliant team effort from Gumede at the back, all the way to Lamola
   and Mutizwa up front, saw us taking advantage of two well fought
   opportunities and capitalising on them.

   Maritzburg United had a slight upper hand in the first half as far as
   possession went, but they were just not able to put together a strong
   enough attack to put us on the back foot and find the back of the net.

   We used our ball well, setting up good movements and looking to break
   into the firing zone, but the first 45 was not kind to us. Our only
   promise was off a free kick. Danny Venter struck the ball well, putting
   it in a great position in the box, however Phiri’s resulting header
   went over the bar.

   The teams headed into the break with no score on the board. This in
   itself set the anticipation of an explosive second half.

   Coming back onto the field, Maritzburg were quick on the attack and we
   allowed them to have a chance at scoring. Mokate had a header, but a
   quick thinking Gumede fell back quickly and flat handed the ball out of
   the goal area.

   Minutes later, Ndlovu failed to capitalise for the home team again
   denied by Gumede. We changed gear from here, and took the game to them,
   confident that our fitness levels would carry us through the game.

   Our determination paid off in the 71st minute when Mutizwa played an
   amazing reverse shot after chesting the ball off a cross from the far
   side. He caught Ofiri completely off guard and gave us the lead.

   An end to end battle then took place. Maritzburg came back at us and
   tried hard to equalise. Again, the team effort was commendable, and the
   defence from the attacking players played a big factor in helping deny
   Maritzburg.

   We kept our composure, and with 10 minutes left in the game, we
   increased the tempo, looking for the goal to secure the game. It was
   only in extra time that the determination payed off, with Lamola
   finding himself one-on-one with Ofiri, he managed to get a boot on the
   ball as he was being closed down, finding the back of the net and
   ensuring the win.

   This is a positive start to the season, and once again, congratulations
   must go to the whole team for a well played effort from everyone.

   A special thanks to you, the 12th men supporters who always stand by us
   and encourage the players to give their all on the field.
   We will prepare now for a busy week as we host Bloemfontein Celtic at
   home on Wednesday night, and then look at the MTN fixture against
   Mamelodi Sundowns next weekend.
   [openinggame-150x150.jpg]

   We kick off the season this coming Sunday with a Derby game against
   Maritzburg United at Harry Gwala Stadium in Pietermaritzburg. The game
   gets underway at 15h00 and is sure to deliver all that the Derby games
   do.

   After drawing both games in the last season, both teams will be wanting
   to claim the bragging rights of a Derby win.

   Coach Clinton Larsen is expecting a physical battle on Sunday and told
   IOL “We are ready for the start of the new season. We won’t read too
   much into our victory against Maritzburg United in the KZN Premier’s
   Cup.”

   “We didn’t want to show any hand in terms of the team that we will use
   when we meet on Sunday and they also did the same. We want to get off
   to a flying start. We are targeting a victory and I’m sure Maritzburg
   United want to achieve the same objective.”

   The coach and his charges are looking at getting off to a strong start
   to the season, and we are happy with the match fitness of the players
   after a positive pre-season.

   We would like to encourage all our supporters to get to Harry Gwala
   Stadium and get behind the team in the season opener.

   The live play-by-play will be availbale for you to follow on both our
   Twitter and Facebook handles, and the game will also be televised live
   on SuperSport 4.
   [premfin2018-150x150.jpg]

   The 2018 KZN Premier’s Cup concluded this afternoon with AmaZulu taking
   on Richards Bay FC in the final.

   It was Amazulu FC who were crowned the 2018 winners of the competition
   after a 1-0 win over their opponents.

   Once again, this exciting pre-season tournament delivered the thrills
   and excitement that it normally does, with 2 days of high calibre
   soccer from 7 of KwaZulu-Natal’s top teams.

   The day started off with the first semi final between AmaZulu and Real
   Kings. Usuthu eventually got through to the final after a 4-2 win on
   penalties. The full 90 minutes of play saw Real Kings hold off the
   opposition to a 1-all draw and force the penalty shootout.

   The second semi final, played at 11h30 was between Richards Bay FC and
   us. A level pegged 90 mintes was played, and both teams had flourishes
   of play that promised a goal, but it was not to be for either team.

   Although we played some well calculated and carried out plays that saw
   the ball moved out wide, crossed in onto advancing players, the
   finishing just lacked the shine to find the back of the net.

   For the second game today, the decision was to be determined by
   penalties. We added pressure onto ourselves when the first penalty,
   taken by Venter was saved. The Richards Bay players made no error
   though, and the final nail was a poorly struck penalty from Siyabonga
   Dube which sailed way over the cross bar, to seal our fate in a 4-3
   loss.

   We would like to thank the KZN Premier as well as the Department of
   Sport and Recreation for another well organised, entertaining
   pre-season competition.

   We would also like to thank all of the other participatin teams for
   another competitive weekend and look forward to next years competition.

   A big thank you goes out to our supporters and those from other teams,
   that make this competition such an enjoying one to play at with the
   amazing atmosphere created.

   Finally, congratulations to AmaZulu for their win over Richards Bay FC
   in the final this afternoon.
   [dsc_0924-150x150.jpg]

   It was an enjoyable day of football today in Kwa Mashu as the province
   was spoilt with an exciting display of the local sides in the KZN
   Premier’s Cup.

   The first game of the day saw Real Kings FC an me Uthongathi in battle.
   An exciting game ensued which eventually saw Real Kings finish victors
   after their allotted game time. This means that they will go through to
   play Amazulu FC in the first semi final tomorrow morning at 09h00am.

   The second game today was between Royal Eagles FC and Richards Bay FC.
   Richards Bay FC put up a solid fight that saw them equalise in extra
   time and force the game into a penalty shoot out to decide the winner.
   Their players did well and ended up converting 4 penalties to Royal
   Eagles 2 and securing the first spot in the second semi final.

   Our game against Maritzburg then kicked off at 15h00 with only one more
   opening left to play for in tomorrows action at King Zwelithini. As
   usual, a great game of soccer was played. We dominted the first half
   and were awarded a penalty for a hand ball in the box. Conco stepped
   up, converted the opportunity and gave us the lead.

   The second half of play saw Maritzburg trying to get back into the game
   and although a number of opportunities were created, they were not able
   to find the back of the net.

   We managed to maintain our lead in the game and secured our place in
   the second semi final against Richards Bay FC, scheduled for kick off
   at 11h30 tomorrow at King Zwelithini.
   [premcupstory-e1531844439870-150x150.jpg]

   The draw for the 2018 KZN Premier’s Cup took place this afternoon at
   Moses Mabhida Stadium. The launch and draw was attended by Mrs Bongi
   Sithole-Moloi, MEC for Arts, Sports, Recreation and Culture as well as
   Mr Ngwenya, from SAFA.

   Also present were coaches, captains and supporters from all of the
   participating clubs.

   Taking part in this years competition which will be held on the weekend
   of the 28th and 29th July are Amazulu FC, Maritzburg United, Royal
   Eagles FC, Uthongathi FC, Richards Bay FC and Real Kings FC.

   Addressing the clubs, journalists and invited guests, Mrs,
   Sithole-Boloi said that it was important for her department to support
   the clubs with the Premier’s Cup as it encourages ongoing development
   to local communities through sport.

   As part of the departments initiatives they have also assisted in
   setting up 64 smaller football clubs within the Province, as well as
   launched a new u15 and womens’ open league to improve the influence
   that sport and soccer has on communities.

   Both her and Mr Ngwenya were vocal that the dream would to be to see 4
   KZN sides in the PSL as well as the NFD.

   Coach Larsen applauded the MEC for the yearly competition. ‘MEC, I
   thank you for putting your money where your mouth is and giving us the
   Premier’s Cup’ he said, after which he said he looked forward to the
   competition ahead of the upcoming PSL season.

   The draw took place, with Amazulu FC being frawn first. Which meant
   that they proceed to the first semi final on Sunday 29 July at King
   Zwelithini Stadium.

   The remaining draw was as follows:
   Saturday – Real Kings vs Uthongathi FC (11:00)

   Saturday – Richards Bay Fc vs Royal Eagles FC (13:00)

   Saturday – Maritzburg Utd vs Lamontville Golden Arrows (15:00)
   The above mentioned games will be played at Princess magogo stadium.
   Winner of the above mentioned game move on to Sunday’s games which will
   take place at King Zwelithini stadium.
   1st semi final – 09:00
   2nd semi final – 11:30
   Final at 15:00

   We would like to see as much support as we can get together for this
   pre-season competition.
   [waowin-150x150.jpg]

   We have won the friendly game this afternoon against AmaZulu at the ‘We
   are One Festival’ at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   In a game that failed to thrill in the first 45, it came down to
   penalties and sudden death to determine a winner.

   Neither AmaZulu nor us looked dangerous at all in the first 45 minutes.
   Both teams held onto the ball as much as they could, and seemed to be
   waiting for the opposition to create some fireworks.

   There were sections of play that seemed a bit more entertaining, but
   going into the break it was 0-0.

   Minutes after returning to the field, Amazulu had a break through as
   they played into the final third and found the back of the net off some
   enterprising play.

   This set the feeling for the second half. We were playing to equalise
   and AmaZulu to extend their lead. This ignited a true Derby style game
   with each team managing to frustrate each other and cause mistakes.

   We were awarded a free kick to the side of the box. Debutante Ngcongco
   took the set piece. He struck the ball well and it curled into the
   goal, securing the equaliser.

   With just a couple of minutes left in the half, we failed to secure a
   penalty awarded to us after the AmaZulu keeper picked the ball up
   outside of his box.

   Skipper, Sabelo placed the ball and proceeded to blast it over the
   cross bar.

   With the final whistle going, it was penalties that would decide the
   game. Each side selected their players and after the 5 penalties, it
   was still a 3-3 draw.

   Sudden death came into play. Amazulu’s player walked up and took his
   shot. Mngwengwe dived to his right, reading the shot perfectly and made
   an amazing save.

   Mfanafuthi Mkhize then stepped up and made no mistake for us, ensuring
   the win for the day.

   Amazulu 1(3) – (4)1 Golden Arrows
   [dsc_0449-150x150.jpg]

   Preparations for the 2018/2019 season got underway today as the squad
   returned for pre-season training.

   The Technical staff have set out a comprehensive training schedule for
   the team before the season starts.

   Modules of training have been put together, with the first week
   focusing on player fitness and getting the boys back to playing level.
   This will include field fitness sessions as well as gym sessions.

   Following this will be a number of modules that will get the team back
   into ball skill and working on ensuring solid ball retention.

   The team will then only have friendly pre-season games from mid July,
   once the technical team is satisfied with the training that has taken
   place to improve on players cores and agility training.
   [ccomment-bloem-150x150.jpg]

   Being the first home game of the season we wanted to start positively
   but that was not the case as we struggled to find any rhythm in the
   first half. We had good shape but our Achilles heel was that we
   consistently turned over possession after winning it and as a result
   could not build any meaningful attacks.

   We deservedly went 1-0 down before the break. We changed the shape of
   the team in the second half and began to dominate our opponents only to
   concede a second against the run of play.

   We camped in Celtics half for long periods but lacked the necessary
   creativity and final pass to break them down.
   [we-are-one-e1528347456668-150x150.jpg]

   Lamontville Golden Arrows will take part in the 2018 ‘We are One’
   Festival to be held over the weekend of the 23rd and 24th June.

   Activities on the weekend will include The Jeff Radebe Fun Walk,
   Lamontville Golden Arrows vs AmaZulu, The Sharks vs the Cheetahs, plus
   additional sporting activities played by local youngsters.

   The festival finishes off on the Sunday with a cultural day, packed
   with entertainment from music to fairground entertainment.

   The festival, founded by KwaMashu local, Jacinta Ngobese, and backed by
   the CIty of Durban and Durban Tourism, is aimed at binging together
   people from different townships, backgrounds and ethnic groups,
   fostering unity in diversity and social cohesion amongst them through
   sport.

   Follow #WeAreOneFestival2018 on twitter for updates on the event
   leading up to the date.
   [u17-final-game-e1526638022545-150x150.jpg]

   Our Reserves have completed their 2018 season with a 3-0 win over
   Folweni All Stars. The season was a closely contested one, Ourselves,
   Jahman Stars, Kharwastan and Summerfield Dynamos all playing for the
   top spot in the competition.

   The last week was a determining factor in this years log results as we
   played four games in one week to fill the allocated fixtures. Needing
   to secure as many points as we could in order to top the log.

   On May 10th, we secured a 2-0 win over Dynamos, followed by a 3-0 win
   againt Merewent Aces on the 12th. They we played Wentworth Leeds on the
   13th, securing 3 points with a 4-1 win.

   This ensured us 12 valuable points.

   At this stage we had managed to top the log, with our last game to be
   played against Folweni All Stars.

   The determining game however was a fixture between Kharwastan and
   Summerfield Dynamos. They needed to play each other in the leagues last
   game of the season. A win for Dynamos would have seen us take the
   league, based on points. However it was not meant to be, It was
   Kharwastan who ended up securing the 3 points though, and this put them
   at the top of the log with 44 points, just 2points above Us on the
   table.

   All in all we played 18 games this season. We were victorious in 13
   games, drew 3 and lost just 2 to achieve a total of 42 points, placing
   us second on the log.

   Once again, a good performance from the side. One they should be proud
   of.
                       P  W  D L  GF GA GD  PTS
   Kharwastan          18 14 2 2  36 18 18  44
   Golden Arrows       18 13 3 2  44 13 21  42
   Jahman Stars        18 12 4 2  41 14 27  40
   Summerfield Dynamos 18 11 4 3  39 17 22  37
   Umbumbulu           18 7  2 9  25 37 -12 23
   Toronto             18 6  1 11 29 30 -1  19
   Amazayoni           18 5  3 10 29 39 -10 18
   Folweni All Stars   18 4  3 11 22 40 -23 15
   Leeds               18 3  2 13 21 44 -23 11
   Merewent Aces       18 1  4 13 8  42 -34  7
   [story-e1526138751784-150x150.jpg]

   The Derby game between Maritzburg United and us ended in a 1-all draw
   this afternoon at Harry Gwala Stadium. It delivered the excitement and
   tension of a true Derby game.

   We came onto the pitch with determination and in the first minute of
   play showed our intentions of securing a win as Ndwandwe had a shot on
   goal that went over the bar. Not to be intimidated, Maritzburg United
   answered in true Derby style as they took the game to us when they had
   the ball.

   This was to be the tempo of the game for the full 90 minutes as both
   sides counter played with strong attacking plays into the opponents
   last third.

   We took the lead in the match in the 20th minute. Lerato Lamola was
   once again the goal scorer. A well played movement for the team saw him
   enjoy a well supplied cross by Nonyane,he connected it well in the air
   and guided it into the back of the net.

   We held that lead until the 82nd minute. Solid defending today from
   Nonyane, Mzava, Mngwengwe and our skipper Mathiane denied the home side
   up until this point. But the persisitance from the Team of Choice paid
   off for them as Makaringe struck.

   This set up a blistering last 10 minutes of play. No time was wasted by
   either sides and quick decisions were made in throw in and corners.
   Both sides looking for pockets to play into to secure a win.

   It was not meant to be for either side, and after 4 minutes of
   additional time played, we had to settle with sharing the points.

   Another good performance from the side today.

   The management, coaching staff and players would like to thank you, our
   supporters, for another fantastic season of support. Your voices lift
   the players spirits from the stands.

   We look forward to another season with you behind us!
   [whereiamat-e1526017496499-150x150.jpg]

   We wrap up the season tomorrow afternoon with a KZN Derby against the
   team of choice at the Harry Gwala Stadium. The game will kick off at
   3pm.

   The team will be fighting to retain a Top 8 spot on the table in this
   game. This means that not only are bragging rights on the cards, but
   much more than that.

   Coach Larsen is spoilt for choice for players, with Danny Phiri and
   Lehlohonolo Nonyane returning to the field after injuries as well as
   Lerato Lamola, Sandile Zuke, Siyabonga Dube and Zolani Nkombelo
   returning after suspensions.

   This is a refreshing change for the technical staff, who have endured a
   number of drawbacks over the season due to injuries.

   Currently sitting 7th on the log, Abafana Bes’thende need to secure
   full points to ensure the Top 8 finish. Chippa United, Bloem Celtic an
   Bidvest Wits sit only a point below us on 36 points and eleventh placed
   Amazulu FC have 35.

   A win is a big ask for the side, but the determination that has been
   displayed over the season can pull us through tomorrows game and see us
   bringing the 3 points home.

   We played Maritzburg last in December 2017 at home, and the result was
   a draw. Maritzburg have however had a tantalising season and have done
   well to keep their log position just under the top 3.

   A win for them could however mean a 3rd place spot for the season, an
   objective they will not give up easily on.

   If you can get to the stadium and support, it would be greatly
   appreciated by the players.

   We will keep you in the action on both Facebook and Twitter should you
   not be able to make the game as it will not be a live game
   [reserves-log-may2018-e1525774632573-150x150.jpg]

   Our Reserve side is doing well in the SAB Regional League and sit
   fourth on the log, with a game in hand with 30 points. They have 9
   wins, 3 draws, while only losing 2 so far.

   The side has had some tough games since returning to the field after
   the Easter break. They suffered a narrow 2-1 loss to Kharwastan early
   in April after being reduced to 9 men just 20 minutes into the game.

   Later in the month another decision from the refrees saw us having to
   play a man down against Mbumbulo. A fight from the youngsters saw us
   come out with a 2-1 win on this occasion.

   Its encouraging to see the players determination when faced with having
   to deal with decisions from the officials, even when it means losing a
   player on the field.

   It shows both confidence and maturity to be able to roll with the
   punches and fight for the wins when the odds are against you.

   The Boys face a busy week on the field this week as they face
   Summerfield Dynamos tomorrow afternoon at Moses Mabhida outer fields at
   15:30, then on Sunday they take on Folweni All Stars at Bonela Grounds
   at 15:00, as well as face Merewent Aces on the 15th of May,at Moses
   Mabhida outer fields at 15:00.

   We have played these three opponents earlier on in the season and
   secured wins over two of the sides with a draw to Summerfield.

   We are hopeing for positive results in the upcoming games, and are sure
   that the fighting spirit of the side will see them victorious on the
   field.

   The log is as follows:
                       P  W  D L  GF GA GD  PTS
   Summerfield Dynamos 15 11 4 0  35 14 21  37
   Kharwastan          15 11 2 2  30 17 13  35
   Jahman Stars        16 10 4 2  38 13 25  34
   Golden Arrows       14 9  3 2  34 12 22  30
   Umbumbulu           17 7  2 8  24 33 -9  23
   Toronto             17 6  1 10 28 28  0  19
   Amazayoni           16 4  3 9  27 36 -9  15
   Folweni All Stars   17 4  3 10 22 38 -16 15
   Leeds               16 3  2 11 19 34 -15 11
   Merewent Aces       17 1  4 12 8  40 -32  7


   [3rd-place-win-diski-shield-e1525523597621-150x150.jpg]

   We have secured a third place in the first Diski Shield competition
   after beating Bloemfontein Celtic 3-0 this afternoon.

   The team went onto the field this morning showing early intention to
   score, putting pressure on the opponents defence from kick-off.

   We troubled their defenders as well as dominated in the mid field,
   playing into gaps and creating scoring opportunities. Ndududzo Sibiya
   capitalised on a weakness on their left flank and managed to get the
   ball behind their defenders consistently.

   This caused some frustration in the Bloemfontein side and the pressure
   eventually paid off when a shot from the left was deflected into the
   goals by a Celtic player, giving us the lead.

   Bloem Celtic made an attempt to equalise before the break, but their
   efforts were not good enough.

   Returning for the second half, we kept the pressure on our opponents.
   We did not allow them the space they were looking for to get back into
   the game, and kept them on the back foot.

   Thando Khwela unleashed a cannon of a shot from outside the box in the
   58th minute. He was allowed plenty of time to take the shot, truck it
   well with his right foot and found the back of the net.

   Celtic had a few moments of play. Our defence kept tight at the back,
   and they could not find space to make any threatening shots at goal.
   Cebekhulu did well to control what was fired at him.

   A third goal in the third minute of extra time from substitute Tshanini
   Falakhe secured the win and the third place for us in the competition.

   We would like to thanks the sponsors Multichoice for this exciting new
   competition, and look forward to next seasons installment of Diski
   games.
   [diski-3-4-e1525415737346-150x150.jpg]

   The Multichoice Diski Shield comes to an end this weekend with matches
   being played to determine the winner, and then third and fourth play
   offs.

   We will be playing Bloem celtic to determine third and fourth place. We
   were not able to find the goals last weekend against Masandawana, not
   for the lack of effort from the boys, and eventually lost the game 1-0.

   Celtic had a tough game against Kaizer Chiefs, and ended up suffering a
   2-0 loss to the Glamour Boys at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium.

   We will play at 12pm tomorrow at Makhulong Stadium with the the game
   that will determine the number one football hood in the country taking
   place at 15h00.

   Because it is a Diski Festival, entry will be free on the day and
   tickets an be collected at the stadium today from 13h00. All two
   matches will be broadcast live on SuperSport 4 and 10.

   We will be covering the game tomorrow over our social media platforms.
   [coaches-comment-platinum-stars-e1524986577791-150x150.jpg]

   Having four players suspended for this match was always going to pose a
   challenge but the players who came in stepped up and delivered. We
   looked strong in the first half and deservedly went 2-0 up through
   Mutizwa then Venter.

   We conceded early in the 2nd half but showed good character to keep
   positive and find a 3rd goal which Mutizwa provided for his brace. We
   conceded a very sloppy 2nd but held on to take all three points.
   [wn-over-dikwena-e1524932804216-150x150.jpg]

   Another solid performance saw us secure a 3-2 win over a determined
   Platinum Stars in Kwamashu this afternoon

   For a team that is already relegated to the NFD in the next season,
   they showed the determination and fight that we are used to seeing from
   the side.

   We got the game off on a good foot and used our possession well. A
   quick throw in from the far side by Ndwandwe helped catch the visitors
   off guard, and this allowed Mutizwa to open the scoring for us, tapping
   the ball past Mzimela

   This was a positive play for us, and encouraged some great attacking
   play, creating spaces and getting the ball behind the defence as we
   looked to extend the lead going onto the break. Venter scored our
   second goal in the 30th minute and we held the lead going into the
   break.

   On returning to the field, Dikwena came back with some fight in them.
   They kept pressure on us for a good 15 minutes. Keeping us held back in
   defence and not allowing us much ball to play forward on.

   They pullled their first goal back in the 60th minute after showing
   some steady attacking play. Mkhabela got the goal, but it was a
   concerted effort from all on the field to get there.

   They fought a hard last 45. They kept attacking us at all angles. But
   We managed to score again. Ndwandwe played Mutizwa into position,
   allowing him to score his brace.

   Ndwandwe had a solid game today. Looking to feed the ball to anyone on
   attack. He was unlucky not to be able to score himself in the second
   half.

   An extra time goal from Sithole saw the visitors narrow the lead but it
   was not enough for them in the end.

   Another good performance from the side, and a great foundation to go on
   to play Maritzburg United on the 12th of May at Harry Gwala Stadium
   [semi-loss-to-sundowns-e1524910817367-150x150.jpg]

   We have been knocked out of the Diski Shield after suffering a 1-0 loss
   to Mamelodi Sundowns at Sugar Ray Xulu Stadium this morning.

   The Diski side played into the semi finals after drawing to Chippa, and
   then beating both Maritzburg United and Amazulu to top the group log.

   During this new competition, we have seen some amazing play from both
   our experienced players as well as newcomers such as Cebekhulu,
   Mfanifikile Dlamini and Lindani Ndlelu.

   We faced a Sundowns side that came onto the field and showed more
   determination than what they had in the group stages.

   It was a tough fight from the kick off and both sides tried different
   attacking plays to get behind the defence.

   We went into the changerooms with no score on the board. On return to
   the field, a quick attack from Sundowns saw them find space from the
   left. They managed to unleash a shot on goal and Mkhuma found the back
   of the net.

   We fought hard for the equaliser. Sibiya had a promising chance, but a
   glance off the side of his boot saw it go wide of the mark.

   A concerted effort to score was made. Sibiya, Sabelo and N.Dube had
   attempts, but strong defence from the Masandawana players denied us our
   chances today.

   We would have loved to progress to the finals, but would like to
   congratulate Mamelodi Sundowns on the win and wish them well in the
   first Diski Shield final next weekend.
   [storyimage2-e1524822397743-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow afternoon we take on Platinum Stars at the Princess Magogo
   Stadium in our last home game of the season.

   After a well deserved mid week win over Kaizer Chiefs, the team is
   fired up to secure another three points ahead of the completion of the
   season.

   As we have pointed out already, any points at this stage count
   considerably with just 3 points separating positions 7 to 13 on the
   log.

   A team like Platinum Stars will fight to the bitter end of a season
   even though its a sure point that they will be relegated this season.
   They will play for pride and honour and this will make them a dangerous
   adversary on Saturday.

   The return of both Danny Phiri and Kudakwashe Mahachi could have been
   the positive vibe the team was needing and every player who contributed
   to Tuesdays match seemed to have taken their game up a notch.

   We would like to appeal to all of you, our fans, to get to Princess
   Magogo to support the lads in our last home fixture of the season. They
   will appreciate every voice in the stands.

   Tickets will be sold at the stadium only R40 adults, R15 kids U12
   [diski-shield-semi-final-e1524688331332-150x150.jpg]

   After the group stages in the Diski Shield competition, we are through
   to the semi finals, which play out on Saturday at the Sugar Ray Xulu
   Stadium in Cleremont.

   We were drawn to play against Mamelodi Sundowns and will play the first
   semi final, kick off at 10am.

   Whats exciting about this game is that it will be Abafana Bes’thende
   versus Masandawana, both winners of the Diski title.

   All players will be aware of what is at stake in the game and promises
   to deliver a final paced game.

   Entrance to the game is free, however, a ticket is required. These can
   be collected from 13h00 on Friday afternoon at the stadium itself.

   Don’t miss out on this exciting competition. The games at Sugar Ray
   Xulu will be the last Diski games played in KZN this season as the
   final of the competition will be played at Makhulong Stadium.
   [kaizer-chiefs-coaches-comment-e1524640874618-150x150.jpg]

   We got off to a flyer which is something we discussed pre match as we
   needed to try impose ourselves on our opponent so as to try and get an
   early goal. We managed to do that after Lamola put us in the lead but
   we should have killed the game off after Castro’s red card as we
   created numerous chances.

   We unfortunately conceded just before the break after what looked like
   a foul by Katsande on Ndwandwe. Another early goal from Lamola in the
   2nd half put us in the driving seat and again we had enough chances to
   score more goals.

   Our game management when leading needs to improve as we often turned
   over possession needlessly. The 3rd goal late on sealed the win and 3
   valuable points.
   [kaizer-chiefs-win-e1524604055545-150x150.jpg]

   A brace for Lerato Lamola and a goal for Velemseni Ndwandwe secured us
   a 3-1 win over Kaizer Chiefs in the ABSA Premiership tonight at
   Princess Magogo Stadium.

   A solid and positive start to the game paid off in the 4th minute as
   Lamola curled a shot around Chiefs last defender and Khune after
   receiving the ball in the box. His shot tucked just into the far post
   to put us in the lead.

   The remainder of the half was a positive one. We used the ball well and
   took it to the opposition as we looked to solidify the lead we had
   secured. Lamola was unlucky not to score again in the first 45 after
   keeping the Amakhosi defenders under pressure with help form Ndwandwe,
   Magubane and Venter.

   Great play in the middle of the field saw us turn over some promising
   ball. Zuke did well on a number of occasions to feed both wings, and
   create pockets we could attack from.

   We should have gone into the lead before the break, seeing as Castro
   received a red card in the 16th minute, but a determined Chiefs team
   managed to pull one back in the 43rd minute off the boot of Parker.

   Returning from the break, we made an early change with Danny Phiri
   returning to the field after a long recovery. He made an impact from
   the first second, linking up well with Venter and Ndwandwe.

   Lamola was well placed to get his second goal. A play up the near side
   with a well timed cross found him ready to pounce in the box. He
   connected the ball well and got it underneath Khune.

   The introduction of Mahachi did wonders for our attack shortly after.
   He, Ndwandwe and Lamola terrorized the defence.

   There were passages of play when we allowed Chiefs back into the game.
   Some free kicks were conceded close to the box and again Mbaeva did his
   job well tonight to make some great saves.

   Ndwandwe was awarded for an outstanding game in the 4th minute of extra
   time when he found the back of the net and made sure of the win for us.

   Every player on the field needs to be commended for a well played game
   tonight. The team played as a unit and this was evident from the
   result.

   A great result for us ahead of Saturdays home game against Platinum
   Stars.
   [storyimage-1-e1524459039618-150x150.jpg]

   Calling all green and gold supporters, we need you now more then ever.
   Tomorrow night we take on Kaizer Chiefs at the Princess Magogo stadium,
   the game kicks off at 19h30.

   It’s a fight for every point we can get in the competition now, and
   tomorrow nights game is more important than ever before. The team has
   played positive football over the last couple of games, but have been
   unlucky by only securing a draw with Free State Stars and a loss to
   Mamelodi Sundowns.

   Preparation this week has been intense, and every member of the squad
   knows the importance of their role going into tomorrows game.

   Kaizer Chiefs are currently in their own battle on the log, and would
   like to secure points in their battle to finish in the Top 3.

   They have won three of their last four ABSA Premiership outings, but
   have not secured convincing wins. They are a team that can be beaten on
   the day, and with the right attitude, we have the credentials to do so.

   The game will be televised live on SuperSport4 should you not be able
   to get to the stadium.

   Tickets are on sale from TicketPro, and we wold like to urge our
   supporters to get to the stadium and stand behind the team. Lets fill
   Magogo with our supporters.
   [shield-win-over-amazulu-e1524391614619-150x150.jpg]

   We have managed a win over Amazulu in the Diski shield game played in
   Vosloorus this morning.

   Amazulu made an early charge from the kick-off and looked at
   threatening Cebekhulu, but the keeper managed to eventually hold onto
   the ball.

   We turned the game, settled quickly and dominated play for the first 30
   minutes of the first half. We secured an early lead when a brilliant
   cross from the far side by Conco found Sabelo waiting in the box. He
   made no mistake and tapped the ball in. Just 4 minutes later we
   extended the lead off a free kick.

   It was Sabelo again who scored. His set piece split the wall and dipped
   into the bottom right corner. AmaZulu’s keeper Dlamini read the ball to
   late and was too late to make the save.

   AmaZulu looked at playing back into the game. They missed a scoring
   opportunity from a free kick. Jooste took the set piece for them and
   managed to find the side netting. Their play and possession increased,
   however, they were not able to make any solid advances on our goals.

   Usuthu suffered further set backs after Mthiyane was sent for an early
   shower after his second bookable offence in the 42nd minute.

   The second half saw us enjoy some domination on the field, being a
   player down, Usuthu allowed us space and this saw us creating
   opportunities from both sides of the field.

   M.Dlamini and Ndlelu did well in the midfield to win the ball against
   play for us as well. Allowing Zuke, M.Dlamini and Sabelo to play into
   the last third and create chances.

   The introduction of Sibiya added some fresh legs and an injection of
   speed onto the field. He was not on the park long before he scored the
   third goal for us.

   We then got complacent and allowed AmaZulu back into the game though. A
   defensive mistake from Zuke in the box who shouldered the Amazulu
   player, the ref deemed it as a foul and awarded Amazulu a penalty.
   Maduna took the shot, snuck the ball past Cebekhulu to give some hope
   to the opposition.

   In the second minute of extra time, we conceded the second goal. A
   lapse in concentration saw Jooste have a shot from the left corner of
   the box. Cebekhulu had read the ball well, but a last touch from Biyase
   changed the direction of the ball, eventually beating our keeper.

   A well executed game from the team and bragging rights for the Derby
   win in Vosloorus.
   [dbn-derby-golden-arrows-vs-amazulu-diskishield-e1524292349480-150x150.
   jpg]

   Tomorrows last game in the ‘Boss of your Hood’ phase of the new Diski
   Shield sees us take on Amazuu FC at a Derby weekend at Vosloorus
   Stadium. Kick-off at 10am.

   It is a do or die game for the team in the competition, with only the
   Top ranked team in the log progressing through to the semi finals of
   the competition.

   After a draw in our first game when we met Chippa United, and a win
   againt Maritzburg United last weekend, the boys have put themselves in
   a good position to advance. That said, they however need to win
   tomrrows game in able to secure thier position going forward.

   The game is part of the Multichoice Diski Shield Festival weekend
   taking place at Vosloorus Stadium and will be televised on SuperSport4.
   [u17newseason-e1524202775464-150x150.jpg]

   Our u17 season kicks off this weekend. We will get underway with a game
   against Kwa Mashu Brothers on Sunday 22 April at Siripat Ground 4,
   13h00 start.

   The youngsters have been at training and preparing hard over the last
   couple of weeks under the watchful eye of Coach Samson Ngcobo.

   Last season the team won the league by 9 points after playing 18 games.
   They lost only 1 game in the season, this was their first game of the
   season against Jamarie.

   We are looking forward to another successful season with the team and
   will follow their movements closely over the coming months.
   [coachescommssundowns-e1524035507925-150x150.jpg]

   We knew full well going into this game what we were up against. We were
   totally outplayed in the first half and deservedly went into the break
   a goal down.

   We did not create any clear cut chances and could have been two or
   three goals down at the break such was their dominance. We started the
   second half with more confidence with halftime substitute Ndwandwe
   being influential with our positive 2nd half showing.

   We could have stolen a point when we were denied what looked like a
   legitimate penalty claim.
   [sdvlga17april-e1523994233615-150x150.jpg]

   We have lost to a strong Sundowns side in Pretoria tonight. A first
   half penalty gave the home side the game.

   The first half saw Mamelodi Sundowns putting pressure on us from the
   kick off, getting into the last third. They controlled the game from
   the start and put us in a defensive position for the greater part of
   the first 45.

   They were quick on the ball and came from both sides of the net with
   Tau and Vilakazi posing a threat. Sirino also missed an early
   opportunity as he hit the upright early on.

   The opening goal came off a penalty shot though as Nkombelo could not
   mange to pull out of a tackle on Vilikazi and bought him down in the
   box.

   Nascimento stepped up to the penalty spot and waited for Mbaeva to
   commit before connecting the ball and making no mistake in scoring.

   We did not manage to get into the last third as much as we wanted. A
   play up the far side saw Venter get up only to be closed down by
   Sirino, and even from our set pieces we never looked dangerous enough.

   Returning in the second half, we took the game to Sundowns in the first
   10 minutes of the second half. Our attempts though could just not get
   into a position to get a clear shot on goal.

   Masandwana then again had a period of dominating play. Mabaeva had a
   number of brilliant saves in the second half and kept us in the game
   for the second stanza.

   With Mutizwa, Ndwandwe and eventually Sibiya coming on in the second
   half. We looked to add a little more speed onto the field. It did not
   allow us to play into any advantage though.

   Our chances were few, and were also denied a penalty as Mutizwa was
   taken down in the box.

   A tough result tonight, and this means a week of hard preparation as we
   host Kaizer Chiefs next week Tuesday at Princess Magogo Stadium.
   [msvlgastory-e1523856567178-150x150.jpg]

   We travel to Pretoria to take on Mamelodi Sundowns tomorrow night in
   the ABSA Premiership. The game is set to kick off at 7:30pm at Loftus
   Stadium.

   With just four games left in the season, this encounter is going to be
   a tough test for the teams ability to perform under pressure. We need
   to bring points home, and this will be the first and foremost objective
   of the squad as we take on this away encounter.

   In a season that at present, sees just 3 points separating log
   positions seven to thirteen its important to retain any points
   possible.

   The attitude in camp is good. We have come off an away win to Cape town
   City and a draw to Free State Stars, a game that we should have won
   given the opportunities we created.

   This could carry us well against Bafana ba Style who are sitting strong
   on top of the log at the moment.

   We will need to dig deep to stop their run of wins as they have taken
   full points against Chippa United, Baroka FC and most recently Bidvest
   Wits in the competition.

   It is a big ask of the side, but not an impossible one.

   The game will be televised on SuperSport 4, and as always we will keep
   you informed of the game over our social media platforms.
   [story-e1523792855734-150x150.jpg]

   We have secured 3 points in the Diski Shield competition today after
   beating Maritzburg United 2-1 at the Princess Magogo Stadium.

   The game turned out to be a true Derby style game, with both teams
   giving their all on the field while trying to secure the 3 points in
   the ‘Boss of the Hood’ stage of the competition.

   We did dominate on the field though, pressing Maritzburg deep into
   their half and creating opportunities that tested their defense.

   This paid off in the 21st minute as some enterprising play saw Conco
   receive a well placed cross in the box. He made no error and put the
   ball in the back of the net.

   Maritzburg had a number of opportunities to get back into the game but
   failed to beat our defence and get close enough to take convincing
   shots. They resorted to shots from distance but lacked direction on the
   attempts.

   We went into the break with the lead and 2 changes from the change
   room, with Sibeko and Mathenjwa replacing N.Dube and Khwela was a clear
   indication that we wanted to take the pace of the game up a notch.

   This game plan worked well. We kept the opponents in their half for a
   large portion of the half and had a number of attempts at goal. Barr
   managed to do well to keep The Team of Choice in the game, and an
   equaliser from Mc Donald in the 53rd minute gave them a glint of hope.

   Sibeko delivered for us a minute later though. He had been persistently
   playing into the box, and after a great cross by Mkhize to the far post
   saw an unmarked Sibeko, who headed the ball into the back of the net.
   To give us the 2-1 lead

   Maritzburg never gave up the fight. They showed determination on the
   field and made use of the little possession they enjoyed. They were
   denied a second goal by the crossbar

   A promising result from the side who return to the field next weekend
   for another derby game against Amazulu in a weeks time at Vosloorus
   Stadium.
   [storyimage-e1523698291173-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow morning we play our second game in the Diski Shield at home
   against Maritzburg United. The game is scheduled for kick off at 10am
   at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   After the first round of the Shield competition, AmaZulu FC top the
   Coastal East group after beating Maritzburg United 3-1.

   We played Chippa United away and played to a goalless draw against
   them. Although we managed to play up into their last third a number of
   times, it was some determined keeping from their goal keeper that
   denied us on the day.

   We will be looking for the win against The Team of Choice, and wanting
   to get points on the log in order to secure a quarter final place come
   the end of the ‘Be the Boss of your hood stage’.

   Maritzburg should also be wanting to get on the board. After their
   opening loss to Amazulu they would have gone back to the drawing board
   and set up a strategy to be more competitive on the field.

   This competition is electric, with every game having the tempo of a
   Derby.

   As the game is not a festival the game will not be televised, but we
   will be bringing you a live play by play of the game on our social
   media platforms
   [reservesaprilstory-e1523448677824-150x150.jpg]

   SAB League update Our Reserve side have been having a successful season
   in the SAB Regional League so far this season.

   We have played a total of 10 games to date, and have three games in
   hand. Sitting 4th on the log, 11 points behind current leaders
   Summerfield Dynamo’s the team has a lot to play for in the coming
   weeks.

   After a short break they are currently catching up on fixtures and
   played 2 games this past weekend. On Saturday the team played
   Kharwastan and were on the back foot after 20 minutes into the first
   half after receiving two controversial red cards.

   This obviously made the game more trying than usual and the boys put up
   a good fight to try and stay in the game. They however eventually lost
   the encounter 2-1.

   Sunday saw them play Amazayoni. The toll of playing a double header
   weekend did not seem to deter the fighting spirit of the team. They
   answered the previous days loss with a 2-1 win over their opposition.

   This fighting spirit is evident in all of the players in the side, who
   work as a unit well both on and off the field.

   We have another game this coming weekend on Sunday as we play Amazayoni
   again at Twin Park in Amanzimtoti at 3pm.

   We wish the side well and will follow their progress closely.


                       P  W D L  GF GA GD  PTS
   Summerfield Dynamos 13 9 4 0  31 14 17  31
   Kharwastan          13 9 2 2  27 17 10  29
   Jahman Stars        13 8 3 2  35 13 22  27
   Golden Arrows       10 6 2 2  22 10 12  20
   Umbumbulu           13 6 2 5  21 23 -2  20
   Toronto             12 4 1 7  21 23 -2  13
   Folweni All Stars   11 3 2 6  18 26 -8  11
   Leeds               14 3 1 10 19 32 -13 10
   Merewent Aces       13 1 4 8  7  33 -26  7
   Amazayoni           12 1 3 8  19 29 -10  6
   [fsscoachescomment-e1523121739298-150x150.jpg]

   Coaches comments - Free State Stars It took an unfortunate own goal to
   for us to draw a game we were in full command of. After a very good 1st
   half display we were disappointed not to go into the halftime break at
   least a goal or two to the good.

   We took the lead through Magubane and once again did not put the game
   to bed by getting the 2nd goal. As is usually the case these situations
   come back to haunt you and it did in the form of an own goal.

   We lifted ourselves and continued to push for a winner and came close
   on several occasions but it wasn’t to be. Two points dropped but lots
   of positives to take moving forward.
   [fssresult-e1523114931906-150x150.jpg]

   We have played to a 1-1 draw this afternoon with Free State Stars at
   Princess Magogo Stadium.

   In a game that went to the changerooms with no score on the board at
   half time, it turned out to be the second half that provided the goals
   in the encounter.

   We played a good first half. Showing some dominance on the field and
   creating promising opportunities to score. The players did well to
   defend when Stars came on the counter but we created more opportunities
   than our opponents.

   Free State Stars did well at the back to close down our advances in the
   final third. Either getting in close and boxing us in, and not allowing
   the freedom to take a shot, or by throwing their bodies on the line to
   block shots.

   After the break both teams came out intent on opening the scoring. A
   passage of play from Stars players saw them attack us from the left. A
   high cross to the box was taken and in trying to clear it, it came off
   Mngwengwe’s boot and into the goals giving the visitors the lead.

   We needed to play back into the game. Changes were made from the bench
   that saw Magubane and Jooste enter the field. Both players are known to
   make an impact and the game livened up.

   Magubane eventually managed to equalise for us in the 71st minute. Some
   good pressure on the keeper saw him fumble the ball and Magubane made
   sure of the goal.

   We have 10 days to prepare for our away game against Mamelodi Sundowns,
   on the 17th of April at loftus stadium at 19:30
   [resultimage-e1523097130649-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski boys have played to a 0-0 draw in the field Diski Shield game
   this morning against Chippa United.

   Although we showed dominance throughout the majority of the match, it
   was a number of missed chances in both halves that denied us the game
   at Wolfson Stadium.

   The team showed some superiority on the field and managed to break the
   Chippa defence on a number of occasions. Debutantes M.Dlamini and
   Ndlelu proved themselves in the centre field, and helped play Conco
   into position to score.

   But some good keeping from Myataza denied us, as well as other
   finishing shots just not being on target.

   Not the result we would have hoped for, and we will need to work on
   aspects of our game before our next encounter against Maritzburg United
   on Sunday 15 April next weekend at Princess Magogo Stadium at 10:00
   [newsfss-e1523004074626-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow afternoon we will look to harness the positivity from
   Wednesday nights win in Cape Town against Cape Town City as we look to
   our home game against Free State Stars.

   The team had a fantastic defensive game and this was a critical part in
   retaining our 49th minute lead against the Cape Town city, who had
   managed to threaten our last third from both sides of the field.

   The coaching staff will be looking to maintain the positivity and draw
   on it in front of the home crowd come kick off at 3pm.

   Stars had a tough mid-week game against Kaizer Chiefs, losing in the
   last minute of extra time to a goal from Teenage Hadebe.

   They will surely be looking to secure some points away from home, and
   redeem some pride they may have lost against The Glamour Boys. Ea Lla
   koto have been coming out and showing their intent in the early minutes
   of their games. Saturday could see them try the same to secure an
   opener and put us on the back foot.

   We would like to appeal to all of our support to come and get behind
   the side as we take on our Bethlehem opponents. The support would be
   appreciated by all. Tickets will be available at the gates. R40 adults,
   R15 kids U12

   The game will be televised on SABC should you not be at the stadium. As
   usual a full play by play feed will be available on our socail media
   platforms.
   [chippaarrowssheild-e1522940349754-150x150.jpg]

   The countdown to the Diski Shield is here with the first games taking
   place this weekend. We play against Chippa United in the first of our
   ‘Coastal West’ clashes in this new and exciting competition.

   We will want to pick up from where we left off in the diski Challenge
   competition, and look to continue our winning ways in the opening game.

   The players are hungry to dominate the competition and are aware that
   every team would like to be the side to progress to be dubbed ‘Ubani
   Ibhoza Ngakini?’ (The Boss of the Hood) and progress to the Clash of
   the Cities stage of the competition.

   We last played Chippa in a festival game at King Zwelithini Stadium in
   December. Although we won the game 2-1 it was a tough game against a
   very capable side.

   Chippa opened the scoring in the first half and maintained pressure on
   us. Two goals in the second half eventually saw us take the win, but it
   was a closely contested game that could have gone either way.

   There will be festivals in the Shield competition, but unfortunately
   our game this weekend at Wolfson Stadium is not one of them, and will
   therefore not be televised.

   We will be keeping you up to date with minute by minute information on
   the game.
   [coachctc-e1522906670287-150x150.jpg]

   Cape Twon City - Coaches Comments This match was all about trying to
   get 3 points and nothing else. We had no intention of trying to outplay
   a quality City team but what we were looking for was defensive
   discipline and a strong fighting spirit of which our players gave both.

   With 5 games to go its all about points especially if we still harbor
   ambitions of a top 8 finish..
   [capetowncitywin-e1522871170593-150x150.jpg]

   We have secured a valuable 3 points tonight with a well fought for away
   win against Cape Town City.

   In a first half that saw the home side dominating both on the field and
   possesion. Cape town City made some threatening plays, with Lakay
   taking on both Nkombelo and Ndwandwe on either side of the park and
   breaking through to our last 3rd.

   Mathiane and the rest of our defence looked solid though out and saw to
   it that the opportunities could not be capitalised on. A solid fight
   from the team saw us go into the break without conceding,

   We managed to clinch the lead just 4 minutes into the second half, when
   Lamola was put into a perfect position by Venter. He took the
   opportunity running onto the ball and beat Stephens to find the back of
   the net.

   Some calm and calculated play between Bilankulu, Venter and Lamola
   created a couple more opportunities, but he failed to finish off and
   put the game to bed.

   We had to fight defensively to secure the win. Cape Town City refused
   to hold off and came at us from all angles. Our defenders played out of
   their socks tonight and ensured the win at Cape Town Stadium.

   There is no rest for the side though as we return home and prepare to
   take on Free State Stars at home on Saturday afternoon at Princess
   Magogo Stadium. Kick off at 3pm.
   [ctcprematch-e1522719586575-150x150.jpg]

   Cape town City vs Golden Arrows - 04 April 2018 We return to ABSA
   Premiership action tomorrow night as we are hosted by Cape Town City at
   the Cape Town Stadium. The game will kick off at 19h30.

   The team has used this break wisely, and have worked both on and off
   the field to ensure a united unit as we head into the business end of
   the season. With six games left, its important to stand together as a
   solid unit. Practices have been intense and off the field the team took
   part in a team building day to help ensure a united front on the field.

   Having played 24 games so far, we have managed 5 wins, and endured 12
   draws to accumulate a total of 27 points so far. This is just 5 points
   off a Top8 finish currently, and still an obtainable goal to finish on
   come the end of the season.

   Cape town City will be looking at focusing on their Premiership games
   now too after recently exiting the Nedbank Cup to Mamelodi Sundowns as
   well as losing to Costa do Sol in their CAF Confederations Cup fixture.

   Benny McCarthy’s team will be looking to gain points in the competition
   as well as seeking a win at home.

   The game will not be televised. However, we will be keeping you up to
   date on the game proceedings over our social network handles.
   [finstorygironafc-e1521808715924-150x150.jpg]

   We went pound for pound today against Girona FC in Riudarenes, Spain in
   another exciting and action filled game on the Multichoice Diski tour
   to Europe.

   The differing European style of play takes a bit of getting used to and
   we took a couple of minutes to find our footing and get into todays
   encounter again. But we managed to find our groove and take the game to
   our hosts. Girona were a formidable side, who had a number of their
   first team players on the field today. They made great use of their
   ball and distributed it well, ensuring that they took advantage of the
   gaps they created in our defence.

   The first half was a good contest and Girona managed to score twice.
   Determined not to go into the break with no score, we kept some
   consistent pressure on them. We forced a number of errors from them and
   managed to get a free kick on the edge of the box. Jappie did well with
   a short kick, layed it off to Parusnath who scored our first goal of
   the game before going into the break.

   The second half was an exciting battle. We returned to the field and
   both sides seemed to be holding off a little, trying to determine what
   the change of game plan was from each other. Girona then seemed to open
   their play up. They fed the ball wide a number of times and showed some
   superiority in creating gaps in our defence. This allowed them to score
   twice again, reasonably close together.

   We were determined to get back into the game though. Sibiya and N.Dube
   were substituted onto the field and made some impressive runs, managing
   to get behind the defence and create opportunities to score, while on
   defence we had tightened up, frustrating our opponents who were taking
   shots from outside the box to try and increase their lead.

   Our determination payed off. Ndwandwe won the ball in the midfield, he
   layed it off to N.Dube who played it up and fed Sibeko in the box.
   Sibeko made no mistake and scored.

   The score is not a true reflection of the 90 minutes played. The game
   was entertaining and another valuable learning experience for our
   players as we tour Spain.

   Congratulations to the team for showing determination, a proud
   performance today.
   [story-e1521481863834-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski boys had a positive start to their Spanish tour as we fought
   back for a victory over Rayo Vallecano this afternoon.

   The team took some time to settle into the game in the first half. Some
   chilly weather and this being their first game on the tour of Spain as
   part of their Diski Challenge prize had them unsettled in the first 45.
   Vallecano used this to their advantage, dominating the play and
   maintaining ball retention well. We took too long to get into any
   rhythm and Rayo Vallecano took advantage, opening the scoring just
   before the break.

   Some consolidation in the change room from the boys saw us return to
   the field with a clear objective of pulling this game back. Nkosikhona
   Dube came on as a substitute for an injured Conco and made his presence
   felt from the moment he set foot on the field. With Jappie and Sibeko
   already increasing the pressure on the defence, the inclusion of Dube
   created cracks in their defence. Jappie played a long ball to Sabelo
   who beat his defender and layed the ball off to Dube who made no
   mistake in finding the back of the net.

   The equalizer was what was needed to change the tempo of the game. We
   started dominating the play and some outstanding play from N.Dube was
   rewarded as he managed to score his brace and give us the lead. The
   game belonged to us from there and we dominated both the field and
   ball.

   A great performance from all of the players today. A positive start to
   the tour and this will stand us in good stead as we play again on
   Thursday against Barcelona.
   [ccbucs-e1521384458563-150x150.jpg]

   What can I say, referees are human and make mistakes. But it’s
   difficult to accept a case of mistaken identity especially when
   players, coaches as well as linesman are all telling the referee he is
   about to send off the wrong player.

   He acknowledges the advice of the linesman yet still sends off the
   wrong player. Not only do you feel aggrieved but it makes you think
   that something more sinister is happening. Even if the card is
   rescinded which I’m sure it will be, the immense damage has already
   been done.

   Back to the match, I think under the circumstances our players
   represented the club with pride and dedication. Our log position may
   not show this but we are ultra proud of the commitment our players show
   each time they represent the club.
   [fin-e1521319097608-150x150.jpg]

   We lost tonight against Orlando Pirates in another controversial game
   as we were reduced to 10 men in the 56th minute.

   Pirates did show domination in the first half of the game, and used
   their ball well to push up into our half and keep us on the back foot.
   We equaled them in defence though and Mzava and Mathiane both showed
   great character at the back. Our counter play in the half was not as
   quick off the break as normal, and we created few chances that
   threatened the visitors.

   Our efforts did however see us going into the break with no scores on
   the board.

   On return, both sides seemed to kick into a higher gear and tensions
   were evident in the play. A couple of hard tackles ensued and this
   added to the tensions on field. Pirates then opened the scoring with
   Lorch finding the back of the net from a movement that saw him come in
   from the far side and unleash a bullet of a shot that beat Mbaeva.

   Six minutes later we were reduced to 10 men after the referee gave
   Mzava a second yellow and ultimately his marching orders for an offence
   by Buthelezi.

   We had been doing well to play back into the game at this stage and
   served as a major set back in our game plan.

   Needing to cover the gap caused by being a man down, we took a bit of
   time to find a rhythm again. And Pirates used this to their advantage
   as Dube was played into position and scored a second for the Bucs.

   The team showed their fight inside though and did well to create a
   number of well executed plays that saw us get into the last third and
   within reach of a scoring chance.

   Coach Larsen bought Jooste and Shongwe into play and the injection of
   fresh legs paid off. In the 84th minute Shongwe scored with a well
   executed shot off a back pass assist from Lamola.

   This fired the side up and for the last 6 minutes of the game they
   tried with determination to create another chance. They cam close but
   could just not get the finsihing needed to equalise.

   We have another long break now as there are 2 weeks of internationals
   being played. But we return to the field with a 19h30 away game against
   Cape Town City on the 4th April at Cape Town Stadium
   [newsstory-e1521178815721-150x150.jpg]

   It is going to be all concentration at Princess Magogo Stadium tomorrow
   night as we take on Orlando Pirates in the ABSA Premiership. Kick-off
   at 20h15.

   Putting our unfortunate draw 2 weeks ago against Polokwane City behind
   us, it has been preparation on all fronts for tomorrows encounter at
   home against the Bucs.

   The team and coaching staff have put in the hard work in preparation
   for the game. We are expecting both a physical and mental game against
   them and have been getting ourselves into a positive place mentally for
   this encounter.

   Our opponents will be looking to redeem some pride after failing to
   beat Cape Town City in the Nedbank Cup on Wednesday night. Not a team
   to lick their wounds, they tend to fight back on the field, and their
   energy will be focused wholely on the league now.

   They are just four points off topping the log and will want to get as
   close to Sundowns as they can.

   We have more to fight for, and 3 points from a home win can put us back
   into the Top8 and help keep that objective on the cards for us.

   We appeal to all of our supporters to get behind us on Saturday night.
   Come in numbers in support to Princess Magogo Stadium. Your ever
   positive vibes will do wonders in getting behind the team.

   The game will be televised on SS4 with the coverage starting at 20h00.
   We will cover the game on social media should you not be in the greater
   Durban area to attend the game.

   Lets fill Princess Magogo Stadium tomorrow night as we play to
   #BeatTheBucs
   [spainer-e1520951576817-150x150.jpg]

   We are getting geared up and counting down the days till our second
   European tour to Spain as part of our prize for winning the Multichoice
   Diski Challenge this season.

   We are preparing for our exciting departure on Saturday as we will jet
   off to play the beautiful game in Madrid and Barcelona. We leave on
   Saturday 17th March and return 10 days later after an action packed
   tour.

   The first stop on our epic tour when we arrive will be the Santiago
   Bernabeu Stadium where we will watch Spansh legends Real Madrid play
   Girona in a La Liga match.

   We will be playing 3 games while on tour. These will be against Rayo
   Vallecona, a La Liga 2 side, Barcelona Reserves and lastly Espanyol
   Reserve.

   Both the players and the techical staff are really excited about the
   upcoming trip which has a action packed schedule.

   Day 1 (Sunday, 18 March) – Watch La Liga Match Real Madrid vs Ginora
   Day 2 (Monday, 19 March) – Match day vs. Rayo Vallecano U19
   Day 3 (Tuesday, 20 March) – Training Session at Real Madrid Sport City
   and Santiago Bernabeu tour
   Day 4 (Wednesday, 21 March) – Training Session and Travel to Barcelona
   Day 5 (Thursday, 22 March) – Match Day vs FC Barcelona U20
   Day 6 (Friday, 23 March) – Training session and Camp Nou Stadium tour
   Day 7 (Saturday, 24 March) – Training Session and Recreation
   Day 8 (Sunday, 25 March) – Training Session
   Day 9 (Monday, 26 March) Match Day vs RCD Espanyol U20 and Travel to
   Madrid
   Day 10 (Tuesday, 27 March) Departure Spain to Johannesburg
   [sableague-e1520419650809-150x150.jpg]

   Our reserve side continues to have a positive season. Last Sunday we
   played Folweni All Stars and had a convincing 5-1 win over our
   opponents, with Dlozi Ndaba getting a brace while Lizwi Nxele, Sanele
   Khumalo and Thabiso Msane all found the back of the net.

   We have played 7 games to date, and have a game in hand, which we need
   to catch up. We have won 4, drawn 2 and lost just 1 to accumulate a
   total of 14 points. At present we are sitting third on the log, three
   points behind Jahman Stars and 6 points behind log leaders Summerfield
   Dynamos. Both these teams however have played a game more than us.

   We have a fixture this Sunday against Wentworth Leeds at Tara Road. The
   game is scheduled to be played at 15h00.

   Leeds will be eager to secure a home win as they are currently bottom
   of the log.

   Attached is the log

                                                     GP W D L GF GA GD  P
                                 Summerfield Dynamos 8  6 2 0 21 9  12  20
                                        Jahman Stars 8  5 2 1 24 10 14  17
                                       Golden Arrows 7  4 2 1 15 6   9  14
                                          Kharwastan 7  4 2 1 18 12  6  14
                                   Folweni All Stars 7  3 1 3 14 19 -5  10
                                           Umbumbulu 7  2 1 4 11 15 -4  7
                                             Toronto 7  2 0 5 11 16 -5  6
                                       Merewent Aces 8  1 3 4 5  25 -20 6
                                           Amazayoni 7  1 2 4 14 13  1  5
                                               Leeds 8  1 1 6 12 20 -8  4

   [ccpolokwane-e1520256280666-150x150.jpg]

   Saying we’re disappointed would be an understatement. Another strong
   showing from our team but very little to show in terms of not getting
   maximum points.

   We are very proud of the commitment and performance level displayed by
   the team. To concede an equalizer with seconds remaining feels like a
   loss but we will take lots of positives from the performance. When you
   concede to a goal like Tlolane’s, you’ve got to give credit to the
   player and accept the result although we knew we done enough to win the
   match.

   Under different circumstances we would probably be saying it’s a good
   point away from home but not in this case.
   [diskishield-e1520255411889-150x150.jpg]

   The PSL and Multichoice have announced the launch of a new competition…
   The MultiChoice Shield,which will run from the 7th of April until the
   5th of May this year with a total of 24 fixtures.

   In the first round of the tournament, clubs will play each other once
   and the club with the most points at the end of the pool stages will
   progress to the semi-finals. The ‘Clash of the Cities’ stage will then
   see the winning teams progress to the semi-final stage of the
   competition.

   There will be four regional pools that the 16 PSL clubs will be divided
   into. Central, Coastal East, Coastal West and Northern. Each pool will
   consist of four clubs who will be looking to top that region before
   advancing to the semi finals. This quest for supremacy has been dubbed
   ‘Ubani Ibhoza Ngakini?’ which means ‘Who’s the boss in your hood?’

   The breakdown of the pools are as follows:
   Central: Orlando Pirates, Kaizer Chiefs, Platinum Stars and Bidvest
   Wits.
   Coastal East: AmaZulu, Lamontville Golden Arrows, Maritzburg United and
   Chippa United.
   Coastal West: Cape Town City, Ajax Cape Town, Bloemfontein Celtic and
   Free State Stars
   Northern: Mamelodi Sundowns, SuperSport United, Polokwane City and
   Baroka FC.

   The winners of the MultiChoice Diski Shield will receive a trophy and
   R150 000 towards a football development initiative for a local
   community of their choice.

   Fixtures are not as yet finalised and will be released in due course.
   [finstorypolokwane-e1520274311530-150x150.jpg]

   A last second heart breaking equaliser from Tlolane for Polokwane City
   saw us share the spoils at the Old Peter Mokaba Stadium this afternoon
   in a spirited performance from the side.

   The first half was an uneventful one for both teams in the first 45. We
   managed to create some promising opportunities to score, but just
   failed to finish our chances.

   Just 7 minutes from half time, Magubane could have opened the scoring
   as he played into position on the far side. He connected the ball in a
   direct challenge, and Chigova managed to make a save. If Magubane had
   tried to chip the keeper the result may have been different.

   Needless to say, we went into the break with no score on the board.

   Returning to the field, we looked eager to make an early break in the
   second stanza. Ndwandwe had a fantastic assist as he fed Lamola
   advancing up the middle of the field. Lamola took his chance, had the
   shot and opened the scoring for us.

   This fired the side up, and Chigova did well to make a double save just
   5 minutes later as we attacked at will.

   The didn’t make City give up, as they fought back on the counter and
   equalized 10 minutes later through their substitute Musona.

   Magubane then gave us the lead again with a well weighted shot from
   distance that managed to curl around 2 defenders and beat Chigova to
   give us the lead.

   What looked like an away win for us, was snatched away in the last
   seconds of the game as a persistant POlokwane City secured a draw with
   a cannoned shot from Tlolane.

   We will have the next two weeks to prepare for our home game against
   Orlando Pirates on the 17th March at Princess Magogo Stadium. Kick off
   at 20h15
   [polostory-e1520050676660-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow we have another opportunity to strengthen our log standing as
   we take on Polokwane City at the Old Peter Mokaba Stadium.

   The return game should be an interesting one. We played Polokwane in
   the first round of the competition in October at Princess Mogogo
   Stadium, as we played to a 2-2 draw

   Tomorrows game will be of the same caliber. The team have been in a
   positive space after the win last weekend against Ajax Cape Town, and
   it will be important to stay in that space as we head onto the field.

   We will need to secure the win to distance ourselves away from the
   relegation zone and tomorrows game promises to be the perfect
   opportunity to do so.

   Polokwane City are fighting to get off the bottom of the log as well
   ,and they will make it difficult to snatch a win against them. They
   currently have 23 points after 21 games and a win will push them up the
   log into a more promising position.

   Their last 2 ABSA Premiership fixtures have seen them draw to both
   Baroka and Ajax Cape town. This is proof that they have the potential
   to fight for a win when their backs are against the wall.

   From this stand point they can be dangerous on the field, and this is
   something we will need to take into consideration in our final
   preparations for the game.

   The game will be shown live on SS4, and we will as always keep you
   informed on the game over our social media platforms. So follow us on
   Facebook or Twitter if you don’t yet do so.
   [ccajax-e1519713852949-150x150.jpg]

   We started the match positively and settled into an early rhythm. Our
   shape was good and we looked dangerous in attack.

   Our attacking quartet of Lamola,Magubane,Ndwandwe and Venter constantly
   took the game to our opponents and we were rewarded when Lamola was
   brought down inside the box. Mzava made no mistake from the spot and we
   went into the break 1-0 up.

   The 2nd half was all about maintaining our discipline and not making
   any defensive errors and we did that with aplomb. Mbaeva had very
   little to do as our defense comfortably handled everything that Ajax
   threw at us.

   A deserved 3 points and now away to Polokwane as we try to keep our top
   8 hopes alive.
   [1stajax-e1519577483794-150x150.jpg]

   A penalty in the 26th minute secured a win against Ajax Cape Town at
   the Princess Magogo Stadium this afternoon.

   In a must win situation for both sides, the players stepped up to the
   plate and fought hard to ensure 3 points at home.

   The first half saw both sides fighting to try dominate the game . This
   created a well fought battle on the field with the teams trying to
   execute their game plans,

   Ajax looked at using a brisk wind to their advantage in the first half
   and played long balls but were unable to get behind the defence as they
   wanted to.

   Lamola was close to scoring in the 16th minute after a well executed
   cross from Venter. But the resulting attempt was tipped away by
   Petersen.

   The pressure from us paid off in the 26th minute when Lamola was fouled
   in the box and we were awarded a penalty. Mzava made no mistake and
   gave us a lead going into the break.

   The visitors seemed on the back foot after this and needed to
   consolidate at the break.

   They came back strong in the first 10 minutes of the second half, using
   Zwane on the wing to try and break the defence and create scoring
   chances.

   We held them well and created a number of chances for ourselves, But
   were not able to increase the lead. Ajax then opened up their attack in
   the 65th minute looking for an equaliser.

   We managed to hold them off though and at the end secured the win and
   the welcomed 3 points.

   We travel to Polokwane next where we meet Polokwane City on the 4th of
   March at 15h30.
   [diskifinal2-e1519576887443-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski team have managed to set another record by acquiring 35
   points in a season with their win over Bidvest Wits this afternoon.

   The team came onto the pitch wanting to show domination over the
   opponent’s from the first minute.

   This game plan paid off for them as Convo opened the scoring in the
   21st minute.

   He then managed to get his brace in the 86th minute to secure the win
   for the team in a game that saw a fantastic team effort put in from all
   of the players.

   A well deserved win from the side and a fitting finish as we get
   crowned the MDC Champions for the second time.
   [findiski-e1519451928358-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski boys play their last game of the season tomorrow as we face
   Bidvest Wits at King Zwelithini at 13:00.

   We have already made history by becoming the first team to win the
   Multichoice Diski twice after beating Orlando Pirates at the Makhulong
   Stadium last weekend. An important win because at that stage a number
   of teams were still in contention for the cup, including Pirates, Bloem
   Celtic and Maritzburg United.

   Tomorrows games will determine the runners up in the competition and is
   still an important game for us and the remaining teams.

   Wits will be playing for their pride. They are sitting 11th on the log
   and would like to finish of the season with a win. We also still have a
   lot to play for as we would like to finish the season on 35 points
   which is something that’s never been done before.

   We will get our crowning glory after the game, and are looking forward
   to receiving the trophy in KwaZulu Natal.

   If you have not got a ticket, you can still go to the offices at King
   Zwelithinin to pick one up today at 13:00 in order to gain entrance to
   the game tomorrow. The tickets are free and required to gain entrance
   to the stadium.

   Because its a festival, the game will be televised on SS4. And we will
   also be keeping you up to date on proceedings over Twitter and
   Facebook.
   [ajaxstory-e1519369318285-150x150.jpg]

   We are in for another tough game on Sunday as we host Ajax cape Town at
   Princess Magogo Stadium at 15h15.

   With both teams fighting for points in the ABSA Premiership at the
   moment, both of the sides are going to want to take the ball to their
   opponents at all opportunities and look to find the back of the net.

   With a number of injury issues in the squad at the moment, our
   objective is a difficult one to achieve. That being said, we have been
   playing some promising football of late, but have been unfortunate in
   not being able to find the right finishing touches.

   Having lost 2 and drawn 1 in out last 3 Premiership games, the time has
   come to turn a corner and secure a win in the competition.

   Ajax Cape Town are also battling with points at present. They sit 15th
   on the log and have managed 5 wins so far in the season. They too are
   hungry for points to climb up the log.

   In their last 2 fixtures they have drawn 1-1 against Polokwane City and
   upset Pirates 3-0 almost a month ago.

   Its set to be an action packed game with both sides fighting hard to
   get maximum points.

   Home support is so important to the team and we urge you to get to the
   stadium and get behind the team.

   The game will be televised on SABC 1, but we urge supporters to please
   get down to princess magogo stadium and get behind the team. We will
   also be keeping you up to date with the game over our socail media
   platforms.
   [witscc-e1519110119787-150x150.jpg]

   We started the game and controlled much of the opening 30 but found
   ourselves a goal down when Mhango headed freely at the near post on 30
   minutes.

   It became even harder when we conceded a second after a penalty was
   surprisingly awarded to our opponents after hitting our player in the
   face.

   The 2nd half was a one sided affair as we had Wits pegged back and had
   at least three good chances to equalize or even take the lead. Our
   inability to defend our box has been our Achilles heel this season and
   if we are to get out of this rut we will have to improve the way we
   defend.
   [piratesnews-e1518957359678-150x150.jpg]

   We have secured the Multichoice Diski title for the second time with
   our 2-0 win over Orlando Pirates this afternoon at Makhulong Stadium.

   The game was a tight affair, with Orlando Pirates showing periods of
   domination in the first 45 minutes. They kept us on our toes, trying to
   push the ball behind our defence and creating scoring opportunities.
   With a number of teams still being in contention for the cup, including
   Pirates, the game was bound to be a fighting affair from the beginning.

   Both Naicker and Tsotesti then needed to step up later in the half when
   the tempo of the game increased and both Pirates and us looked at
   taking more chances on goal.

   Neither of us managed to make a break through though and we went into
   the break at a nil all deadlock.

   Returning to the park, it seemed as if both Pirates and us were waiting
   for the game plan to be evident. We backed off and waited for Pirates
   to bring the game to us, and it seemed they were of the same intention.

   With 2 replacements at the break, we wanted to play a stronger
   attacking game. The inclusion of Mathenjwa and Molefe onto the field
   did not have the immediate impact we wanted, but when N.Dube came on to
   bolster our attack the game changed.

   He made a good impact on the field, and we broke the defensive line
   number of times through him. He was then brought down in the box by
   Tsotesti and we were awarded a penaly which Sibiya stepped up to
   convert.

   Just over 10 minutes later we were awarded a free kick in a promising
   position. Sibiya once again managed to find the back of the net,
   securing us the win.

   A well deserved win for the youngster in Tembisa this afternoon. They
   will return to Durban and make preparations for the final game of the
   season to be played against Bidvest Wits in Johannsburg on Sunday 25th
   at 12h00.
   [bidvestresult-e1518883405273-150x150.jpg]

   We have been beaten by The Clever Boys at Princess Magogo stadium in a
   game that had some controversial decisions. A determined 90 minute
   fight by the side was not enough to secure the win as we never created
   enough chances against a determined opponent.

   Neither side managed to dominate play in a game that saw end to end
   play. With Bidvest Wits attacking at any opportunity they could, they
   got their break through in the 29th minute when Mhango found the back
   of the net off a tight angled header from a Hlanti cross.

   Just before the break, they were then given a gift with a penalty after
   referee Gomes deemed a ball that came off Skipper Mathiane’s face as a
   hand ball. Majoro made no mistake and the visitors went into the change
   rooms with a 2-0 advantage.

   The determination of our players shone in the second half. With two
   replacements coming out of the change room as we tried to bolster our
   attack with Mutizwa and Ndwandwe, the side dug hard to fight back.

   Some enterprising play from Jappie and Zuke saw opportunities being
   created up front as Mutizwa and Lamola received ball. But the finishing
   was just not there. We were awarded a penalty in the 60th minute. The
   ball was placed and Mutizwa’s shot hit the upright.

   Again, the fight came through and we defended well while using our
   possession to drive into the opposition last third.

   Ndwandwe was then on the receiving end of a bad tackle in the box in
   the 74th minute. Mzava was called on to take the kick and made no
   mistake in beating Keet.

   The team were just not able to find the finishing they were looking
   for. Although they managed to create a number of promising
   opportunities, we could not find the back of the net again.

   We will need to consolidate during the week and prepare for another
   home battle next weekend when we face Ajax Cape Town at home on Sunday,
   25th at 15h15.
   [diskipirates-e1518847048693-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrows Multichoice Diski game against Orlando Pirates could be the
   deciding game in whether we walk away with the title for the second
   time, or whether we fight to the bitter end with four other clubs who
   could still be in contention.

   Victory against the Bucaneers will see us lifting the cup again and
   winning the title. Failure to do so will allow a margin for either
   Orlando Pirates, Bloemfontein Celtic, Ajax Cape Town or Maritzburg
   United to still be in hot contention.

   We have had a rock solid performance this season and showed amazing
   unity. Our youngsters perform on the field and show unity off the field
   as well.

   Tomorrow we will play in the Festival taking place in Thembisa. Entry
   to the Makhulong Stadium is free, but fans must be in possession of a
   ticket.

   The game will be televised on SS4 and we will be keeping you informed
   of proceeding in this nail biting game over our social media channels.

   After just 5 games in the Reserve league we are sitting in a positive
   position.

   A late start to the season saw just one game being played before the
   break in December. The remainder of the games have been played since
   returning from the break and the youngsters are showing some promising
   form.

   Sitting joint second on the log, just a point behind Summerfield
   Dynamo’s who are top of the log. Our youngsters are building a solid
   foundation so for their season.

   After 5 games played we have won 3, drawn 1 and lost 1 to accumulate 10
   points so far.

   A solid and promising start from the team. We look forward too seeing
   how they progress.

   The table so far is as follows:
                       P W D L GF GA GD  PTS
   Summerfield Dynamos 5 3 2 0 12 4   8  11
   Kharwastan          5 3 1 1 12 7   5  10
   Golden Arrows       5 3 1 1 10 5   5  10
   Jahman Stars        5 2 2 1 16 9   7   8
   Folweni All Stars   4 2 1 1 9  8   1   7
   Umbumbulu           5 2 0 3 10 12 -2   6
   Toronto             5 2 0 3 10 13 -3   6
   Leeds               5 1 1 3 6  10 -4   4
   Merewent Aces       5 1 1 3 3  15 -12  4
   Amazayoni           4 0 1 3 5  10 -5   1
   [lgawits17feb-150x150.jpg]

   We play our return fixture against Bidvest Wits tomorrow at The
   Princess Magogo Stadium. Kickoff at 15h30.

   This will be our third game played against The Clever Boys in the
   2017/18 season. Our first encounter was in August in an MTN8 fixture,
   which we ended losing on penalties. Our second game against them was a
   month later at Wits Stadium, where we walked away triumphant after
   winning 3-1.

   Wits will be looking to level the Premiership rivalry for the season
   and once again its a battle for position heading into this game.

   We are currently 12th on the log, just a point and position above the
   Braamfontein based side. All teams are looking for full points in their
   games now, with a very tight log at the moment with less than 10 points
   determining a Top8 spot, its a do or die situation.

   Both the coaching staff and the team know that we need to secure points
   in our games to ensure a good finish to the season. We have the
   dedication and determination to do the job, and are hoping to put our
   money where our mouth is tomorrow afternoon.

   The Clever Boys are in a similar position and will be hoping to take
   away all 3points home with them.

   The game will be televised but we appeal to our supporters to fill the
   stadium in green and gold, get behind the side and help to encourage
   them as they do battle.

   We will cover the game on social media should you not be in the Durban
   area and are unable to attend the game.
   [kcnews-e1518363845968-150x150.jpg]

   We have been knocked out of the Nedbank Cup this afternoon by Kaizer
   Chiefs at FNB Stadium.

   In a game that looked like it could have gone either way in the first
   half, it was three goals in the second stanza that stamped our exit of
   the 2018 edition of the competition.

   We played a good first half in which it seemed like Chiefs dominated
   play but gave away possession and allowed us to play on the counter and
   into the last third. We were just not able to finish our chances
   though, and the lack of taking advantage of this made our game
   difficult.

   We had some good moments that we were not able to capitalise on. We
   lost Mahachi in the first half due to an ankle injury and then needed
   to replace Nonyane in the second half because of a similar injury.

   The exit of Nonyane was after Chiefs took advantage of his injury and
   scored their second off the boot of Parker.

   The home side then sealed the game just three minutes later when
   Malongoane scored for the hosts.

   Although a loss, there was promising play from Conco on his debut and
   once again Ndwandwe did not fail to perform.

   We will need to assess our injury situation now ahead of our home game
   next weekend when we face Bidvest Wits at home at Princess Magogo
   Stadium.
   [last32-e1518155323639-150x150.jpg]

   Nedbank Cup - Last32 We get our 2018 Nedbank Cup underway on Sunday
   with a Last32 round fixture against Kaizer Chiefs at FNB Stadium at
   15h30.

   A welcomed reprieve from the PSL, Coach Larsen and the team will be
   eager to cause an early upset and knock out the Glamour Boys in this
   round.

   With the Multichoice Diski also having a break this weekend, Coach
   Larsen says it could be an opportunity for some of the youngsters to
   prove themselves on the field with the first team.

   Last year we enjoyed a positive run in the cup. We played Maritzburg
   United in the Last 32 and progressed to the semi-finals after beating
   them.

   Our semi-final was a home affair against Pirates who scored in the 34th
   minute and held on for the win.

   Coach Larsen feels this competition is one where the underdogs can
   shine, and so far in this years competition we have seen just that with
   Ubuntu Cape Town having knocked out Polokwane City on Wednesday night.

   Other games that have been played so far has seen Amazulu beat Mthatha
   Bucks 3-2 on penalties and Cape Town City eliminate Bidvest Wits 1-0.

   The game will be televised but we encourage you to get to the stadium
   if you can and support us away from home. We will keep you up-to-date
   on our social media platforms during the duration of the game as well.
   [larsen-e1518001761449-150x150.jpg]

   The #NedbankCup Press conference took place this afternoon at the Moses
   Mabhida stadium, representing the club was head coach Clinton Larsen

   Coach Larsen belives that we can do well in the Nedbank Cup this
   season, and improve on the semi-final position we achieved last season.

   This was his point of view as he adressed journlists today at a Nedbank
   Cup press conference at Moses Mabhida Stadium.

   ‘I believe we are going into the Cup as underdogs, and the Nedbank Cup
   is a competition that can be won by underdogs. That’s what makes it an
   exciting competition to play.’ said Coach Larsen. “We are a strong unit
   of players, and the Cup gives us reprieve from the PSL and allows us to
   shift focus to the Cup. The stage couldn’t be better to have some of
   the Diski players showcase themselves, and we are excited to see them
   prove themselves’

   Larsen then went on to say how the Nedbank Cup can be a competition of
   upsets and that We are aiming at upsetting Kaizer Chiefs at FNB Stadium
   on Sunday. He said that he feels Chiefs are one of the teams expected
   to be able to lift the trophy and that We want to be the team to cause
   the upset and proceed in the competition.

   Date: Sunday 11 February
   Venue: FNB stadium
   Time: 15:30
   Opponents: Kaizer Chiefs
   [coachamazulu-e1517761295647-150x150.jpg]

   Clinton Larson on the AmaZulu game In football you don’t always get
   what you deserve as was the case against Amazulu. Credit also goes to
   our opponents who fought hard for their victory.

   After going into the lead we needed to get the second to make their
   task all the more difficult but let them back in, less than 10 minutes
   later. After equalizing Amazulu gained more confidence and during that
   spell got what became the winner.

   We fought hard for the equalizer but to no avail. Still proud of the
   effort our players gave.
   [derbyfin-e1517691164582-150x150.jpg]

   Durban was delivered the Derby game it was promised tonight as we took
   on AmaZulu at King Zwelithini Stadium.

   The first half was an action packed 45 minutes that saw neither side
   scoring for their efforts that were put in on the field. It was a
   classic battle for both ball and field, with each team looked to make
   plays with their possession and try to make fast counter plays on ball
   turn over.

   We produced some great chances with Venter coming close in the 13th
   minute, but his shot was wide off the mark.

   Although a valiant effort from both sides, neither were able to take a
   lead going into the break. It was evident that the game was going to
   produce an entertaining second 45, and that it did.

   After returning to the field. AmaZulu looked determined to dominate. It
   was Mutizwa however that put the goal in the back of the net and opened
   the scoring after beating the defence and then passig Mbatha on the
   left to score.

   The lead was short lived though as AmaZulu clawed one back with Mnguni
   getting behind our defence and poking the ball in. He then went on to
   get his brace with a drive shot in off an assist from Mabiliso.

   We were then reduced to 10 men after Venter was sent to the change room
   for a dangerous tackle.

   The battle was on to find an equaliser and we were given a ray of light
   as Morton was found on the end of a red card decision also for
   dangerous play.

   We could not manage to break the defence again however, and tried high
   balls into the box, switch plays from the right an direct plays up the
   middle to try and get into a favourable position to score.

   Mbatha did well for the hosts to deny our efforts and in the end the
   referee’s whistle blew for the last time in the Derby, awarding it to
   Amazulu.

   The team will go back to the drawing board and some serious preparation
   for the next ABSA Premiership game.

   We will however have a break from the tournament as we travel to FNB
   Stadium next weekend to take on Kaizer Chiefs in the first round of the
   Nedbank Cup.
   [diskiajaxfin-e1517654876888-150x150.jpg]

   This mornings Multichoice Diski game delivered all that a top of the
   table clash should as we ended up sharing the spoils with Ajax Cape
   Town in a 6 goal thriller.

   Ajax opened the scoring in the 9th minute off the boot of Traore after
   they did well to beat our defence on the left and open up enough space
   to get into a scoring position and making no mistake in doing so.

   We found ourselves on the back foot a bit but showed determination in
   fighting back and playing up into the last third. We created a number
   of opportunities, but we just were not able to finish as cleanly as we
   would have liked to.

   There were moments when we lacked concentration at the back, with
   Sibisi trying to plug holes in the defence. He managed to close the
   gaps at stages, but again in the 37th minute Ajax managed to break
   through and a well placed kick into the top of the net by Phohlongo saw
   the home side take the lead.

   We managed to pull a goal back in the dying minutes of the first half
   as S.Parasnath scored from a free kick after Khwela was fouled outside
   of the box.

   Both teams returned showing determination to score again in the second
   stanza. We worked well and created a number of scoring chances, but
   were just not able to get the edge on the opposition.

   A change on the field saw Sibiya replacing Falakhe and he bought the
   injection of energy we were looking for. Just minutes after coming on
   he was involved in a play that saw him equalise for us.

   This put the fight back in the side, and allowed us to play back into
   the game. An end to end battle ensued and in the 79th minute we took
   the lead off a goal from substitute N.Dube.

   With just 10 minutes to play for we needed only to ensure that the
   hosts never scored. But, as promised Ajax bought the game to us.
   Putting pressure on in the last 3rd. In the dying minutes we conceded a
   number of free kicks on the edge of the box and managed to clear two.

   But it was in the last minute of additional play that we conceded
   again, allowing Losper to equalise for the hosts.

   An exciting game from both sides.

   We will return to Durban and prepare for our next game against Orlando
   Pirates on the 18th of February at King Zwelithini Stadium.
   [imgpsh_fullsize-e1517547581524-150x150.jpg]

   Durban Derby We have the return Derby tomorrow night at King Zwelithini
   when we face AmaZulu in our weekend ABSA PSL fixture.

   The game, set to be an epic battle for bragging rights is an important
   game for both teams on so many fronts. Currently we are sitting at
   equal points in the competition, with Amazulu sitting a place below us
   only on goal difference.

   The determination of the side has been evident in the last couple of
   games. This weekend they will need to put on their true colours and
   convert that determination into goals, and retain the Derby bragging
   rights against Usuthu. We need to secure more wins as we head into the
   core of the season. With a league as tight as it is now, taking full
   points from a game is imperative,

   Usuthu climbed three places after their win againt SuperSport United on
   Wednesday night and will be hoping for a home win to continue their
   momentum.

   They will also be looking to take the win after we beat them 4-1 in an
   entertaining encounter in September. The game was a typical Derby one,
   with both teams fighting hard for the win. Although a fantastic final
   score, it was a game that could have gone either way.

   Tomorrow nights game will be on the same level as far as entertainment
   goes. AmaZulu will be well prepared and wanting to secure a home win.

   Tickets for Saturday are R40 at Computicket & Umlazi Mega City Spar.

   We are appealing to all our supporters to wear your green and gold,
   lets get to King Zwelithini in numbers to support the team in this
   important encounter.
   [diskiajax-e1517479295861-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski boys travel to Ikamva Stadium this weekend as they take on
   Ajax Cape Town in a top of the log clash on Saturday at 10am.

   We are heading to the end of the season for the team, who, though hard
   work and determination from the players and the coaching staff alike,
   have managed to secure their position at the top of the log with 28
   points.

   This is a 5 point lead ahead of Ajax Cape Town, and 6 points ahead of
   3rd placed Bloemfontein Celtic. As the saying goes, “its not over ’till
   the fat lady sings”, and this will be the attitude from the side as
   they take to the field on Saturday.

   Ajax have everything to play for. A win for them could narrow our lead
   on the top of the table by 2 points, and there will be no love lost
   from them as they host us.

   As always, a very interesting and exciting position for the team to be
   in, and this will add to the pressures they face on the field.

   Our game is not part of a festival and will not be televised, but
   follow our social media platforms for updates on the game as it
   happens.
   [barokacc-e1517227664811-150x150.jpg]

   After a positive start where we maintained good possession and arrived
   with relative ease in the final 3rd, we just could not find the final
   pass. We conceded against the run of play through a defensive error but
   maintained our composure to draw level before the break ,through a well
   taken Venter goal.

   Baroka had two good chances that we’re excellently saved by Gumede. We
   dominated the 2nd half and took the lead through Mutizwa, only to
   concede with 15 minutes remaining after we could not effectively clear
   our lines.

   We pushed hard for a winner and came close as Chideu, Nonyane, Lamola,
   Mutizwa and Magubane all had chances. Another unwanted draw but a much
   improved team performance nevertheless.
   [barokaresult-e1517157317849-150x150.jpg]

   We have drawn another game at home this afternoon against Baroka FC at
   Princess Magogo Stadium. A win would have pushed us into the top 8 but
   it was not to be today in the 4 goal game against Baroka FC.

   We dominated possession on the field and did well to play into the
   visitors last 3rd, but we lacked the finishing we were aiming for.
   Gumede made a telling save in the 12th minute, tipping a shot from
   Mdantsane onto the bar.
   We then allowed Baroka to open the scoring in the 17th minute as Moputa
   played in from the far side, beating Zuke and slotting the ball between
   Gumede’s legs.

   Our persistance paid off just before the break, with Venter equalising.
   He cut in from the far side, beat two defenders and managed to get the
   ball on his left foot, taking the shot and finding the back of the net.

   Coming out after the break, Coach Larsen made a change, bringing Lamola
   on for Mahachi. Just 10 minutes in he missed an opportunity with a
   header that found the side netting.

   We managed to take the lead after Mutizwa slotted the ball in off a
   rebound from Vries after Lamola had taken a shot that Vries failed to
   control.

   The lead was short lived though as we allowed Baroka to play back into
   the game. A scramble for possession in the box left Motupa free again,
   and he made no mistake in finding his mark again to equalise.

   We put up a fight to try and secure a lead again, and created a number
   of scoring chances, but were just not on target and unable to find the
   back of the net.

   We will have a tough week of preparation ahead of our Derby game
   against AmaZulu next weekend at King Zwelithini Stadium.
   [ssudiskistory-e1517056638947-150x150.jpg]

   A confident Diski side beat SuperSport United at Sturrock Park in the
   Multichoice Diski Challenge.

   The win sees us add another 3 points on our lead at the top of the log
   at the moment, with second places Bloem Celtic facing AmaZulu tomorrow
   at King Zwelithini Stadium.

   The youngsters took the game to their hosts from the fist minute, and
   went on the attack straight after SuperSport got the game underway.

   Clear intentions from the side, that they were looking for the win and
   nothing would stop them in their quest to bring back the 3 points from
   the game.

   The attacking play paid off for us in the 20th minute when Conco scored
   off a cross from Jappie. Sabelo then increased the lead just 2 minutes
   later after S.Parusnath won the ball in the middle, made a telling
   switch to Sabelo who made no mistake in finding the back of the net.

   We went onto the break with the two goal advantage and the confidence
   of the players was evident in their determination coming back onto the
   field.

   Jappie was then rewarded for his work on the field as Conco layed the
   ball off to him in an unmarked position, which allowed him to tap the
   ball in and get the third for the day.

   SuperSport had a few good moments of play. But, outstanding work from
   our back four frustrated them. The hosts resorted to trying anything to
   get into the last third, and on one occasion played a high ball into
   the box. Dlamini fouled a player and the referee awarded SuperSport a
   penalty. Stoffels made no mistake and scored for the home team.

   The home side fought hard to get back into the game, but were just not
   able to find their rhythm and did not have it in them to break our
   defence again.

   An outstanding outing from the team who once again displayed a solid
   performance.
   [barokanewsimage-e1517028181924-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow we are back on the field as we take on Baroka FC at Princess
   Magogo Stadium at 15h30 in another important PSL fixture.

   We returned to the field in the second part of the season showing some
   determination in securing points. We have added 4 points to our tally
   of 22 so far and intend on making tomorrows encounter another full
   haul.

   Having beaten SuperSport at home and then drawing away to Chippa
   United, the Coach and team are determined that a home win is on the
   cards. The potential to win is there, and defensively we have been
   stronger in our last two outings.

   On the attack, we have looked positive too. And we just need to nail
   our final chances we create and finish off properly to increase our
   goal haul.

   Baroka FC are just 3 points ahead of us at the moment, sitting at eight
   place on the log, and a win over them will go a long way in us trying
   to finish in the top8 again this season.

   Baroka have had a mixed of results from their last three encounters.
   They lost to Chiefs in their last game, but before that beat Amazulu
   2-0 after suffering a loss to Orlando Pirates.

   The team have big game temperament and they will surely be bringing it
   to the Stadium tomorrow.

   We would like to call on all of our supporters to come to the stadium.
   Tickets will be on sale at the gates. R40 for Adults and just R10 for
   kids under 12.

   Lets try and fill the stands as much as possible.
   [diskisupersport-e1516942391152-150x150.jpg]

   Our Diski team will play their fourth to last match in the 2017/18
   installment of the Multichoice Diski tournament this weekend against
   SuperSport United.

   We have had a promising season again, with 11 games played to date,
   having lost 2, drawn one and won 8 of our encounters, accumulating a
   total of 25 points. This sees us sitting only 3 points ahead of Bloem
   Celtic at the moment, but in a position that we would like to hold onto
   at the business end of the season.

   SuperSport United are just 7 points behind, sitting on 18 points on the
   log. This means they could still be in contention for the title if they
   win their last fixtures of the season.

   This once again, will set the foundation for an exciting game in the
   competition. It’s a have to win situation for any team who still has a
   chance in the competition, and Saturdays game at Sturrock Park is just
   that.

   Remember, all games that ar not part of a diski festival are free of
   charge. So get to the stadium and catch these youngsters in action.
   [reserves-e1516809965430-150x150.jpg]

   Our Reserve side returned to the field this past weekend after their
   December holiday break.

   The team is an important part of our development program, as it is from
   this platform that the young players move onto the Diski side and
   possibly to the first team.

   The season is still young, with only one game played before the break
   and then the game played on Sunday against Summerfield Dynamos.

   The teams shared the spoils in an entertaining 2-2 draw. This gives us
   4 points so far in the season after wining our first game against
   Jahman.

   The team continues their season this weekend when we face Merewent Aces
   on Sunday at Tara Road with a 15h00 kickoff.
   [coachescomchippa-e1516610750935-150x150.jpg]

   In a game where neither team created any clear scoring chances it was
   important to at least take a point home.

   We were organized defensively and showed good attacking intent, but
   could not carve out any clear scoring chances.

   We are happy with the discipline and commitment shown by our players.
   [chipparesult-e1516550754271-150x150.jpg]

   We have drawn against Chippa United this afternoon at Nelson Mandela
   Bay in Port Elizabeth.

   It was not an easy game,with the Chilli Boys throwing all they had at
   us from the opening minutes of the game. The first half saw them enjoy
   more shots on goal than we did, but the defensive play from us was
   solid at the back and didnt give them the space they needed to finish
   off properly.

   We had only two shots at goal in the first 45, but they were on target,
   and Akpeyi made sure they were not allowed into the back of the net.

   We made a slow start in the second half, but ended up showing a bit
   more domination of the ball. Coach Larson made a double sub, bringing
   on Shongwe and Magubane hoping to inject a bit of pace into the game.
   But this tactic unfortunately never paid off.

   Both us and Chippa struggled with the final passes, and neither could
   get the break through we wanted. Chippa then brought the game to us in
   the last 10 minutes. We had to defend to deny them chances but managed
   to hold on for the draw.

   We will return to Durban and prepare for a home encounter on Sunday as
   we face Baroka FC at Princess Magogo Stadium at 15:30
   [diskinews-e1516529942905-150x150.jpg]

   We suffered a home defeat to a determined Platinum Stars this morning
   in the Multichoice Diski game at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   It was just not our day as the youngsters dominated play and posession,
   but were not able to find the back of the net. From the fist minute we
   kept posession well and spread the ball looking to find the back of the
   net. We played well both on attack and defensively with each player
   giving 100% on the field.

   We managed to create a number of scoring opportunities in the fist
   half. Sabelo, Khwela, Conco and Falakhe all had shots at goal, but we
   could not find the target. Platinum Stars were solid in their defence
   and did all they could to deny us.

   Going into the break and returning to the field, we again came back
   showing dominance. It was a counter move that caught us on the back
   foot that allowed Platinum Stars to score in the 58th minute. Dlamini
   fell back well, managed to deny an initial shot, but the ball was loose
   and Nale managed to get shot in which hit the post and deflected in for
   a goal.

   We tried to fight back after that, but determination from the visitors
   to secure a win in the competition put them on high defence. They were
   not allowing us the opportunity. Ramafsi made some telling saves and
   the remainder of the team fell back to close any gaps that could have
   allowed us to score.

   Another entertaining game from the side. They will now prepare to take
   on SuperSport United next Saturday at Lucas Moripe Stadium in our
   campaign to win the competition again this year.


   [chippaa-150x150.jpg]

   Our senior team take on 8th placed Chippa United in their back garden
   tomorrow afternoon as we travel to Port Elizabeth for our PSL game of
   the weekend.

   The team has been confident at practice this week after out win over
   SuperSport United last weekend. Morale is good ahead of our travel this
   weekend. That being said, there’s still work to be done, and another
   win away is what’s needed for the team to get into the right frame of
   mind as we get into the second half of the season.

   Chippa sit just two points ahead of us on the table. Log positions 2
   through to 8 are only separated by 5 points so there is still a lot to
   play for in the season. The Chilli Boys will want the win. Having drawn
   their last game against Wits after a win to Amazulu and before that a
   loss to Polokwane City, they too need the win for both points and team
   spirit.

   Earlier on in the season we drew 1-1 to them at Princess Magogo
   Stadium, and we will be out to get the win tomorrow.

   you can follow our live coverage of the game on our social media
   platforms. Should you be an Arrows supporter and are in the Port
   Elizabeth area, we would love to see you at the game.
   [diski21jan-e1516424648994-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow morning Our Diski boys have another opportunity to grab all 3
   points as we host Platinum Stars at the Princess Magogo Stadium at
   10h00.

   It has not been a good season for Dikwena who have yet to secure a win
   in this seasons competition. After ten games they have accumulated just
   6 points from draws.

   We have been enjoying a positive run of play in the competition. The
   determination of the youngsters is evident in their style of play and
   the attitude that they display when on the field. This has been a big
   contributing factor to their 1st place standing on the log at present.

   On the day though, the game can be anyones, and Platinum Stars could
   try and pull out all the stops to secure a win away from home against
   us.

   Remember, entrance to the game is free for Multichoice Diski games that
   are not being held in a festival format. So, come down to Princess
   Magogo tomorrow morning and catch some of the PSL’s future stars in
   action.

   We will be keeping you informed of the games proceeding on both Twitter
   and Facebook, so if you dont follow us yet, and can’t make the game,
   follow us for blow-by-blow action.
   [nedbankcup-e1516042855856-150x150.jpg]

   The draw for the 2018 Nedbank Cup took place tonight in Sandton,
   Johannesburg.

   Along with a number of innovate products that Nedbank has that run
   alongside with the competition, they have also extended their
   sponsorship of the competition for another 5 years. They also announced
   that for the first time this year, fans will be able to vote for Ke
   Yona team search players to be voted into their preferred PSL teams.

   We were represented at the draw by Assistant coach Mandla Ncikazi at
   the draw.

   We were drawn as the away team in the 4th draw against Kaizer Chiefs.

   The full draw was as follows.

   SAFA Western Cape v Orbit College
   Mariveni United VS EC Bees
   Swallows FC v Maritzburg United
   Kaizer Chiefs v Golden Arrows
   Cape Town All Stars v Mamelodi Sundowns
   SAFA Mpumalanga (TBC) v Chippa United
   Orlando Pirates v Ajax Cape Town
   Bidvest Wits v Cape Town City
   AmaZulu v Mthatha Bucks
   Super Eagles v Free State Stars
   Platinum Stars v Baroka FC
   Richards Bay v Bloemfontein Young Tigers
   Stellenbosch FC v Highlands Park
   Bloemfontein Celtic v SuperSport United
   Happy Wanderers v Royal Eagles
   Ubuntu Cape Town v Polokwane City

   The first games in the competition will be played on the 6th of
   February. A list of fixture dates will be released as soon as it is
   available.
   [newlarsen14th-e1515995998202-150x150.jpg]

   Our players showed good determination and discipline to beat a stubborn
   SuperSport team. I feel we were good value for our win yesterday as we
   kept a strong structure which was complimented with some great
   attacking play.

   Buthelezi was outstanding on his debut as he partnered Mngwengwe with
   aplomb. Another debutant, Zuke was also outstanding in midfield as he
   gave us a very calming influence in possession.

   We had some close scares late on as SuperSport went route one but
   managed to hold on.

   A much needed 3 points, clean sheet and all round solid performance
   from the team.
   [resultssu-e1515960023703-150x150.jpg]

   A fantastic team effort saw us secure a win this afternoon against
   SuperSport United in an action packed game from start to finish.

   The first half was well executed from both sides. We used the ball well
   to play up into the last third while looking to score, but never took
   as much advantage of a brisk wind behind us. There were a number of
   opportunities for us to score, in particular when Mahachi was played
   into a promising position. Pieterse came out of the box to defend and
   couldnt control the ball, it deflected but Mahachi was just not able to
   get to it and guide it into its mark.

   The teams went into the break with no score on the board and when they
   returned SuperSport came back dominating the first couple of minutes of
   play.

   We did well on the par though this afternoon.The team looked composed
   and determined. This paid off in the 80th minute as Mahachi found the
   back of the net after Pieterse failed to hold onto a shot from Venter.

   The game was far from over though, and SuperSport fought until the
   dying minutes for an equaliser. Gumede’s last 10 minutes were intense
   as he fielded a number of shots at goal from all angles.

   A good win from the team today and a great morale booster ahead of our
   trip to play Chippa next weekend on the 21st.

   A big thank you to our supporters who show dedication and belief in our
   squad.
   [supersport-e1515820574634-150x150.jpg]

   We play our first home game of 2018 tomorrow as we host SuperSport
   United at the Princess Magogo Stadium, with a 15h30 kick-off.

   It’s a must win game for us tomorrow. We have failed to secure maximum
   points in our last 12 outings, and its critical that we pull together
   and finish off on the chances we have been creating on the field.

   The commitment of the players is evident when on the field, but this
   needs to be converted into goals in order for us to climb up the log
   standings

   SuperSport have played two games already this year, and have yet to
   secure a win after drawing to Kaizer Chiefs and then losing 2-0 to
   Bidvest Wits in a midweek game this week. They are catching up their
   league matches and have only played 13 games so far this season.

   We appeal to our supporters to get to the stadium and stand behind the
   team. Your presence at the stadium is important to us in our campaign.
   Should you not be there, the game will be televised on SS4 and we will
   keep you in the know with our play-by-play feed on social media.
   [finceltic-e1515838641672-150x150.jpg]

   We have secured another 3 points in our Diski campaign after a 3-2 win
   over Bloemfontein Celtic at Dr.Molemela stadium this morning.

   The game had an explosive start for us and we dominated the play in the
   opening minutes. The early pressure paid off for us and saw Sabelo open
   the scoring in the 12th minute to give us an early lead on the hosts.

   We allowed them to play back into the game though as we dropped back
   defensively, allowing them more time on the ball to create scoring
   opportunities. We were fortunate at first that they were not able to
   finish and managed to put another 2 goals on the board through some
   great play from Conco and Mgwaba.

   Conco scored a fantastic volley shot after an amazing assist from
   Mgwaba. Mgwaba then had an opportunity to find the back of the net
   after super sub Jappie made a solid cross to the unmarked man in front
   of the goals and he made no mistake and scored!

   Celtic found their feet though and managed to pull 2 goals back on us.
   Their first goal came in the 51st minute as Modise scored right after
   Naicker made a telling save. Mabaso then got their second as we were
   found wanting at the back in the 62nd minute of play.

   The game went down to the wire, with skipper Sibisi putting his body on
   the line in the last minute of extra time to deny the home side the
   equaliser.

   The team will return to Durban where they will play a home game next
   Sunday, the 21st, against Platinum Stars at 10h00.
   [diski13jan-e1515774740591-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow our Diski team will continue their 2017/2018 Multichoice Diski
   campaign with an away game, top of the table clash against Bloemfontein
   Celtic at Dr.Molemela Stadium at 10h00.

   We’ve had a successful season thus far. Having played 9 games; winning
   7, drawing 1 and losing just 1, sitting top of the log, two points
   clear of Celtic

   Both sides have played well up to this point. And it’s important to
   secure wins from now on, as there are only six games left in the
   season. Both teams will be hungry for the 3 points to try and push away
   from the rest of the teams in the competition.

   The game is not part of the Diski Festival which is taking place at
   Tsakane Stadium, so it will not be televised.

   We will however be keeping you up-to-date with the game over both
   Facebook and Twitter. So follow us to keep in the action during the
   game.
   [zukesign-e1515426339753-150x150.jpg]

   We would like to announce the signing of Sandile Zuke to the team

   The 30 year old central midfielder started his professional career with
   Kaizer Chiefs in 2007 and has since then plied his trade with a number
   of South African clubs including Mpumalanga Black Aces, Bidvest Wits
   and more recently Chippa United.

   He played a short stint overseas for Thai based club Jumpasri United
   who participate in the Toyota Thai League.

   We would like to welcome Sandile to the club and wish him a successful
   time with us.
   [larsenbloem-e1515391580303-150x150.jpg]

   First half was probably the worst I’ve seen the team play since I
   joined. We were awful from back to front. After some strong words at
   half time and the introduction of Venter, we started to impose
   ourselves on our opponents but the damage was done in the first half as
   we trailed 2-0.

   We went for broke, pulled one back but could not get the equalizer. I
   think on the balance of play Celtic deserved to win. They have
   assembled a very strong team and at times totally played us off the
   park.

   We showed in the second half what we are capable of doing but need to
   do so over 90 minutes if we are to break this terrible run.
   [celticresult-150x150.jpg]

   We have lost this afternoon against Bloemfontein Celtic at Dr.Molemela
   Stadium in Bloemfontein.

   The home side dominated the play in the first half, managing to score
   twice before the break to set a tough foundation for us to pull back on
   in the second half.

   They dominated possession on the field and managed to break our defence
   on a number of occasions to get into a favourable position to pull the
   trigger.

   They opened the scoring in the 28th minute off the boot of Letsoalo. A
   run up the far flank set up the play. The ball was played at a tight
   angle into the box and through Gumede’s legs as he dived to try control
   the ball. Letsoalo, waiting in front of the goal, had an easy nudge in
   to open the scoring.

   The second goal came in extra time of the first half after Hotto played
   himself into a favourable position in the box. Another tight angle play
   saw him play the ball past Gumede and put the second in for the home
   side.

   Coach Larsen made a change from the break which saw Venter make his
   debut as he replaced Magubane. His inclusion in the game made a
   difference in play and saw a fresh set of play from us. Chideu was then
   bought into the mix too and we looked good on the ball again.

   We enjoyed more shots on goal and eventually pulled one back when
   Chideu scored for us in the 68th minute. This had an encouraging effect
   on the side and we had a number more shots on goal but we could just
   not find the mark.

   A tough day on the field today, but the side need to consolidate and
   turn things around as we prepare to play SuperSport United next week
   Sunday 14 January, at Princess Magogo Stadium
   [vsbloem-150x150.jpg]

   It’s the return to the Absa premiership this weekend as we take on
   Bloemfontein Celtic at Dr Molemela Stadium, Sunday afternoon at 15h30.

   Both teams will be aiming for full points. We need to secure a win to
   climb back into the Top8 of the competition.

   We drew to Celtic earlier on in the season, after Nyundu opened the
   scoring early on in the game. Mahachi equalised just before the break
   and thereafter the game was a fight to try and break a deadlock that
   saw a number of shots at goals from bith sides, but neither finding the
   back of the net.

   Currently, we are separated by just a point on the log. Bloem have 19
   points and are sitting 7th, while we are three positions below.

   Its going to be an action packed game, and one that we are capable of
   coming home with full points from.

   The game will be televised live on SuperSport4 with the match build up
   starting at 15h00.

   A play-by-play feed will also be given over our Twitter and Facebook
   feeds. So avoid the disappointment of missing the action and follow us!
   [dannyv-150x150.jpg]

   We would like to announce that we have secured the services of Danny
   Venter.

   Danny joins us from Free State Stars where he has played since 2013,
   making 59 appearances for the side, scoring 7 goals.

   Previously he played for Bloemfontein Celtic from 2010 to 2013 where he
   appeared 41 times for the club. He scored 3 goals in his time there
   with them.

   We welcome Danny to the club and wish him well with his time with
   Lamontvile Golden Arrows.

   This was definitely one of our better performances of the first
   round.We dominated the first half but could not turn that dominance
   into goals.

   The players carried out our tactical approach with aplomb. The second
   half was a lot more open with both teams attacking at will. We pushed
   hard for a winner and at times almost got caught on the counter but for
   some very strong defending from Mzava and man of the match Mngwengwe.

   A strong performance,clean sheet but again dropped two valuable points.
   [ccmu-150x150.jpg]

   This was definitely one of our better performances of the first
   round.We dominated the first half but could not turn that dominance
   into goals.

   The players carried out our tactical approach with aplomb. The second
   half was a lot more open with both teams attacking at will. We pushed
   hard for a winner and at times almost got caught on the counter but for
   some very strong defending from Mzava and man of the match Mngwengwe.

   A strong performance,clean sheet but again dropped two valuable points.
   [finmu-150x150.jpg]

   We have played to a goalless draw against Maritzburg United this
   afternoon at Princess Magogo Stadium.

   It was an uneventful first half. Both sides were reserved in their
   play, opting to try and keep possession and play up into the last third
   with short and calculated passes.

   We did see to enjoy more shots at goal, but were either just not on
   target or the shots were high over the bar. Our attacking plays were
   well orchestrated, and there was a clear intention shown, whether it
   was up the right with Dube and Ndwandwe or the left by Nonyane and
   Sibiya.

   There was great support play in the middle, with Bilankulu showing some
   dominance along with Mahachi.

   In the second half, The Team of Choice came back onto the park and
   tried to domainte the play. They retained the ball well and had a
   number of attacking plays at goal, but they could not break our
   defence.

   We managed to find our composure, and played ourselves back into the
   game. But neither sides could find that break in the last third to
   score.

   Another tough Derby game, and shared spoils for us as we head into a
   short festive break.

   We return to the field on the 7th of January as we face Bloemfontein
   Celtic away at Dr.Molemela Stadium
   [deckznderby-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow afternoon we finish off the first half of the season with a
   KZN Derby game against Maritzburg United. The game will be played at
   Princess Magogo Stadium, and will kick-off at 15h30.

   We will be looking to secure a win and 3 points from this encounter. We
   are currently 5points off the top of the log, and our last two results
   have set us back in our log position.

   A win before the break would boost morale in the camp and we have our
   eyes firmly on that target.

   We have been playing well, and have been unfortunate on not being able
   to convert well fought chances into goals. This has meant that we have
   had to settle for eight draws so far, 3 losses and only getting maximum
   points from 3 games.

   Maritzburg are always a tough team in a Derby encounter, and they will
   bring it all on Sunday. A win for them could give them a good boost up
   the log.

   We will be giving you, our fans, an up to the minute feed on the game
   should you not be able to be there. We do howver encourage you to come
   to the stadium and get behind the boys as we face our KZN rivals. And
   from previous derbies played before, this game will not be shy of
   goals. The game will be televised on SuperSport 10. Let’s get down to
   princess magogo and get behind the boys and let’s finish the year off
   on a high note
   [16decresult-150x150.jpg]

   In a game that could have gone either way in the first half, we fought
   back well and secured the 3 points to remain on top of the log going
   into the festive break.

   Both sides came onto the pitch showing intention to secure the win. In
   what was a head to head battle from the first minute, both ourselves
   and Chippa used our possession to its full advantage, playing into the
   last third and fighting to secure the opening goal.

   It was the visitors however who struck first, securing a goal off the
   boot of Lonose in the 27th minute. This put us on the backfoot for a
   while and the youngsters handled a barrage of further attacks from the
   visitors. The first half was not short of shots on goal for us, but we
   were just unable to convert our chances.

   We returned to the field after the break with determination In the
   early minutes of the half we put great pressure on the visitors goals.
   This paid off for us as we managed to pull back a goal and equalize
   with Sabelo scoring after the keeper fumbled a long range shot from
   N.Dube, and Sabelo Who was brave enough to put his head in the way of
   an oncoming keeper who tried to clear the ball, but Sabelo got there
   first to score.

   Mathenjwa then gave us the lead after coming on as a sub. Another great
   team effort saw us get into the firing zone, we had a shot on goal
   which was saved. The rebound ball was loose and Mathenjwa managed to
   get to it and push it past the keeper for the lead.

   The game however was not over then. Chippa fought hard to score again,
   and had a number of shots, but we were able to survive the attempts.

   We were also unlucky not to score again when Conco was put into
   position on the right. He had a shot that hit the post, the rebound
   ball was then controlled by Mgwaba who tried a bicycle kick. It was a
   fantastic attempt but it hit the bar and bounced straight down.

   A well fought game from the youngsters today in Umlazi to retain the
   top spot on the Diski log.

   They return to the field in the new yer with a game on the 13th January
   againt Bloemfontein Celtic at Dr Miolemela Stadium at 12h00.
   [newchippa-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow morning we play our last Diski fixture of the year, when we
   host Chippa United at King Zwelithini Stadium at 10h00.

   This game was meant to take place last weekend, however, it had to be
   rescheduled because of transport issues cause by delays at the
   airports.

   So far we have played well in our 8 encounters, and edged to the top of
   the table with a 3-1 win over Polokwane City in our last match played
   at home.

   The top 3 places are in hot contention. Ourselves and Bloemfontein
   Celtic are level on points, but we now have a game in hand, and we
   occupy the top spot because of our 1 goal difference. Supersport United
   and Maritzburg United sit third, with just a point in it at position 3
   and 4.

   With our game in hand a win tomorrow would mean that we could stretch
   our lead by 3 points at the top of the table going into the Christmas
   break.

   Chippa will be eager for a win, having played 8 games, they have
   managed to only secure 8 points so far after winning 2, drawing 2 and
   losing 4 of their outings. They are sitting 14th on the log and would
   appreciate points to improve on their standings.

   This is a tough competition, but on the day anything can happen in
   these exciting and action packed encounters.

   We encourage you to get to the stadium to catch the action. Entrance
   will be free and its a great way to start your weekend off. You will be
   able to catch some young talented players in action and the Diski
   platform showcases some fantastic talent.
   The game will not be televised, but we will keep you updated on our
   social media platform

   So disappointed for the players that they got no reward for the
   performance they gave. We are proud of the efforts they continue to
   give regardless of the result. They went pound for pound with the best
   team in the country and at times it seemed as if there was a big yellow
   bus in front of us. You don’t always get what you deserve in football
   and today was proof thereof.
   [ccsund-150x150.jpg]

   So disappointed for the players that they got no reward for the
   performance they gave. We are proud of the efforts they continue to
   give regardless of the result. They went pound for pound with the best
   team in the country and at times it seemed as if there was a big yellow
   bus in front of us. You don’t always get what you deserve in football
   and today was proof thereof.
   [finsund-150x150.jpg]

   We suffered a home defeat this afternoon to Sundowns in an exciting and
   well contested game.

   It was a tough first half, and Masandwana came onto the field to try
   and set their domination from the first minute. They attacked early and
   put us on the back foot. This allowed them to secure an opening goal in
   the 6th minute.

   Soumahoro managed to get a boot on a rebound ball and put it past
   Gumede to score.

   We fought back well, and Mahachi had a shot from range in the 10th
   minute that hit the bar and then later was disallowed a goal as he was
   deemed offside.

   Both sides fought to score again. We had a number of great movements
   but could just not break the defence.

   We stood strong at the back, with Mngwengwe and Mzava putting it all on
   the line to ensure that movements from Tau and his team mates were
   closed down.

   All in all, it was a fantastic fight from both sides and we were
   unlucky not to have equalized and gone ahead on goals as we created the
   chances.

   We will prepare for the KZN Derby next Sunday we we meet Maritzburg
   United at Princess Magogo for our last game befor the Christmas break.
   [vschippa09dec-150x150.jpg]

   Tomorrow morning we play our last diski fixture of the year, when we
   take on Chippa united at Wolfson Stadium at 10h00.

   So far we have played well in our 8 encounters, and edged to the top of
   the table with a 3-1 win over Polokwane City in our last match played
   at home.

   The top 3 places are in hot contention. Ourselves and Bloemfontein
   Celtic are level on points, with us occupying top spot because of our 1
   goal difference. Supersport United sits at third, with just 2 points in
   it.

   We will all be wanting to secure a win and try maintain our top of the
   table spot going into the Christmas break.

   Chippa will be eager for a win, having played 8 games, they have
   managed to only secure 8 points so far after winning 2, drawing 2 and
   losing 4 of their outings.

   This is a tough competition, but on the day anything can happen in
   these exciting and action packed encounters.

   Our game is not part of the Festival taking place and will not be
   televised. We will however keep you up-to-date with the progress of the
   game.
   [sundowns10122017-150x150.jpg]

   We return home to face Mamelodi Sundowns tomorrow at the Princess
   Magogo Stadium in our 14th game of the season. The game will kick off
   at 15h30.

   Its been a tough week after our 2-1 loss to Free State Stars in
   Bethlehem, but the team have not had time to mope about the game as
   preparations started as soon as we arrived back for tomorrws encounter
   with Sundowns

   With just two games left before the break, we need to collect points
   and we are determined to make tomorrows game count.

   Sundowns have been catching up their fixtures, and have made no attempt
   to hide their intentions in the process. With just 10 games under their
   belt they have quickly climbed the log. On Tuesday they never held back
   as they beat Baroka FC 4-0.

   They will come to secure a win, and Sunday should produce a great game
   to watch. Sundowns always enjoy away support and we urge you to get to
   the stadium in your Lamontville Golden Arrows colours to show support
   to the team.

   Gates open at 12h30. Tickets are R40 for adults and just R10 for kids
   under 12 and are available only at the gates. So come to Kwa Mashu,
   bring a friend and lets get behind the team!


   We definitely deserved something out of this game after a very strong
   second half showing. We struggled playing into a strong wind first half
   but used the conditions to our advantage in the second.

   We gave ourselves an uphill task after conceding after only two minutes
   of the restart. We threw everything at Stars with the score at 2-1 and
   could have equalized had it not been for some tenacious defending by
   the home team.

   Nonyane played a good 55 minutes after a lengthy lay off.Great to see
   him back giving a solid performance.
   [ccfss-150x150.jpg]

   We definitely deserved something out of this game after a very strong
   second half showing. We struggled playing into a strong wind first half
   but used the conditions to our advantage in the second.

   We gave ourselves an uphill task after conceding after only two minutes
   of the restart. We threw everything at Stars with the score at 2-1 and
   could have equalized had it not been for some tenacious defending by
   the home team.

   Nonyane played a good 55 minutes after a lengthy lay off.Great to see
   him back giving a solid performance.
   [finfss07-150x150.jpg]

   We have failed to secure a win in the ABSA Premiership tonight as we
   were defeated 2-1 by Free State Stars at Goble Park.

   In a game that saw us dominate in the majority of the first half, with
   promising shots at goal from Siyabonga Dube in the 13th minute and a
   Shot from Magubane in the 37th off a flick-on from Mutizwa, we were
   just not able to convert the chances.

   Ea Lla Koto made sure they had some promising opportunitis too, and
   Anas was unlucky to have a close range shot go wide off the mark.

   This saw the teams go into the break goalless, but Free State Stars
   returned to the field with some early attack and it paid off for them.

   Dlamini broke the deadlock as he converted a cross from Anas. He had a
   toe-poke inside the area and gave the hosts the lead.

   A short while later Jantjie took a free-kick and found his mark, taking
   Free State Stars to a 2 goal lead.

   We fought back, and we managed to pull one back as Magubane converted a
   pass from Nkombelo. But this was not enough and although we attacked
   the last third, Free State Stars dropped defensively and would just not
   let us break through.

   We will prepare for our home game on Sunday against Mamelodi Sundowns,
   and encourage you to come to Princess Magogo to lift the spirits of the
   players.
   [cccity-150x150.jpg]

   Disappointed would be an understatement. Scoring two good team goals
   then conceding through a penalty and a deflected equalizer was a tough
   way to drop two valuable points.

   We weren’t at our best for sure but neither were our opponents who did
   very little to trouble Gumede in goals.

   More points dropped at home so we have to win our next match against
   Free State Stars at all cost.

   We had chances to get a third or fourth goal but it wasn’t to be.

   Disappointed would be an understatement. Scoring two good team goals
   then conceding through a penalty and a deflected equalizer was a tough
   way to drop two valuable points.

   We weren’t at our best for sure but neither were our opponents who did
   very little to trouble Gumede in goals.

   More points dropped at home so we have to win our next match against
   Free State Stars at all cost.

   We had chances to get a third or fourth goal but it wasn’t to be.

   Another positive result on the road for the club. It’s never easy
   playing at Orlando but our players showed no fear and gave their all to
   make sure we returned with a point.

   Gumede made three good saves to keep us in the game but we also had
   opportunities which Mabokwane did well to save. We maintained good
   tactical discipline throughout and made it difficult for our opponents
   to break us down.

   We could have done much better with our counter and break attacks which
   lacked the killer final pass. Gumede and Cele were our standout
   performers on the night.
   [23nov2017-150x150.jpg]

   Another positive result on the road for the club. It’s never easy
   playing at Orlando but our players showed no fear and gave their all to
   make sure we returned with a point.

   Gumede made three good saves to keep us in the game but we also had
   opportunities which Mabokwane did well to save. We maintained good
   tactical discipline throughout and made it difficult for our opponents
   to break us down.

   We could have done much better with our counter and break attacks which
   lacked the killer final pass. Gumede and Cele were our standout
   performers on the night.

   Supersport took the lead quite fortuitously when Bilankulu slipped
   because of the soft underfoot conditions. We had the first chance of
   the game though ,when Mutizwa chipped Williams only for the ball to
   narrowly go over the crossbar.

   Conceding the second goal just before the break made our task all the
   more difficult. Chasing the game made us susceptible to conceding again
   and our opponent got their third , killing all hopes of any comeback.

   Truth be told it was not a bad performance by the team but also not
   good enough to get any result from a very experienced Supersport team.
   [01nov2017-150x150.jpg]

   Supersport took the lead quite fortuitously when Bilankulu slipped
   because of the soft underfoot conditions. We had the first chance of
   the game though ,when Mutizwa chipped Williams only for the ball to
   narrowly go over the crossbar.

   Conceding the second goal just before the break made our task all the
   more difficult. Chasing the game made us susceptible to conceding again
   and our opponent got their third , killing all hopes of any comeback.

   Truth be told it was not a bad performance by the team but also not
   good enough to get any result from a very experienced Supersport team.

   A typical cut throat cup tie with both teams playing attacking
   football. After a very positive opening 15 minutes Pirates then bossed
   the remainder of the first half with Qalinge running riot.

   We only managed to carve out one clear scoring chance to Pirates 3-4
   chances of which they took one. After the break with the introduction
   of Sibiya we were more enterprising and created lots more chances with
   Mutizwa twice coming close with two headers as well as chances from
   Chideu and Magubane.

   We gave it our all in the second half but it was not to be .Another
   fantastic workmanlike effort from the team of which we are very proud.

   A big thank you to all our supporters who were there to support the
   team.

   Coming twice from behind against a stubborn Polokwane outfit showed
   great character on the part of our players.

   The result is not ideally what we wanted but once again we showed
   unbelievable fighting spirit. Our performance lacked a bit of spark but
   it’s understandable considering we played 3 days ago in Polokwane and
   felt the effects of our travels.

   We now look forward to a reprieve from league football as we welcome
   Orlando Pirates in the Telkom cup.

   After a positive opening 15-20 minutes we conceded against the run of
   play with a horrendous defensive error. The goal somehow rattled us and
   gave Baroka the momentum leading to the break.

   With a few adjustments at half time we came out and played with more
   belief and showed greater attacking impetus. All three second half
   substitutes; Shongwe,Jappie and Mutizwa, made a positive contribution
   to our second half performance. We duelly equalized through a well
   taken Magubane strike and tried for the winner but it was not to be.

   Another good point on the road..Well done once again for the courage
   and commitment shown by our players.

   Our first half performance was not good enough although we still
   created a few chances. After changing the system and making
   substitutions we dominated the 2nd half and should have wrapped up the
   game, looking at the number of chances we missed.

   It’s good that we still unbeaten after 7 games but disappointing to
   have dropped 2 points at home. Our players once again showed tremendous
   bravery and commitment in first equalizing then going on an assault
   trying to get the winner. A big thank you once again to our faithful
   supporters!

   We asked our players to play with belief and that’s exactly what they
   done. They went to FNB and took on Kaizer Chiefs without fear.

   Playing two consecutive away games and picking up four points has been
   a good return for the club.Once again I have to praise our players for
   their commitment and dedication.

   As we had told our players, this Platinum Stars team is o lot stronger
   than the table suggests. Full of experience and quality we had a very
   difficult time keeping them quiet. We had some good attacking moments
   throughout but were not decisive enough.

   We got our first clean sheet in 5 games, something we have put a strong
   emphasis on. Our perseverance was strong throughout with the boys
   pushing right to the end and we were finally rewarded with a Mahachi
   winner late on.

   Platinum Stars are going to surprise a lot of teams so this was a huge
   victory for us.

   We deserved more than we got from this game but that’s been the story
   of our season,we create more chances than our opponents but they score
   from their first attack. We are happy with the fact that there is
   better consistency in our performances but not happy about our results.

   A combination of poor finishing on our part and some great goalkeeping
   on theirs meant we got what we deserved. With 12 games left we need to
   fight hard for the remaining points available.

   This was an entertaining match for both sets of supporters,with both
   teams attacking each other from the onset. Again we played with good
   intensity and our desire to get to our opponents box was very strong.

   Still we were wasteful on the breaks and could have scored a few more
   goals with better decision making. A good home win and now we need to
   do it on the road as we have two away games in quick succession.

   A big thank you to our supporters who rallied behind the team.

   We produced a good attacking display with plenty of pace and good
   movement in attack. We struggled at times to deal aerially with Gamal
   and later Rodgers but did just about enough to get over the line.

   Our players deserve all the credit for the energy and commitment shown
   throughout.

   A disappointing result when you look at the chances we created and the
   way we dominated Celtics, especially in the second half.

   Another good defensive display by the team with Mzava and Mngwengwe
   outstanding in central defense. We need to start converting our chances
   in order to turn these draws into wins though..

   Overall we are happy with the commitment shown by our players.

   As usual this was a very difficult fixture. I think in the end a draw
   was a fair result although we created more clear cut chances.

   It was a game that did not flow with a lot of stop-starts. Taking into
   consideration the circumstances of not having both coaches on the
   bench, coach Vusumuzi Vilakazi and the players did a great job earning
   a good point away from home.

   A fiery encounter to say the least. We came into this game on the back
   of a good pre-season hoping to put in a competitive performance.

   I think we gave as good as we got against a very strong Wits team. Very
   happy once again with the fighting spirit displayed by our team. Once
   again we conceded two very soft goals, a penalty and a defensive
   blunder but on the other hand scored two good goals through Lamola and
   Mahachi.

   Plenty positives to take from our first competitive game.

   I am so proud of our players never say die attitude as it’s for that
   reason that we have qualified for the Top 8.

   We started brightly but conceded to a Gabuza header after 20 mins. We
   never really settled in the 1st half going into the break a goal down
   but came out much stronger in the 2nd half. We deservedly equalized
   through Lamola and kept Pirates under constant pressure until finding
   the winner through Mutizwa in injury time.

   Our players deserve all the credit for what they have just achieved as
   they have fought to honour our clubs colours.

   After a jittery opening 30 mins where I think maybe the occasion got
   the better of some of our players, we the began to find some openings
   in the opponents defense.

   We conceded from a set piece which was very disappointing and went into
   the break a goal down. We threw everything at Pirates in the 2nd half,
   hitting the crossbar, two clearances off the line and two headers
   coming close but to no avail.

   Very proud of our young team for what they have achieved and for the
   spirit they have shown throughout the season. This experience will only
   hold them in good stead for the future.

   This was a bitter pill to swallow after giving our all, playing so well
   and losing at the death with an own goal.

   We were the better team in the 1st half and should have easily taken a
   lead into the break but again missed the opportunity to do so We
   defended well 2nd half as our opponents steadily grew into the game. We
   were very unfortunate to concede the way we did but are nevertheless
   proud of our teams performance away from home.

   The positives from this performance definitely outnumber the negatives.

   This was a win at all cost game for both teams and we are happy to have
   come out victorious. Difficult conditions did not make it any easier
   and to make matters worse we had to defend long balls for the entire
   match.

   Not an easy task considering we are not one of the bigger teams
   physically. We should have taken more than just the single goal into
   the break, but it was a special one nonetheless. Magubane put us in the
   lead with a long range effort for his first goal in the premier league.

   Second half was more of the same as we were not clinical enough on the
   break, our Achilles heel this season. We still managed to score two
   more through Lamola and a sublime Mahachi finish.

   Credit to the players again for their fighting spirit and commitment.

   A very valuable point gained in the bigger scheme of things. We were
   well organized and had three big chances to take a lead into the break.

   We conceded another soft goal from a long pass behind our defense but
   credit must go to the players for never giving up and our persistent
   pressures late on was rewarded when Mutizwa earned us a valuable point.

   Next up is Baroka in a match we simply have to win if we want any
   chance of a Ttop 8 finish.

   We are very proud of our players performance and application even
   though we lost by two goals.

   We could have taken at least a goal or two lead into the break but for
   Onyango’s heroics in goal. We again had two glorious chances in the
   opening 20 mins of the 2nd half but failed to score. We were punished
   for our missed chances when Sundowns scored two goals in 10 mins to
   steal the points.

   Nevertheless we went toe to toe with a very good Sundowns team.

   It was a case of three mistakes, three goals. Some disappointing
   individual mistakes cost us on the night.

   We played very well second half but left it a little too late. Not the
   result we wanted as the fight for top eight places hots up. With 5
   games remaining we have to grind out some positive results during this
   final push.

   A solid team performance and a great result for the club. We had great
   shape and organization for the entire match.

   Our defense was outstanding with Mzava and Mngwengwe marshaling with
   aplomb. We handed a debut to 19yr old fullback Romario Dlamini and he
   did not disappoint giving a sterling performance. We could have gone
   into the break 2-0 up had Mutizwa converted his 1v1 chance with
   Mzimela.

   We had to deal with an aerial assault where Henrico Botes had to be
   kept in check and our defense and goalkeeper dealt with the threat very
   well.

   A great result for our supporters who have been behind the team from
   day one.

   Playing a team fighting for their lives is never easy. Ajax were highly
   motivated and gave us a really tough game.

   Conditions made life difficult for both team with the heavy winds
   affecting the game. A solid team display but not enough clear scoring
   chances created.

   1-0 nil up at the break through an Mngwengwe strike, I knew Paulse
   would be brought on, and he was very good and effective, he gave us
   problems aerially. Nxumalo equalized for Ajax as they bombarded us with
   long balls in the final 15mins.

   We had to eventually settle for a disappointing solitary point but an
   important one nevertheless.

   A poor performance by the recent displays we have been giving. We were
   flat from the first whistle, largely due to having put in such a huge
   effort 3 days earlier.

   A few questionable decisions on the night, though I honestly don’t
   think we did enough to get anything out of the game.We defended poorly
   and were duely punished.

   We need to quickly pick ourselves up for a massive game against Ajax on
   Saturday as we continue to fight for our place in the top8.

   There’s an old saying that goes "there is no room for comments in the
   results column ", and that applies to our match today.

   Not the prettiest match to watch but our intention to frustrate our
   opponents worked for us. We had three glorious chances in the first
   half all against the run of play but our finishing left a lot to be
   desired.

   The defining moment came when Sibiya broke through the middle before
   slotting past Mweene.We defended well after scoring, limiting our
   opponents to very few clear cut chances.

   As expected Highlands Park came and fought as if their lives depended
   on it. We dominated and controlled proceedings in the first half taking
   the lead through Mutizwa after some great build up play.

   The 2nd half was not very pleasing on the eye as we were bombarded with
   long balls into our box. Our central defenders as well as our
   goalkeeper competed for everything under very difficult
   circumstances.We conceded a late penalty but immediately rallied back
   to score the winner through a great Mahachi strike

   Once again very proud of the fighting spirit displayed by our team

   We are very proud of our team after such a good display taking into
   consideration all the injuries we currently have. We played with
   purpose and intensity and our pressing game was really impressive.

   The players deserve credit for buying into our methodology and
   executing our game plan so well. We put a lot of time into our set
   plays so it’s good to see it paying dividends.

   Finally I have to mention the fact that we had 4 under 23’s in our
   starting eleven as well as all 6 infield players on the bench. our
   youth are starting to show their worth and potential which is great for
   the club

   We could have played all night and not scored,it was one of those
   games. A dominant 2nd half performance as we created chance after
   chance without any joy.

   Most pleasing for us was the performances of our young brigade. Gumede,
   Ndwandwe, S.Dube, Sibiya, Molefe, Sibeko and Hlongwane all showing that
   they are the future of our club.

   To play so well away from home and return empty handed is disappointing
   but there is certainly much to be proud of. We will continue to believe
   in and give our young players opportunities to play.

   After being so depleted by injuries this was a massive win for the
   club. We were defensively sound throughout the match restricting our
   opponents to mostly shooting from distance.

   The energy and intensity was was clearly evident although we needed a
   bit more composure in our play. Due to injuries to KG,Cele ,Phiri and
   Ntanga we were left quite thin but still managed to give a competitive
   performance.

   We were very lucky to go into the break only 1-0 down as we were
   totally dominated by our opponents in the 1st half but in saying so
   they did not create too many clear scoring chances.

   We were poor when regaining possession giving the ball away too
   cheaply. We played in the 2nd half like we know we can with more
   purpose,intensity and confidence. We need to now build on our 2nd half
   performance.

   Very happy for young Ndwandwe who made his debut.

   After starting the game so well and creating three to four good scoring
   chances in the 1st half, all our hard work was undone by some shambolik
   defending in the 2nd half.

   Fikizolo,Msowoya and Mutizwa all came close to scoring in the first
   half but we went into the break with a nil-all score. We lost the match
   as a contest inside the first 3mins of the restart as we conceded two
   quick goals and from there on our backs were to the wall.

   The one positive was that we never gave up and fought to the very last
   minute, individual errors hurt us on the day but I have seen more
   positives out of this defeat than I have from some of our victories.

   A good response was needed after our defeat to Supersport and that’s
   exactly what we got from our players.

   We started brightly and created numerous chances but failed to take
   any. It was disappointing to go into the break at 0-0. We deservedly
   took the lead early in the 2nd half through a Cele penalty after
   Mahachi was brought down but conceded shortly thereafter. Msowoya
   received an innocuous 2nd yellow and we had to see out most of the 2nd
   half a man short.

   We still managed to create chances and were rewarded when Mutizwa
   brilliantly headed home a pinpoint Mthiyane cross after good work by
   Lamola.

   The fighting spirit shown by the players to defend our lead
   was nothing short of exemplary.

   There is an old saying that says,’What matters most in football is what
   happens in your and your opponents box’,and yesterdays game was a good
   example of that.

   Chiefs had one chance in the first half and scored though we should
   have defended crosses a lot better on the day. We were the dominant
   side for most of the 2nd half with Fikizolo,Sibeko,Phiri and Sibiya all
   coming close to scoring but failing to find the back of the net. We
   conceded the second the same way we did the first, not marking in the
   box and allowing a free header on target.

   Once again we cannot fault our players for effort and are proud of what
   they have achieved in the first round. Top 6 in December with potential
   to get even better means that we should have a better 2nd round,meaning
   a successful season.

   This was a very difficult game as it was open with both teams creating
   chances. It was a stop-start type of game with lots of fouls by both
   teams killing the flow of the game.

   We found ourselves a goal down at the break but showed our renowned
   fighting spirit to level matters in the 2nd half.. With both teams
   receiving red cards the game became very open with both teams creating
   numerous chances but failing to convert.

   We could have won it right at the death when Ntanga hit the crossbar
   and having another chance cleared off the line. It’s a valuable point
   gained in the context of the league.

   It was a bit dissapointing to go into the half time break at 0-0 after
   playing some excellent attacking football. We played with good
   intensity and tactical discipline in the 1st half.

   We knew Wits would come out stronger after the break as they were a lot
   more direct and kept us pinned back for large periods of the 2nd half,
   but we dealt very well with everything they threw at us.

   In the end it was a good point against a very strong Wits team.

   A very disappointing result when you look at the match holistically.
   Our goalkeeper was on holiday until we conceded from a very dubious
   penalty decision late in the game.

   We were well organized and neutralized any attacking threat posed by
   our opponents but we let ourselves down as we had no rhythm and
   fluidity in our attacking play.

   We deserved at least a point so it’s back to the training field to
   prepare for our next match.

   We will definitely look back at this game as two points dropped instead
   of one gained. Some amateurish defending from us twice allowed them to
   equalize.

   Goals from Jooste and Lamola took us into the break at 2-2. We played
   some enterprising football in the first half with much fluidity and
   penetration in our play. Poor defending again allowed them to take the
   lead but credit must be given to our players for never giving up.

   Our constant attacking finally paid off when Sibiya drew us level. We
   kept pushing for a winner but it was not to be.

   Credit must also be given to our opposition and their coach for making
   such a good game of this encounter.

   Playing against the African champions with suspensions and injuries
   galore was always going to be a big ask of us to get a result but
   nevertheless the players once again gave their all.

   Our opponents were just too good for us on the day though we gifted
   them some very soft goals which is very unlike the way we usually
   defend but these things happen. We know we did not perform at the level
   we needed to so we will put this behind us and look forward to the next
   game against Polokwane at home.

   We once again humbly thank everyone who is supporting us.

   Coming into this game with the suspended Dikgacoi and Mngwengwe as well
   as Nonyane being injured and Miheso sick, this was always going to be a
   difficult trip for us. We had to shuffle the team around and are very
   happy with the way our players adjusted, taking into consideration all
   the forced changes made

   Not at our best in the 1st half but we really dominated and created
   numerous chances in the 2nd

   On the balance of play I think we deserved the victory as we were solid
   defensively and threatening in attack.

   It’s not very often that I get to say how proud I am of my team after a
   defeat. Everything that could go wrong did, but still I remain proud of
   the effort and never say die attitude our players showed.

   Two red cards,a dubious penalty for the opposition,a missed penalty by
   us as well as a goal disallowed and still we could have won it! Even
   when down to 10 men then 9 we were still creating all the chances.

   Once again we are very proud about how we lost as every player gave his
   all for the club. We will regroup and bounce back like good teams often
   do.

   We were very slow out of the blocks as our opponents bossed the opening
   15mins. We then grew into the game and started creating chances and
   took the lead through a well taken Dikgacoi goal.

   The goal gave us some momentum as we started to create chances with
   Ntanga being our main source of creativity. We then doubled our lead
   through Bilankulu only to concede to a very good Rusike strike on the
   stroke of half time. We should have dominated the game when our
   opponents had a man sent off midway through the 2nd half, but allowed
   them back into the game.

   We conceded our lead when Lentjies equalized after a mishit shot fell
   fortuitously to him and he duelly tucked it away.. We are disappointed
   not to have bagged all 3 points but will take the point and continue to
   push hard and try and win our next match.

   Its never easy playing against an under performing Pirates knowing full
   well that they could find their form at any moment,and so they did.

   Not having Nonyane and Lamola available did upset our rhythm slightly
   but we still managed to put in a credible display. Credit must go to
   our opponents who played very well on the day. We are proud of our
   players who went toe to toe with Pirates.

   We were well in the game right till the end and were caught on the
   counter a few times which was expected as we were chasing for an
   equalizer. There are many positives to take from this performance as we
   now prepare for Maritzburg United.

   We would also like to thank our supporters who turned up at Orlando
   stadium. Thank you for your loyal support.

   This was always going to be a mammoth challenge in terms of our
   organization as a team.

   Chippa is a team obsessed with possession and very good at it so we had
   to be very disciplined. We also knew that the way they played would
   also present us with opportunities to score and that’s exactly how
   things unfolded.

   we are proud of the effort and good defensive organisation but
   disappointed that we did not score more than the solitary goal.

   our players wore their hearts on their sleeves and that’s all we can
   ask.

   A disappointing result for us as we dominated a strong Supersport team.
   We started slow out of the blocks as our opponents bossed the opening
   20-25 mins. We conceded as early as in the 15th minute but bounced
   right back 15 mins later when Bilankulu equalized.

   We started the 2nd half with more purpose and and really had Supersport
   under tremendous pressure. Try as we may we could not get the ball over
   the line. A solid start to the season by our boys who must get all the
   credit for the work ethic and fighting spirit they have displayed so
   far.

   This result has shown us as a club how resilient and determined our
   players are. Under difficult conditions and playing in a very hostile
   environment the players fought tooth and nail to get this result.

   We allowed Celtics to have the ball in the middle 3rd forcing them to
   play with a high line and then tried to exploit the space. We struggled
   to come out with any consistency giving the ball away far too easily
   after winning it. Not conceding early was very important as the home
   crowd became restless and this added extra pressure on our opponents.

   After conceding to a cruel deflected shot we then kicked into gear in
   the 2nd half and started creating problems for Celtics defense.

   Goals from an in form Mngwengwe and Jooste put us in the lead and we
   could have had a few more as we constantly caught them on the break in
   the final 15mins.

   Once again we defended very well. A job well done by our players as its
   never easy winning two successive away games, especially both being in
   the Free State.

   Comments vs FSStars

   We knew very well beforehand how difficult this game would be.Our plan
   to play on the break worked as we had three great opportunities to
   score.

   Again our final pass let us down at key moments in transition.Our
   defense again looked solid as our opponents resorted mostly to long
   range shots.

   In the 2nd half Lamola,Phiri, Sibiya and Nonyane again had good
   opportunities but we failed to convert.

   We finally got our breakthrough when a well executed set piece in
   injury time did the trick as Nonyane conveted From close range.Not
   pretty by any means but a gutsy away performance.

   This was a difficult game under trying conditions but we still managed
   to put in a good first half performance. Our plan to overload the
   central midfield area worked well as we dominated the game in the
   opening stanza.

   After missing a few chances we finally got the breakthrough after some
   great build up play when Nonyane found Ntanga with a hard,low cross at
   the near post.

   In the 2nd half we sat too deep allowing City to keep us under constant
   pressure but our defensive shape was solid and we managed to keep them
   at bay. We had to deal with an aerial bombardment in the final 15-20
   mins where Mzava and Mngwengwe in particular were outstanding,winning
   those vital duels.

   As expected we knew we would have opportunities to counter and got our
   second late in the game when Jooste used his pace to good effect and
   clinically finishing from the edge of the box.

   Not the prettiest 2nd half but a hard fought 3 points in the end.

   We started the game brightly, defended well with Mbaeva having only one
   save to make which he tipped over the crossbar. We looked threatening
   throughout the first half and should have taken at least two of the
   numerous chances that we had created. Because of this, we went into the
   break 0-0.

   The second half, we competed well but defended poorly resulting in us
   conceding 3 goals to Ndoro. Sibiya got us back to 1-1, but poor marking
   in our defensive 3rd gifted Ndoro two more goals to take the game away
   from us.

   We ended our league campaign against Tuks with a 2-1 loss and
   subsequently lost our top eight place. We played without the right
   desire and attitude and quickly found ourselves 2-0 down at half time.
   The second half we played with much more purpose and made a game of
   it,scoring and coming close to equalizing but our failure to convert
   chances was our downfall.

   It is very disappointing to come so close to qualifying for top 8 but
   the reality is that we just weren’t good enough and need to work harder
   and smarter next season to achieve that goal.

   We, the coaching staff, and players, would like to thank the supporters
   for your endless support in the face of both our wins and losses over
   the past season. We are sorry that we have not given you a Top8 finish,
   somethng that we know you would have liked for the club, as we would
   have. We are disappointed we did not reach this goal, but will work
   harder in the new season to abtain this position.

   As we anticipated Cosmos came to fight for the 3 points because of the
   predicament they find themselves in

   The first half was not pretty to watch as the game was very physical
   without much quality football being played. We managed to score late in
   the first half through a well taken volley by Bilankulu.

   We started the 2nd half with much more purpose, immediately putting
   Cosmos under pressure We tried to kill the game off but the 2nd goal
   eluded us. We defended very well as our opponents threw everything at
   us in the closing stages of the game.

   We had to earn these 3 points the hard way,and have now given ourselves
   a big chance to finish inside the top 8

   Under the circumstances of poor conditions we did well to come away
   from East London with a point. Our players put in another sterling
   shift against a very good Chippa team.

   We were solid defensively and frustrated our opponents who were limited
   to shooting from distance We were disappointing after winning
   possession as we immediately turned over possession. We have now picked
   up 7 points from our last 3 games with two of them being away from
   home.

   We have targeted at least 4 points from our remaining 2 games and hope
   it’s good enough for a top eight finish.

   Going into this game level on points and with both teams fighting for a
   top eight position made this a six pointer. The first half was a
   scrappy affair with neither team creating too many clear cut chances.

   We took the lead through another Mhango strike after he confidently
   slotted the ball past Mathole.,we went into the break 1-0 up. We were
   much more enterprising in the 2nd half and created many more chances.
   We came close to adding to our tally as Mhango,Mahachi,Shitolo,Fikizolo
   and S.Dube all came very close to scoring.

   In the end a single goal was enough to give us all three points.

   This was another fighting performance by the team. next we play a high
   flying Chippa team in East London on Saturday the 07th of May, at
   Buffalo City with a 15:00 kick-off and will again give our all to bring
   back a positive result for all our loyal supporters who have stood by
   us through thick and thin.

   Finally we put in a performance that directly compliments the hard work
   we have been putting in at training. The opening 20mins was a weird
   period as we firstly missed a penalty,conceded a penalty then conceded
   a 2nd through a crazy defensive blunder.

   We brought on Mhango after 30mins and he immediately brought us back
   into the game with two quick goals,taking us into halftime at 2-2.

   After changing our system we then dominated our opponent in the 2nd
   half with Mhango bagging a further 2 goals He could have had a double
   hat trick as he came close to scoring on a number of other occasions

   Mbaeva did well to keep us in the lead with some brilliant saves but we
   were eventually good value for our victory.

   Very pleased with the work ethic of the entire team.

   Our next game is on Saturday 30 April, we host Freestate stars.
   Kick-off is at 15:00, at the Chatsworth Stadium.

   As anticipated this match was a very heated affair as both teams were
   desperate for 3 points,adding to the fact that this was a derby. We
   were happy with the first half performance as well as the tactical
   execution of our game plan

   We neutralised their wide players and kept their most influential
   player Lentjies quiet in the first half resulting in us dominating play
   and creating chances. We had many chances to go 2 or 3 nil up but
   failed to convert any. We knew they would come at us even after going a
   man down so we needed to be disciplined and importantly needed to play
   with more composure.

   The lack of composure was evident in the 2nd half as we failed to
   settle into any type of rhythm. We were punished when leaving the ever
   dangerous Lentjies free whilst on the attack,something we had discussed
   pre-match.

   We dropped two valuable points but in saying so are once again happy
   with the fighting spirit and commitment shown by our players.
   Mbaeva,Sibeko,Hlongwane and Sibiya were our outstanding players on the
   night.

   It’s not very often that we can say well done to our boys after loosing
   a match by 4 goals to 1, but that’s exactly what we said to the boys
   after the game.

   We went into this game without Bilankulu, Cele, Mngwengwe, Arwuah,
   Molefe, but still managed to put in a sterling performance, thanks
   largely to the efforts of some of our younger players. Ngcobo &
   Hlongwani who did well as did Sibiya & Sibeko, coming off the bench.
   Our young players have brought a breath of fresh air to the club
   especially during this trying period where results have not been
   forthcoming.

   We were punished by an in-form Orlando Pirates for making crucial
   mistakes in critical areas. All four goals conceded were a result of
   making four individual errors defensively. These are hard lessons for
   our young players to learn but we are sure that they will.

   We dominated the 2nd half before & after Masalesa’s red card. We hit
   the upright & created several other opportunities & could easily have
   equalized had we taken our chances.

   There are many positives to take away from this game as we prepare for
   what is ‘our cup final’ against Maritzburg on Wednesday.

   Credit must be given to our players for a much improved performance. We
   had to really fight for a result as Celtics also desperately wanted to
   win.

   The first half was tight until the sending off of Fransman..we then
   started to dominate our opponents in midfield but never created enough
   goal scoring chances We went in 0-0 at halftime. We changed our system
   to take advantage of their sending off and brought on an extra striker.

   This seemed to work as we kept them back for long periods. The momentum
   swung back in Celtics favour after Mngwengwe was red carded for a silly
   tackle knowing he was on a yellow. Celtics applied pressure on the
   latter stages of the game but our defense stood firmly as we picked up
   a valuable point in the Free State. We will now turn our focus on
   preparing for Orlando Pirates on Saturday.

   We started this match with six Diski players in the starting eleven.
   The likes of Goss,Sibiya,Molefe and Sibeko did not disappoint as they
   put in a sterling performance.

   The opening 20mins looked very promising as we struck the upright and
   created numerous scoring chances but failed to take the lead. Baroka
   then grew in confidence and started to impose themselves on us. We gave
   away a soft penalty and went into the break a goal down.

   We again started the 2nd half on the front foot putting our visitors
   under immense pressure but again failed to find the back of the net.
   After another senseless red card our visitors took advantage and kept
   the ball for long periods in the final 10mins.

   An improved performance but not the result we anticipated. We need to
   pick ourselves up for a must win encounter against Celtics on Sunday 10
   April, at Molemela stadium, kick-off at 15:00.

   Another disappointing performance and result from the team.It’s always
   difficult to chase a game when conceding as early as the 5th minute.

   We lacked confidence in our play in the first half and struggled to
   create any meaningful chances. We conceded a second when a very dubious
   penalty was given when it seemed the Supersport attacker was backing
   into one of our defenders. We had two good chances but Shitolo’s header
   and Ncgobos shot were off target. 2-0 nil down at halftime, we had it
   all to do 2nd half.

   We started the 2nd half brightly and immediately took the game to
   Supersport. Fikizolo and Musonda came close but could not beat Williams
   in goal. Dube’s red card compounded our problems as the game then swung
   back in favour of Supersport. With our backs to the wall we conceded a
   3rd as our opponents took advantage of us being a player short.

   We need to seriously improve our attacking play. The one positive to
   take out of the game was the outstanding performances of our two
   youngsters Ncgobo and Molefe.

   As expected this was a very tense match for both sides. After making a
   tactical switch and going into a 3-5-2 formation to counter theirs in
   the first 10 mins,we grew in confidence and started to dominate in
   midfield.

   There were not many goal scoring chances from either side in the first
   half and we went into the dressing room at 0-0. We started the 2nd half
   poorly giving possession away too easily in midfield, poor decision
   making and erratic passing resulted in most of our attacks breaking
   down in the final 3rd. We could have defended a lot better when
   conceding the two goals they scored.

   Credit must go to Maritzburg for showing the hunger and desire to get
   the result they so badly needed.

   We may be through to the last 16 of the Nedbank Cup, but the manner in
   which we did leaves a lot to be desired.

   In a game where we should have won comfortably, we huffed & puffed and
   struggled to give the desired performance we were all looking for. We
   spoke about not being complacent against 3rd tier opposition but the
   players seemed to not heed our warning.

   We constantly gave possession away needlessly, resulting in most of our
   build-ups breaking down after a very few number of passes put together.
   Our opposition must be given credit as they tried to use this platform
   to market themselves both as individuals and as a club. After going 2-0
   up, through Chapman & Mahachi, we immediately conceded after loosing
   possession in midfield.

   We are happy to be through to the next round but would rather quickly
   like to put this game behind us.

   On a more positive note, we welcome back Bilankulu, Hotto, Mhango,
   Ramagalela, Makudubela & Katjiukua from suspension & injuries. We now
   look forward to the last 16 draw as well as our upcoming fixture
   against Maritzburg on Friday.

   Platinum Stars are a team that I have a lot of respect for. They have a
   very experienced, highly talented group of players as well as a very
   good coach in Cavin Johnson. We knew full well that this was going to
   be a very difficult game and it was.

   We worked very hard throughout the week on maintaining a good balance
   between defense & attack & feel that we achieved that. We were
   defensively very organised & constantly threatening in attack. Again we
   failed to capitalise on the chances we created & were not clinical
   enough in front of goal. I was very pleased with the attitude & the
   impact our subs made.

   Thabo Molefe was one of our outstanding players on the day & played
   like a seasoned professional, executing his role very efficiently. The
   confidence in the team is growing all the time & we are happy as a
   technical team to also see an improved attitude from the players.

   I would like to take this opportunity to congratulate coach Vilakazi &
   our Diski team for a job well done on winning the Diski league title.
   Well done to all involved.

   This is one match where credit must definitely go to our players who
   executed our game plan with great professionalism.

   Each role was carried out effectively and we therefore gave a very
   disciplined team performance. We did very well to deny Sundowns
   attacking trio “CBD” any space behind our defensive line. We also
   closed down the channels very well where they are dangerous with their
   diagonal balls.

   Our defensive organization looked solid throughout with great support
   from our midfielders who played their part in the team maintaining its
   defensive shape. Once again, we let ourselves down as we were not
   clinical enough when opportunities presented themselves to us on the
   counter and break attacks.

   We had more chances created and more penalty area entries in the 90
   minutes than our opponents. If we continue to perform in this manner,
   we can strongly push for a top 8 finish. In order for us to achieve
   this, we need to start winning our home games, starting with a very
   strong Platinum Stars team.

   The confidence in the camp is high as we have picked up 4 out of 6
   points in our last two matches which have both been away from home.
   Special mention must be made to Mbaeva, Bilankulu, Katjiukua, Cele and
   Shitolo who have been playing with a high level of consistency.

   I would also like to thank our management, technical team and entire
   backroom staff for their continuous support.

   Polokwane has always been a difficult place to go and get a result. We
   are therefore very pleased to have managed to get all three points.
   This was a solid team performance and credit must go to the players for
   a job well done. There was lots of pressure during the game as we had
   gone four matches without picking up a result of any kind. Added to
   that pressure, was the fact that we had not scored in our previous four
   games, so it was pleasing to have scored two goals.

   The first half was a very tight affair and to make matters worse we
   conceded very early and had to chase the game from the 7th minute. The
   players kept their composure and continued to make in-roads into the
   oppositions defensive 3rd. We scored our equalizer through Shitolo
   after some good build-up play and a great cross from the right hand
   side by S Dube.

   After making some tactical adjustments to our defense, we looked a lot
   more organised defensively in the second half. Once again, we created
   numerous goal scoring chances but never the less continued to have hope
   that the winner would come. Ultimately we got our reward when
   Ramagalela came off the bench to score with his very first touch of the
   ball.
   Bilankulu played him in with a great ball from defense, and Rama G
   showed great composure when facing the keeper on-on-one. A job well
   done by everybody.

   I would like to take this opportunity to also congratulate Coach
   Vilakazi for their victory which has taken them to the top of the Diski
   log. We also wish them luck for the final game against Free State
   Stars.

   This latest setback has been difficult to accept because the team
   really put in a big effort to try and win the match. We had 3 good
   opportunities to take the lead in the 1st half but once again failed to
   take our chances.

   Our opponents had one chance in the 1st half from a direct free kick &
   converted after our defense looked quite solid in the 1st 45mins. Our
   frustrations grew in the 2nd half as we once again created chances
   without converting. We again defended very well, limiting our opponents
   to very few chances.

   A special mention must be given to Julio Giurichic for having a solid
   game at left back on his debut for the club. Injuries continue to
   plague us as we were forced to make a half time substitution after
   Chris Kadjiukua suffered from a concussion.

   Creating more chances than our opponents in our last 3 matches & still
   ending up on the losing side has been a bitter pill to swallow but we
   will continue to work very hard to turn this situation around.

   The fighting spirit of the players through this difficult period must
   be applauded as they continue to fight for the club.

   As expected this was another difficult trip to Cape Town.We competed
   very well in the first half looking solid defensively,when against the
   run of play Ajax scored from a corner kick after we failed to clear a
   corner.

   We had two very good chances but failed to take them and went into the
   break a goal down.

   Second half had a familiar feel as we again created more chances than
   our opponents but failed to convert any.

   We had another two glorious opportunities in the 2nd half to get back
   into the match but failed to convert. Our two new signings Bilankulu
   and Makudubela acquitted themselves very well and will definitely add
   value to our squad.

   We will continue to work hard on our finishing as this has been our
   Achilles heel in recent weeks.

   Playing 3 games in one week took its toll on the players as we were
   totally flat in the 2nd half of the match. In the 1st half we applied
   early pressure on our opponents as we tried to score an early goal, but
   the quality of our final ball & finishing let us down.

   We dealt very well with the threat of the imposing Bance, as Katjiukua
   & Zitha marshaled him very well. Our wing play was not very effective
   as we failed to break out & use the width after defending compactly. We
   went into the half time break at 0-0.

   At the start of the 2nd half, we again tried to put pressure on the
   Chippa defense but consistently lost possession in the opponents half.
   The fear of our players fading in the 2nd half, after playing 3 games
   in a week, became a reality as we struggled to break out of our half
   with any purpose and intensity.

   We disappointedly conceded 2 very soft goals as both goals were scored
   as a result of us giving the ball straight to our opponents in
   dangerous areas. We pushed as many bodies forward as possible to try
   pull a goal back but to no avail.

   We have a big game against Maritzburg in a weeks time & after a few
   days of much needed rest the boys should once again have a spring in
   their step.

   As expected this was a very difficult game against a very desperate
   Ajax team.From kick off they went route one up to Paulse and this
   seemed to rattle us defensively.It also unsettled us in terms of us
   playing our normal passing game.against the run of play we took the
   lead in the 18th minute through a Fikizolo penalty.We immediately
   conceded which was very disappointing as we often spoke about these
   critical moments in a match.we made a tactical switch midway through
   1st half and got Katjiukua to pick up Paulse and after this change we
   dealt with the long balls a lot better.

   We came out 2nd Half with much more purpose playing our normal passing
   game with much more efficiency and had Ajax under pressure in the 2nd
   half.

   We had a few good chances to win the game but did not take any..Gumede
   kept us in the game with two great saves.Once again we cannot fault the
   boys for effort.

   We gave it our all but dropped two valuable points.The hard work
   continues as we try to mound this young exciting squad into a
   competitive,formidable team.

   We expected a very tough match from a usually stubborn opponent.We
   edged the match in the 1st half creating more scoring chances than our
   opponents.Our speed in attack was a constant threat..We took the lead
   in the 40th minute through a superb long range effort from Hotto..we
   went into the half time break a goal up.

   In the 2nd half it was total dominance on our part as we really put
   Stars under immense pressure resulting in us taking a 2-0 lead through
   Shitolo..Stars were awarded a dubious penalty but we kept the pressure
   on and got our 3rd through Mahachi.

   Credit must go to the players for professionally executing our game
   plan.

   Under the circumstances, this was a very valuable 3 points. Taking into
   consideration, we had Mbaeva & Shitolo suspended, injuries to
   Ramagalela, Mokheti, Mngwengwe & Siyabonga Dube, we had to reshuffle
   the team & this was a major challenge which I thought we dealt with
   very well. </p.

   We played very well in the 1st half, creating numerous chances. We
   eventually scored through Musonda in the 25th minute and had chances to
   score a few more thereafter.

   I was very happy with the defensive shape, taking into consideration
   how we had to reorganize our defence. I earlier emphasized to the
   players, the importance of keeping clean sheets and I am very happy
   that we managed to do so.

   We struggled for composure in the 2nd half, as we often needlessly gave
   possession away, where we could have kept the ball a lot better. I
   think that the potential to improve is definitely there.

   Lastly, I would like to mention that I am very happy with the attitude
   of the players, since taking over. I would like to thank my technical
   team, players & management for making my transition to Lamontville
   Golden Arrows such a smooth one.

   This is the one match that I want to forget about. We have thus far
   lost 3 league games and the performance of the team in this match was
   not what it should have been. We had a bad first half. The same thing
   that happened to us against Orlando Pirates.

   We defended badly. There was no cohesion between our defensive blocks.
   When we regained ball possession we lost the ball even when we were not
   under pressure. The tracking in the final third was was not
   appropriate. Communication between our defence and midfielders was
   poor. Conceding an early dubious penalty in the 6th minute did not help
   the situation. Offensively we looked disjointed. Credit must also be
   given to Chiefs for the manner in which they pressed us. They worked on
   making sure that they denied us the space.

   The second half was much better because we were better organised and
   the level of communication improved. Tracking of players in the final
   third was much better and again a red card in the 47th minute
   disorganised our plans.

   We improved our passing and we did not loose as many balls as the first
   half. A great goal by Siyabonga Dube seemed to add life to our players
   and Kaizer Chiefs were very anxious.

   We now have a much needed break which will help us sort out the few
   challenges in the team. This is just a minor setback that will be
   overcome

   We have gone through this phase of back to back games. I was really
   worried about this period which was mostly away matches.
   Supersport away
   Orlando Pirates away
   Kaizer Chiefs away

   It is proper of me to applaud the boys for collecting six valuable
   points out of 9 on the road.

   In my opinion the referee of the day failed to protect us and gave too
   many bad decisions against us. I was appalled by the fact that he
   refused to shake my hand after the game. Where is the spirit of Fair
   Play which FIFA is promoting by shaking of hands before and after the
   game.

   Let us soldier on. Together let us pave our way with our ARROWS

   The harder the battle, the sweeter the victory and a victory without
   danger is like a triumph without glory. Victory is sweet when you have
   known defeat. Our loss against Supersport made us stronger. There were
   times when I thought our players will give up. As they say: loosing, in
   a curious way, is winning. We got a lot of positives as well as the
   negatives and we had two days to correct that after the Supersport
   match.

   Mentally our boys were much stronger in that we saw a lot of
   resilience, commitment, composure and responsiveness to physical
   demands of the game.

   Tactically Pirates were superior to us but their execution on the day
   was very poor. They created a lot of chances which they could not
   convert and this has given us a lot of homework as coaches of Golden
   Arrows. Defensive organisation, team structure and shape are some of
   the areas that we must deal with as corrective measures.

   This was definitely a game where we got the three points and Pirates
   played all the football. Sometimes the beauty of football does not
   yield 3 points. There are 3 scenarios in football: play well and win,
   play bad/ugly and win and lastly play well and loose. The latter is
   unfortunately not for business football.

   The first goal by Mahachi in 52nd seemed to deflate the confidence of
   Orlando Pirate and brought a lot of confidence to our boys. Pirates
   became more desperate after the goal and I knew that there was a
   possibility of getting the second goal as all of their players were in
   the offensive mood.

   It was not a surprise when Shitolo doubled our lead in the 83rdminute
   from the pass by Musonda.
   We have now collected 7 points on the road and 7 at home. We are well
   on track to achieving our objectives of collecting 15 points in the
   first 10 games of the season. The team is getting better with every
   game we play. Confidence is at its highest after this game.

   The postponement of our game against Ajax Cape Town gives us a needed
   break after playing 4 games in 12 days. Fatigue was setting in and our
   speed of play was affected in the last two games. The team will be much
   better against Kaizer Chiefs.

   To our supporters, we thank you for giving us that extra push.
   It is hard to forget someone who gave so much to remember. Looking back
   in the memories will help you comfort your tomorrow. May the Lolo
   family and Ajax Cape Town find it in their hearts to accept.

   When you win, you don’t examine it so much, except to congratulate
   yourself and the team. You easily and wrongly assume that it has
   something to do with your plan. The plan, more than anything can only
   work if people who must make it work are up to the challenge. From the
   four fundamental factors of factors of performance: tactics, technique,
   physical and mental the latter is always the least considered by the
   coaches. I believe at this level of football (PSL) it is the most
   important.

   Mentally our players played the second game against Supersport thinking
   it will be a walk in the park. We could not get into the rhythm of our
   game. Supersport effectively used pressing to counter our style of play
   and as such we played in patches here and there.

   Our defense was reinforced to deal with the long balls that Supersport
   was launching in the previous game, and they outsmarted us by bringing
   Thuso Phala in the central area to effect numerical superiority in
   midfield. We could have forced them not to build from the back
   especially the right back.

   As Golden Arrows we have seen all the shortcomings in this match, and
   we will take them as lessons for the next game. Our medical team is
   doing its best to deal with the few knocks we sustained against
   Supersport.
   Congratulations to Chris Katjiukua on scoring a goal on his first game
   of the current season.

   The next game against Orlando Pirates will not be an easy one. They
   have not done well so far in the league and they will come full force
   to try and get the maximum points. We will be more than ready for this
   game.
   To our supporters we say that, we are equally disappointed with the
   results against Supersport. We have an opportunity to make it up to you
   in our game against Pirates.

   Big up to our MDC team – keep up the good work boys.

   The game against Supersport united was one that- both the players and
   myself were looked forward to. Looking forward to this particular game
   because of my involvement with them in the previous season. Knowing the
   players and how their head coach thinks gave us an edge. The plan was
   to attack Supersport from the first minute and try not to give them
   space to play when they had possession. It came as no surprise when our
   captain converted a well delivered pass from Mabhudi Khenyeza to give
   us a lead in the 17th minute.

   The early goal boosted our confidence going forward and what impressed
   me the most was the hunger the guys have for more goals. With the many
   chances we created in the first half, one must give credit to the
   defence and goalkeeper of Supersport united for keeping them in the
   game. Two minutes before half time Mabhudi provided another killer pass
   to Mahachi – who slotted in a perfect goal to give us a two goal lead
   going into the break.

   The second half was a little disappointing as the guys went into
   defensive mode. This gave Supersport the upper hand as we concentrated
   more on the defensive work than offensive work. As Supersport United
   was increasingly adding pressure – our defence showed a lot of
   resilience and character. Miscommunication between our defenders and
   midfielders allowed Supersport to score their solitary goal. Mbaeva
   made a few good saves on the day. Defenders made good clearances under
   pressure. It was an ugly 2nd half but we are happy with our first
   maximum points away from home.

   An overall great performance from the lads and now we look forward to
   the TKO game against Supersport taking place this Saturday. Having
   played this game, we expect them to make a couple of changes to try and
   get a result, but we will do the same.

   We are expecting an even tougher game as they are the defending
   champions of the Telkom Cup

   Looking forward to a great display of football.

   Another big test for us against Bloemfontein Celtics, one of the three
   teams vying for Q1. Our boys showed lots of character in this match.
   Gradually, but surely the team is taking shape for the better.

   Finishing is still our biggest concern. The execution of the Final pass
   in the final third is also not as good as it should be.

   We have improved our shots on target – hence the goalkeeper of Celtics
   was the busier of the two. The speed of play has also improved.

   We could have finished this game in the first half but the brilliant
   goalkeeping of Celtics goal minder denied us the chance to break the
   stalemate. Our boys took the game to Celtics who defended deep with
   good compactness which made it difficult for us to find penetration.
   Because of the unbalanced manner in which we played, we could not
   provide enough width on our left side. This could have increased our
   chances to create more scoring opportunities

   I am pleased with the performance of the team but concerned with the
   results.

   We hope to turn tables against Supersport in a midweek league game.

   Many thanks to our supporters who came in numbers to support their
   team.

   As predicted, the Telkom knockout against the current MTN 8 champions
   was going to be difficult. Their current form made them favourites for
   this match. As under dogs, meticulous planning and high levels of
   motivation were needed to defy the odds.

   We knew that their strength was confidence, hard running and
   determination. The plan was to be efficient in our transition play –
   and it was effective. They had territorial advantage in the early
   stages of the game and were frustrated by our defensive organisation
   and the quick counter attacks. When our boys settled down, it was
   anybody’s game.

   We created goal scoring opportunities – but their goalkeeper stood
   between us and the first goal. Had he not received the red card, he
   could have easily been the man of the match.

   A commendable performance from our boys has taken us to the quarter
   finals of the Telkom Knockout competition – a feat not anticipated by
   many football pundits.

   Our supporters are increasing in numbers each week and we applaud them
   for their support.

   We look forward to our quarter final game against Supersport United on
   the 24th of October 2015.

   This is the one game we deserved to win, but the basic individual
   defending errors caused us dearly.From the first whistle we were in
   full control, and it was not a surprise when we scored our first and
   only goal on the 14th minute. Black Aces could not cope with our high
   tempo game.

   After the goal our boys seemed to ease pressure on Aces and we brought
   them back in the game. They started dominating the midfield until they
   scored the equalizer on the 34th minute.

   When Aces scored their 2nd goal, which was another gift – again we
   started dominating the game. At this stage our players were desperate
   to get the equalizer and started pumping balls forward. Yes, we created
   chances from these long balls, but a little patience of playing our own
   type of football could have paid dividends for us.

   Like in the previous games -unbelievable fighting spirit from our boys
   was evident and lady luck eluded us. The team defensively could have
   dealt better with the offensive phase of Black Aces. The lack of
   aggression created a lot of space for our opponents and this caused
   problems for us.

   Though we lost the game a lot of lessons have been learned from this
   match – we continue to work towards eliminating mistakes.

   Our next game in the Telkom Cup against Ajax Cape Town will be
   challenging.

   The game was a real test for our boys in the elite league. We showed a
   lot of character-Determination, hard-work and attitude were the
   positive attributes that our players had on the day.

   Our defensive plan was to ensure that we make the playing space for our
   opponents as small as possible. An efficient mixed marking (zonal and
   man-marking) was properly executed. Yes, the were moments when there
   was a lapse in concentration from our players and we were nearly
   punished. We still need to work on tracking down players properly in
   the final third – a real concern for us defensively.

   The team defended the standard situations very well. There was never
   any glaring threat from our opponents from the set plays. We were well
   organised.

   Our quick transitions from defence to attack were very effective. Each
   time we countered – Sundowns appeared vulnerable – however the final
   pass was still letting us down.

   The introduction of Chapman and Musonda in the 2nd half was very
   effective.

   This is not the time to bask in the glory of beating Sundowns. We must
   knuckle down to serious bussines of preparing the team even better for
   our coming games.

   Our next match will be against Black Aces and will be a big test for
   us. We need to be mentally and physically ready for this challenge

   We thank our supporters for coming in their numbers to cheer our
   players towards victory. You are really the 12th player.

   We hope to see you on the 23rd of September when we host Black Aces at
   King Zwelithini Stadium in Umlazi

   After 3 games we have tasted a win, draw and a loss. A very improved
   performance against Platinum Stars. Two individual defensive errors in
   the first half cost us the 3 points. The first goal was conceded
   through – not doing a basic defending of a wall pass. Instead of our
   player closing the man that passes the ball he followed the ball. The
   second goal was caused by our defender not attacking a ball from the
   cross, thus allowing the striker to have a free header.

   The second goal was really heartbreaking because we spend a lot of time
   dealing with this situation and our players did not do justice
   defending the specific cross.

   Against Jomo Cosmos we had 12 shots on target and against Platinum
   Stars we had more than four goal scoring opportunities and we could not
   convert them. We had enough entrances in the final third to have drawn
   or even won the game but we were blunt in front of the goals.

   Edgar Manaka gave a good account of himself in his first game. He was
   able to make the team play. He made the team look good when we
   attacked.

   Having scored one goal in 3 games tells us that we need to work much
   more on our finishing. We would like to see a lot of improvement on our
   finishing against Sundowns. We need much more aggression going forward.
   Fortunately, we have enough time to work on this because our next game
   will be on the 12th of September.

   Defensively, I feel as a team we have been doing well. We have conceded
   two goals, which are individual mistakes and not group or team
   mistakes. We will reinforce our organisation defensively.

   We need to be sharper in front of the goals
   We need to lessen playing space for our opponents
   We need more composure in the final third

   These are the things that we need to have improved by the time we play
   Sundowns

   Our Diski team will be playing their first game against Sundowns in
   Tembisa this weekend. I have faith in them. Wish them LUCK

   After 3 games we have tasted a win, draw and a loss. A very improved
   performance against Platinum Stars. Two individual defensive errors in
   the first half cost us the 3 points. The first goal was conceded
   through – not doing a basic defending of a wall pass. Instead of our
   player closing the man that passes the ball he followed the ball. The
   second goal was caused by our defender not attacking a ball from the
   cross, thus allowing the striker to have a free header.

   The second goal was really heartbreaking because we spend a lot of time
   dealing with this situation and our players did not do justice
   defending the specific cross.

   Against Jomo Cosmos we had 12 shots on target and against Platinum
   Stars we had more than four goal scoring opportunities and we could not
   convert them. We had enough entrances in the final third to have drawn
   or even won the game but we were blunt in front of the goals.

   Edgar Manaka gave a good account of himself in his first game. He was
   able to make the team play. He made the team look good when we
   attacked.

   Having scored one goal in 3 games tells us that we need to work much
   more on our finishing. We would like to see a lot of improvement on our
   finishing against Sundowns. We need much more aggression going forward.
   Fortunately, we have enough time to work on this because our next game
   will be on the 12th of September.

   Defensively, I feel as a team we have been doing well. We have conceded
   two goals, which are individual mistakes and not group or team
   mistakes. We will reinforce our organisation defensively.

   We need to be sharper in front of the goals
   We need to lessen playing space for our opponents
   We need more composure in the final third

   These are the things that we need to have improved by the time we play
   Sundowns

   Our Diski team will be playing their first game against Sundowns in
   Tembisa this weekend. I have faith in them. Wish them LUCK

   We have now played our second game of the season in the Elite League
   and we have collected four valuable points. We, at Golden Arrows play
   every game with the intention of winning and yesterday was not
   different. The tactics of playing for a draw robbed our spectators who
   pay to come and watch football. This is the game that was expected to
   be a thriller with two teams that have just been promoted to the
   premier league, unfortunately that was not the case.

   We could have done much better in this game – but we will accept the
   one point away from home. In the game against Cosmos we had two changes
   from the previous game we played with Tukkies. Ryan Chapman and
   Thembela Sikhakhane were making their first appearances in the starting
   line up and JB Ncobeni was introduced in the second half of the game.
   Chapman and Sikhakhane made a big impact in the team. We were more
   solid in defence and midfield defensively and we were not as aggressive
   as we needed to be during the offensive phase.

   Our defence has now played a commendable 180 minutes without conceding
   a goal. There seems to be a lot of understanding in our defensive phase
   of the game. There were scary moments but the defence was able to deal
   with that. Our goalkeeper was not really tested to the limit – except
   for the two good saves he made in each half of the match.

   We still have to work harder with our offensive phase of the game. The
   build up from the back is effective and entries in the final third are
   also efficient. We seem to be too much in a hurry in the final third,We
   lack patience and urgency. Improved mobility and accurate passing seems
   to be our biggest challenge.

   The Technical team is working tirelessly to correct these short
   comings.

   Looking forward to our next game against Platinum Stars

   We again thank our supporters for coming in their numbers to support
   their team.08

   A positive result at the beginning of any competition is key. It gives
   the players confidence. As a team that has just been promoted to the
   elite league we needed this win badly. This win will enable the players
   to have self belief – which in turn will boost the confidence of the
   team.

   A lot of positives can be drawn from our game against Tukkies.
   Defensively our team was well organised Mental strength of our players
   was fully tested after getting a red card in the 20th minute Physical
   condition of our players was tested and they passed The transition from
   defence to attack was very effective A lot of fighting spirit from our
   players Most of all – a great bench

   There is still a lot of room for improvement and as the season
   progresses we can only hope to get even better. We did not play the
   greatest of football on the day but the signs of good football were
   there. Tukkies on the other hand had their own plans – long balls
   behind the defenders and to the strikers. We were able to play from the
   second phased ball. Our resolute defending frustrated Tukkies a lot and
   they ended up been desperate.

   We will continue to work harder to collect as many points as possible
   in the first round.

   I must congratulate our Supporters for coming in their numbers to
   support their team -they are a key component to our growth and
   development.

   This win was a fitting women’s day gift to our chair lady and our hard
   working manager
   [201415sb-e1537956214506-150x150.jpg]

   Going into the final game of the season as 2015 NFD Champions is always
   pleasing and gives great satisfaction knowing we achieved our goal with
   a game to spare.

   But this could also have been a very tricky fixture as we had nothing
   to prove or play for except our pride and maybe upholding our record of
   only losing 2 games the whole season.

   For a change we managed to score first through Sibusiso Sibeko with
   ,what most people would say, is his weaker foot. Individual brilliance
   and taking responsibility in the 18 yard area by having a shot at goal.

   We might not have dominated the game but we played like true champions
   by moving and shifting the ball across the park. Our solid defense has
   been key throughout this season and once again proved to be the
   difference in the result even though we did concede.

   Our substitutions in the majority of our game has proved to be the
   difference between losing and winning games this season. Once again
   Prince Nxumalo came off the bench and had an immediate impact with his
   movement and speed. From a Deon Hotto corner Prince managed to pull
   away to the far post and create some space for himself and slotted the
   ball home from close range to give us the lead and the win.

   Ending off our season in style was always priority and the way we did
   it can only be a compliment to the players for the effort and
   commitment they have shown every game.

   I would also like to take this opportunity to thank Mato Madlala for
   giving me the opportunity to lead this team the past season and get the
   team back to the PSL. My coaching staff as well as all the people that
   are never visible but make a massive difference when it comes to making
   things easier for the players.

   An outstanding season capped by the enormous support we have had from
   all our fans throughout the season, home and away.

   We truly thank and appreciate everyone that believed in us and trust
   the support will continue for years to come.

   Thank you and God Bless!!!
   [larsen1718-e1537974723139-150x150.jpg]

   I’m writing this report with tears of joy in my eyes as we achieved our
   goal of automatic promotion by getting the point we needed to get back
   to the PSL, With 2 games remaining.

   Playing our penultimate game at home was the perfect opportunity to
   wrap up the league in front of our home fans. We started the game very
   tentative and nervous by giving possession away unnecessary in critical
   areas. It seems to be the story of our season by going a goal behind
   and having to come back to either draw or win games.

   The resilience and fighting spirit we’ve shown throughout the season is
   what this team was built on. Along with the self believe, trust and
   confidence in each other we showed against all odds,what can be
   achieved once you know where you going.

   Our 2nd half was once again a different affair as we piled on the
   pressure on All Stars and the deserved equaliser through Prince
   Nxumalo.

   We can now celebrate as Champions of the 2015 NFD with 1 game to go and
   that in itself gives me great satisfaction as the head coach of this
   club.

   I would like to thank my technical team and support staff for their
   hard work throughout the season in order for us to get back to the
   elite league of top flight football.

   Also a big thank you to all our loyal supporters that came to our
   matches and motivating our players through difficult time.

   A consecutive KZN derby in 5 days posed a major hurdle in our quest to
   secure that automatic promotion.

   Thanda was always going to be a tough opponent as they needed to bounce
   back from their defeat against Warriors and ensure they continue their
   push for a play off place.

   Underestimating opposition had never been part of our vocabulary but
   once again our slow start to the game allowed Thanda to dominate
   possession in the first half and take the lead through a corner.

   Another well taken free kick to equalise from Mabhuti Khenyeza brought
   us back into the game but a lapse of concentration gifted them the 2nd
   goal through a inswinging corner and miscalculation from our
   goalkeeper.

   Our fighting spirit and the will to win has been the foundation of this
   team and we again showed that we possessed that believe to come back
   every time we faced with difficult situations. Our 2nd goal through
   Nkanyiso Cele came at the right time as it changed my team talk at
   halftime.

   The next goal in a game like this is always important and we
   fortunately applied enough pressure to get the lead and 3rd goal
   through Zukile Mkhize.

   The last 15 minutes was a tense affair as Thanda really pushed us all
   the way and we defended for our lives and the victory we desperately
   needed.

   This victory showed we have been working towards our goal with the
   discipline needed and that we do not need favors from anyone but
   continue to work as a team.

   We will see all our supporters at Chatsworth on Sunday for our last
   home vs Cape Town All Stars.

   Playing a derby game can be a tricky affair as you never know what type
   of game it might bring.

   This game today was a totally different scenario as I’ve never seen
   rivals go at each other with everything and probably produced one of
   the most entertaining games for us as a club and fans were concerned in
   the NFD this season.

   We started the game at the tempo that we demanded from our players and
   applied a lot of pressure on our opponents by forcing them into
   mistakes and creating some chances ourselves. Going a goal behind
   always seems to bring the best out of my players and we bounced back
   through another goal from Mabhudi Khenyeza.

   The concentration level normally drops after scoring and that’s how we
   conceded the 2nd shortly after our equaliser. After sorting out some
   minor problems in our play, we came out with more determination and
   desire to win the game.

   The next goal was always going to be important as far as the result was
   concerned and fortunately for us it came through a Fikizolo penalty.
   Once we took the lead there was no chance of Eagles coming back as the
   fitness superiority was evident and we proved that by getting the 4th
   goal through Hotto after some great counter attacking football.

   Yes we’ve managed to get the bragging rights in the KZN derby today but
   we still have 3 games to play and another KZN vs Thanda on Wednesday.

   The champagne will be on ice until we know we have secured that
   automatic promotion and achieved our goal set out at the beginning of
   the season. Thanks to all our supporters that came out in numbers to
   Chatsworth today.

   5 games were standing between us and our goal of automatic promotion
   back to the PSL.

   We started a very tough week yesterday against Maluti FET College where
   we will be playing 3 games in 8 days.

   We knew that they would be coming at us with everything but the kitchen
   sink as they had nothing to lose,as the team looking likely to be
   relegated.

   Once again we started the game a bit tentative and conceded against the
   run of play with some poor defending. Set plays was going to be a big
   part of our game as we started with probably our tallest team thus far.

   Getting the equalizer through Katjiukua made things more interesting
   and we managed to find our rhythm. With a lapse of concentration we
   allowed them to score their 2nd and we went into half time 2-1 down.

   It always seems that the half time team talk brings out the best out of
   players as we started the remaining 45 minutes with more urgency and
   tempo. Grabbing the 2nd goal through a Fikizolo’s penalty and then the
   3rd through a Hendricks free kick made life a bit easier for the last
   part of the game.

   Our 4th goal came through some neat inter play between Masaole and
   Khenyeza, where he managed to get his shot off Playing with 10 men for
   the last 15 minutes allowed us to create a few more chances and Nxumalo
   obliged by putting our 5th goal in from a low cross from Cele.

   Emphatic win that got us back on track as far as getting victories are
   concerned but more importantly keeping the gap between ourselves and
   Cosmos.

   Now onto Vasco on Wednesday at Princess Magogo where we hope to secure
   another win and keep the momentum and our goal of automatic promotion
   alive.

   Keep on supporting the team until we achieve our goal.

   Playing in the quarter final of the Nedbank Cup vs Supersport was a
   welcomed distraction from the league as our players have felt the
   pressure of being at the top of the log the last 10 days.

   We went into the game with no expectations and enjoy the occasion as no
   one gave us a chance of winning this game.

   We started the game with more energy and desire than our opponents and
   created a few opportunities early on in the game. Our passing game was
   better than our previous 2 games and we should have capitalised with
   the dominance of possession in the first half.

   The 2nd half was an opened affair as both team attacked at will but we
   had the more clear cut chances and brought the best out of the
   Supersport goalkeeper.

   Our fast and speedy counter attacks caused problems for their defense
   along the movement of our wingers.

   We definitely gave a good account of ourselves and showed why we are
   top of the NFD log. Losing 1-0 was definitely an indication how we have
   defended the past 9 months and the foundation we have set in place.

   Now that the cup run are over, we can solely concentrate on the league
   and our push for that automatic promotion back to the PSL.

   Playing our consecutive away game in 5 days was always going to test
   our player’s fitness as well as mental strength.

   We started the game much better than our our outing against Witbank
   Spurs. The tempo and urgency looked improved and we managed to put a
   few passes together to get into the final third.

   They did manage to create a few opportunities and had a couple of
   chances but our defense and goalkeeper Mbaeva stood firm and we went
   into the halftime goalless.

   In The 2nd half once again we increase our intensity and had more clear
   cut chances to score. Our organisation and tactical discipline will
   always give us a good foundation to go and attack the opposition.

   Even if we played for another 2 days, I don’t think we would have
   scored. It was just one of those games where their goalkeeper was
   stopping everything that came his way.

   Credit to my players, as once again we didn’t concede nor lose our game
   and we keep the momentum with us.

   Our players can now go into the Nedbank Cup vs Supersport on Saturday
   more relaxed and enjoy the occasion but still give a good account of
   ourselves and not destroy what we have built thus far.

   Thanks for the continuous support from back home.

   Finding ourselves at the top of the log after our win against Ga
   Rankuwa was exactly what we have been working for.

   But now we have to continue with the same work ethic and commitment
   that we have shown in our previous 7 games.

   Witbank Spurs came to Witbank stadium with only 1 thing in mind and
   that was to defend and go home with a draw.

   It was a very frustrating game for our team and as we piled on the
   pressure and created a number of chances to wrap up the game but
   nothing would go in.

   Not once did Witbank Spurs threaten our goal during the 90 minutes and
   unfortunately our dominance didn’t get the reward with the win.

   We have to bounce back now against Baroka on Wednesday afternoon in
   another away game at Peter Mokaba stadium

   Looking forward to the continous support from fans.

   Our consecutive KZN derby in the Nedbank Cup meant bragging rights was
   up for grabs again, be it against lower league opposition Natal Utd.

   Playing lower league teams always tends to pose more problems as we
   didn’t know much about them but we had to prepare in the right manner
   to avoid being eliminated.

   We didn’t start the game as we planned as far as dictating the tempo of
   the game and,or keeping possession.

   They came with a plan of attacking at all costs as they had nothing to
   lose even if they ended up the losing side. We allowed them too much
   space and time on the ball and they grew in confidence with the support
   of their travelling crowd behind them.

   The start of the 2nd half we needed to score early as we planned during
   half time and we got the lead through another Mabhuti Khenyeza goal.

   The last 30 minutes was nerve wrecking as Natal Utd came at us in
   numbers but once again we stood strong and countered with fast
   attacking play and could have scored the second goal to wrap up the
   game.

   We are in the quarter finals draw now and look forward to our next
   opponents with bated breath.

   Thanks for all the support that came to Chatsworth today.

   Playing teams that are not in direct competition with us for the league
   title are always more difficult to play as you need to motivate your
   players much more.

   A very hot Pretoria welcomed us and we knew that we needed to apply our
   normal possession game to reserve energy and be patient to expose
   Garankuwa’s defense.
   Once again the deadlock was broken by Andile Fikizolo with a well taken
   goal to give the lead into halftime.

   The 2nd half was a totally different story as Garankuwa started to put
   more pressure on our defense and we also allowed them too much space
   and time on the ball.

   Defending has been our strength this season and proved it by staying
   compact and dealing with all the attacks on our goal.

   Max Mbaeva made some great saves to keep us in the game and that gave
   us more confidence going the other way. We finally scored the second
   and winning goal through Mabhuti Khenyeza a Well deserved victory for
   the club and extending not only our winning run but also our lead at
   the top of the log.

   Now onto the Nedbank Cup tie with Natal United next week Sunday at
   Chatsworth and a well deserved break from the league for 2 weeks.

   After drawing our last two games we needed to bounce back with a win
   against Cosmos, especially being a home game.

   A top of the table clash always guarantees entertainment for the
   supporters but the game ws important to us as a ateam for the victory.

   Going up 1-0 through a magnificent header from Prince Nxumalo gave us
   the deserving lead and platform for the 2nd half.

   Cosmos was peppering our goal with long balls and direct play but we
   dealt with it until a confusing moment where allowed them to equalise.

   The last 20 mins was all us as we changed the tempo of the game and a
   shot from Andile Fikizolo put us ahead again.

   Against the run of play with some good counter attacking football saw
   us break away and Deon Hotto scoring the 3rd and securing our victory.

   We will remain humble and our feet on the ground and coming to work as
   a team as we travel to Garankuwa next week.

   Thanks for all the support we had at the game today and glad we could
   make you proud once again.

   Our second game away on the trot was going to be testing after only
   managing a draw against Warriors in our previous game, as well as Cape
   based sides being more physical and direct in their playing style.

   Again, we struggled with our first half performance, we never seemed to
   find rhythm or momentum and indifferent performances from some of our
   players compounded the situation. Half time breaks for coaches are
   always welcomed, as it provides us an opportunity to rectify any first
   half mistakes as well as re-organise the team for the remainder of the
   game.

   We started the second half better and managed to put Santos under
   pressure early on, however not being able to convert our chances was
   again an issue and this allowed them to stay in the game. We eventually
   managed to create a chance through an unlikely penalty which Zukile
   Mkhize converted with great ease.

   The last 15 minutes was frantic as the pressure increased, and we had
   to deal with a lot of long throws and free kicks into our box. With the
   last action of the game, Santos eaqualised through a long throw which
   we never dealt with properly and ended up conceding and allowing the
   draw.

   A massive game versus Cosmos is waiting for us on Saturday at
   Chatsworth and we trust we get the maximum points to regain top spot
   with the help of our supporters.

   After being on a great run of results and form, we knew the African
   Warriors encounter will be a tricky one for us.

   This is a team fighting for survival and you could see their intentions
   from the very start. Piling on the pressure and creating opportunities
   to have shots at our goal.

   The first half was a one sided affair with Warriors having the majority
   of the possession. We however could not found our rythm or play our
   passing game which made it a nervous first 45.

   We came out in the second half a different team and started to put some
   passes together and also creating chances to score.

   We once again defended as a team preventing them from scoring and also
   conceding the victory by clearing a few balls off our goal line.

   This will definitely be a point that will help our quest to achieve
   that final goal of promotion. The fighting spirit shown by my players
   with a never say die attitude is the reason we are still top of the
   league table.

   Another opportunity vs Santos in Cape Town on Wednesday is awaiting us
   and this time around we will have to get all 3 points to bounce back
   and create a bigger gap between ourselves and the rest of the league.

   Playing in the Nedbank Cup is always a welcome relief from the League.
   This time around though it was as tough as a League game because we
   were playing our neighbours Amazulu in a KZN derby.

   We started the game a bit tentative and on the back foot due to some
   nervous decisions made by my players.

   Conceding so early in the game was never part of the plan but once
   again once we found our rythm and moved the ball around once the
   confidence in the team grew.

   Scoring the equaliser, through Mabhuti Khenyeza’s free kick, just
   before half time was critical as it changed not only the complex of the
   game but also my team talk at half time.

   The 2nd half we showed more desire and determination than Amazulu and
   that was the key in us getting the winning goal through some hard work.

   We played at a high tempo in the 2nd half and I do not think Amazulu
   could handled that.

   Well deserved win amd now onto our next game in the league which will
   be away to African Warriors.

   Thanks for all the support that came to Princess Magogo to get behind
   the team.

   After having ended the first round on a good run of 2 games, winning
   both 2-0, we needed to continue that run and keep the momentum with us
   against a tough Milano outfit.

   The conditions in Cape Town were a bit tricky as the wind picked up
   drastically and made playing difficult. We coped with the elements and
   made it count with our set plays as Mabhuti Khenyeza got off the mark
   with a well taken header from a Hendricks free kick.

   We dominated the game from there on and showed the desire and
   commitment needed to outplay good teams with our fast attacking counter
   attacking football.

   Another Hendricks free kick saw Fikizolo head in our 2nd goal to show
   our dominance.

   The 2nd half we played into the wind and that can always set you back
   but we continued our pressure by creating more chances however we could
   unfortunately not convert them.

   FC Cape Town will be visiting us on Saturday and we must start a good
   run now and create a bigger gap between ourselves and the rest of the
   NFD. Looking forward to our supporters coming in numbers to keep
   driving the team to our final goal of automatic promotion. See you all
   at Chatsworth on Saturday.

   Playing Cape Town teams are never easy but once again we had to do
   battle with FC Cape Town today after our win vs Milano.

   Windy conditions welcomed us at Chatsworth but we didn’t show that it
   would affect us. Andile Fikizolo got his 2nd goal in as many games with
   a well taken run and finish. We were put under a lot of pressure by the
   opponents but endured the onslaught and defended for our lives in order
   to secure the win to keep us on top of the log.

   Prince Nxumalo once again made a difference with his strength, speed
   and movement to cause problems in their defence. He created the 2nd
   goal with a deflection from one of their defenders.

   Now onto our Nedbank Cup game vs Amazulu next Friday at Princess
   Magogo. Thanks for the continuous supports from all our fans today at
   Chatsworth.

   Today’s encounter was going to be difficult as both teams won their
   last 2 games and confidence were high on both sides.

   We needed to start the game the same way we did vs Highlands as far as
   tempo and passing accuracy was concerned.

   The 1st half was definitely a rather frustrating one for the coaching
   staff as we dominated with possession and also with creating the most
   goal scoring opportunities but could not find the back of the net.

   We eventually found the 1st goal through Tebogo Masaole, who continues
   his good goal scoring form.

   We started the 2nd half a bit tentative and Leopards piled on the
   pressure as they felt they could still come back to win the game.

   With good counter attacking play, we created a few more chances to wrap
   up the game but the 2nd goal came late in the game through Masaole
   again.

   The performance for me today without a doubt justified our position on
   the log and also the fighting spirit my players have shown over the
   last 16 games.

   It was the best way to start our 2nd round of fixtures and also to end
   off with a victory to give everyone involved with the club a nice
   Christmas break.

   To all our supporters, once again a big thank you for your support and
   encouraging motivation towards my players.

   Have a great festive season and travel safe on the roads as we hope to
   see you all back in the new year.

   After a much needed win vs Milano in the Nedbank qualifying round it
   was back to business of league fixtures.

   The win in the cup definitely improved our confidence and morale in the
   squad as we came into this game with our tails up.

   Preparation for today’s game went very well and everyone put their
   hands up to be in the squad for this match.

   We started the game at the right tempo by immediately applying pressure
   on our opponents and going back to our normal passing game.

   The 1st goal was very important for us as that would give the players
   more confidence in our attack and it duly arrived from Omar Hendricks
   with yet another trademark free kick.

   The 2nd half was a more entertaining affair as we continued with great
   attacking play but could not show anything for it until Nkanyiso Cele
   pounced onto a cross and headed the ball in.

   A welcomed victory for the team in the league after a hard fought
   performance from the boys.

   Black Leopards next week will also be a tough task but our players
   showed they are willing to fight til the end for the result.
   Looking forward to seeing you at Chatsworth again next Saturday and
   your support.

   Nedbank Cup Vs Milano United

   We welcomed the relief from our league fixtures in our qualifying round
   of the Nedbank Cup 2015 vs Milano at Chatsworth.

   This was a game that we wanted to use to bounce back from our poor form
   of late and also to give some fringe players the opportunity to start
   and impress the coaching team. A good performance from them and the
   possibility of putting their names in the hat  for our upcoming game vs
   Highlands Park this coming Saturday.

   It was a rather nervous start from some of the debutants and we once
   again fell behind early through a corner kick.
   We had to react quickly and make substitutions to change the game.
   Introducing Hotto and Kok made the difference as we settled down to our
   normal passing game and started to create more chances to score. A well
   taken free kick from Brandon Parusnath gave us the equaliser and put us
   back into the game.

   The 2nd half was an entertaining affair and definitely kept us on the
   edge of our seats as fans and coaches alike. Both teams threatened with
   good attacking play but we were fortunate enough to pile on the
   pressure and force a penalty in our favour. Zukile Mkhize stepped up
   and duly converted the spot kick to give us the lead and eventually the
   result.

   Now we have 2 home league games left until the Christmas break and we
   trust today’s result will restore the confidence in our players as well
   as the team for the remaining 2 weeks.

   Hope to see you all at Chatsworth on Saturday for our game vs Highlands
   Park and your continuous support for the boys.

   After our 1st league loss vs Thanda,  we needed to bounce back against
   Cape Town All Stars who has been in very good form for the past few
   weeks.

   All Stars came at us from the very 1st minute with fast attacking play
   and quick passing  and we also didn’t help our game by giving
   possession away far too many times and put ourselves under unnecessary
   pressure in critical areas.

   The 1st goal of the game is always important as it gives the momentum
   to that team. We unfortunately conceded the 1st two goals of the game
   and found ourselves 2-0 down within a few minutes through some very
   unusual mistakes and individual errors in the midfield as well as the
   back.

   The next goal was going to be crucial as it could determine the result
   of this game or whether we had a chnce of coming back. We managed to
   pull a goal back through Zwane and quickly found some confidence until
   half time. Missed opportunities was again our downfall as All stars
   would come back and punish us for those misses. There was only one team
   in the 2nd half and they managed to get a further 2 goals and condemn
   us to our 2nd consecutive loss for the season.

   To say we were never in the game would be an understatement as we
   hardly caused them problems in their defending half. It was without a
   doubt a very dark day in this club history and my short coaching career
   by this humiliating result.

   Wednesday’s cup game gives us a breather from the league but also a
   very good chance to bring back the confidence with a victory vs Milano
   United at Chatsworth. The quicker we put the All Stars game behind us
   the quicker we can restore the morale and trust in each other and
   continue our fight for promotion.

   Another minor setback but we are still only 3 points behind the log
   leaders.

   Going into the game vs Thanda, we knew the importance of a victory
   after back to back draws against Royal Eagles and Vasco.

   KZN derbies are always very difficult to call but we have been working
   on the weaknesses of our opponents and preparation went well leading up
   to the game. Once again we started tentative and allowed the opponents
   too much time and space on the ball.

   You can allow the opposition to score first so many times and be able
   to come back into the game with the fighting spirit we have shown the
   last few games. The red card (2 yellow cards) received by Siyabonga
   Dube was not ideal as we were trying to bounce back before half time.

   The introduction of Deon Hotto again proved to bring a spark into our
   attack and started to create some chances. A well worked move from
   Sibeko and good cross put pressure on their defense and goalkeeper,
   where Deon Hotto capitalised by pouncing to score the equalizer.

   We then showed some confidence with good patches of play even though we
   were still playing with 10 men. A few individual errors caused to be
   the downfall of our team and also conceding another 2 goals to
   eventually lose the game 3-1.

   It is almost impossible to win a match when about 7 of your players do
   not turn up for the game with very poor performances and showing no
   desire to actually get the victory. Football is not all about speed and
   skill but also showing the desire and will to win from the start.

   Next 3 games, until the Christmas break have now become critical for
   our team. Not just as far as results but also to restore the confidence
   and morale in the camp.

   Bouncbackability will be the word to get my players on the right track
   again and in the running for promotion again.

   Playing in Cape Town is always difficult as you need to adapt to a
   different playing style as well as weather conditions to endure.

   Vasco came into the game with some indifferent form but we never
   underestimated the potential of a backlash. They started the game at a
   higher tempo the us and should have been a goal up within the 1st
   minute if not for the brilliance of our keeper, Max Mbaeva.

   Once we found our rhythm and passing game, we quickly settled down and
   started to put more pressure on our opponents and creating a few
   opportunities to score. The windy conditions made it a bit tricky,
   which seemed to benefit them more than us.

   Going into the half time break was the best result we  could have asked
   for, knowing that some of our players were not on top form and had
   moments of lapses of concentration. Finding solutions to the problems
   we encountered in the 1st half was priority and then also having more
   shots at their goal.

   Going down 1-0 was never part of our plan, but once again the fighting
   spirit and character of my players showed why we are still contending
   for automatic promotion to the PSL.  Set plays have been an integral
   part of this team in scoring goals, and we again benefited from a free
   kick taken by Deon Hotto and Zukile Mkhize reacted quickest to a fumble
   by the Vasco keeper to get us the goal. The last 15 minutes was end to
   end stuff and missed opportunities by ourselves resulted in a hard
   fought 1-1 draw at Parow park.

   Another KZN derby vs Thanda gives us the chance to keep that top spot
   and possibly extend the gap. Looking forward to seeing you all at
   Chatsworth on Sunday and come to support our boys.

   Going into our 1st KZN derby vs Royal Eagles was always going to be a
   tough game.

   We started the game really well by applying pressure in the right areas
   and even created a few clear opportunities to score.

   Eagles had the upper hand in stages throughout the 1st half and that
   was expected as the home team they had to come with a more attacking
   approach.

   Against the run of play we created the goal that we needed going into
   half time.

   Playing against 10 players always seems to be harder than 11 as they
   had nothing to lose but keep playing their style of football.

   Conceding from a set play, which in my opinion never was a free kick,
   was difficult to accept as we constantly train these things and a lapse
   of concentration cost us again.

   Was a draw a fair result in the end? That is a question we can only
   answer come the end of the season when we look at the tally of points.

   We have 2 more games against Vasco and Thanda in the next 6 days where
   we can bounce from the Eagles result, and that is the beauty of
   football.

   Still proud of my players and the supporters that came out to Umlazi
   yesterday to support us.

   Thanks and see you at the Thanda game next week.

   Another great team performance and emphatic win to keep our momentum
   going.

   Going into this game we knew the importance of the victory as we needed
   to keep the top spot on the table and possible create a small gap
   between us and the rest of the chasing pack.

   We started in the best possible way by scoring first through Sibeko but
   once again allowed the opposition a few shots on our goal and back into
   the game by not killing the game off.

   Half time was the best thing that could have happened as we had to
   regroup and sort out some minor problems that was happening on the
   field.

   We came out stronger in the 2nd half and showed our class by grabbing
   another 2 goals through Masoale and Vilikazi. Unfortunately we conceded
   again shortly after scoring through an own goal.

   Leading by 1 goal was not the ideal score and were desperate to get
   another goal in order to have some breathing space. We had some anxious
   moments in the last 15mins but stood our ground and managed to get the
   victory through the our 4th goal by Mkhize to wrap up the match.

   Scoring 8 goals in our last 2 games was very pleasing as we have
   struggled to find the back of the net in our previous 8 games.

   We now have 2 weeks to prepare ourselves for our 1st KZN derby vs Royal
   Eagles on 22 November.

   Once again thanks for the support today and hope to see you all at our
   next game.

   We had another chance to put the disappointment of the Witbank Spurs
   result behind us with an improved performance against Baroka.

   After starting the game a bit slow and conceding our first goal of the
   season, we showed our character by coming from behind twice.

   The 2nd half we played without a doubt our best football thus far and
   got another 2 goals to go 4-2 up.

   The game was also a great milestone for Teboho Masaole as he got a hat
   trick of goals.

   This squad have shown over the past few weeks our resilience game after
   game and for me that needs to continue until we get automatic
   promotion.

   We now have to go to Cape Town and get something out of the game, where
   we will be up against a tough Vasco on Sunday.

   Once again thank you to our supporters that came out to boost the boys
   and keep the confidence on a high.

   Finding ourselves at the top of the log after our win against Ga
   Rankuwa was exactly what we have been working for.

   But now we have to continue with the same work ethic and commitment
   that we have shown in our previous 7 games.

   Witbank Spurs came to Chatsworth with only 1 thing in mind and that was
   to defend and go home with a draw.

   It was a very frustrating game for our team and as we piled on the
   pressure and created a number of chances to wrap up the game but
   nothing would go in.

   Not once did Witbank Spurs threaten our goal during the 90 minutes and
   unfortunately our dominance didn’t get the just reward with the win.

   We have to bounce back now against Baroka on Wednesday afternoon in
   another home game at Chatsworth.

   Looking forward to the continous support from fans.

   The international break is never easy for any coach or club as it
   normally breaks your momentum.

   We had 2 weeks to prepare for our game vs Garankuwa United and we’re
   confident we can continue our fine form.

   Home games are priority for our promotion and we started the game in
   the best possible way. Putting pressure on our opponent with our set
   plays and delivering crosses into the big box.

   A long ball from Siyabonga Dube found Teboho Masaole compete with the
   defender and getting the keeper off his line was the luck we needed to
   result in our goal.

   There were moments in the game where we had very good passes and
   patterns of play to create a few more chances. They are a playing team
   with trying to keep possession but we once again contained their
   attacks.

   The 2nd half was an open affair as both teams attacked and left spaces
   in defense to be exploited. Our defending has been the rock of our
   previous games and we again showed our resilience by keeping another
   clean sheet.

   Getting the points on the board and climbing the log is important for
   the club but we are still concerned about our lack of goals that has
   been eluding us for the past few games.

   Witbank Spurs away next week will be another tough game but we are
   confident with the right approach and game plan, we can come away with
   a positive result.

   Thanks for the support we got at Chatsworth yesterday and trust it will
   continue for the rest of the season.

   Both teams went into this with a certain amount of confidence after
   picking up wins in their last game respectively.

   It was a very scrappy game where both teams tried to play their normal
   passing game but the pitch was not making it possible to do so.

   We managed to contain them and they quickly went to a long and direct
   way of play. We struggled to play our normal game and yet managed to
   get the attacking to create some half chances.

   It definitely was a battle of former PSL teams and no one was prepared
   to lose this game.

   For ourselves, it was a continuation of our last few games where we
   just could not manage to put the ball in goal after creating good
   chances to convert. Our defence stood rock solid again and gave us a
   platform to go and attack with freedom.

   6 games played now in the NFD and the players have shown they are well
   capable of fighting for every point and make sure we go unbeaten for as
   long as possible.

   We have a 2 week break now due to international games being played next
   weekend but for us it is more time to prepare for our next game vs
   GA-RANKUWA at Chatsworth.

   We look forward to seeing all our fans at our next game and their
   support for the rest of the season.

   We went into the Santos game where our priority was still a win as we
   needed to keep our momentum and continue to build on what we started.

   Knowing that we will encounter a good team with a lot of attacking
   power in Santos, we had to dictate the tempo of the game and also apply
   the pressure on them from the beginning.

   We had very good passages of play with passing the ball around nicely
   and created a few opportunities in the first half. Containing their
   wingers from putting crosses into our box was important and dealt with
   them very well.

   Getting the first goal of the game was critical as we needed to benefit
   from our domination. A free kick from Brandon Parusnath into the Santos
   box caused some problems as it was headed in by a Santos defender for
   an own goal.

   The game gave our players more confidence and played with a lot more
   freedom and attacked at will. Missed opportunities was again the order
   of the day and hopefully we will soon capitalise on the chances we
   create.

   Another 3 points in the bag and keeping our unbeaten run continues with
   the best positive being that we still have not conceded a goal in the
   NFD.

   A tough away trip to Jomo Cosmos next week will be our next challenge
   and we will strive to keep pushing in our quest for automatic
   promotion.

   Thanks for the support we got at Chatsworth from our loyal fans and
   trust it will be the same for the rest of the season.

   Finally we got our 1st home win and the points we needed to climb up
   the table.

   African Warriors was always going to pose a threat with their attacking
   players.

   We started the game with a good tempo and fast attacking play. The goal
   coming from another set play early on in the game and once again we
   should have capitalised from very good counter attacks that was not
   converted.

   The final 30 minutes was definitely something I would not like to
   experience again as we were under a lot of pressure and had defend with
   our lives to secure the 3 points.

   The longer the score stayed at 1-0 they always had a chance of coming
   back. But my players showed resilience and determination to defend as a
   team.

   Well done boys and now on to prepare for Santos next week Saturday at
   Chatsworth.

   Thanks for the continous support from all our fans.

   Undefeated in our first 2 games was exactly the start we wanted even
   though we could not get maximum points in our last game at home vs
   Milano.

   Going up against FC Cape Town, who got 7 points from their last 3
   games, was always going to be a tough task as they were full of
   confidence.

   We once again presented ourselves well with creating a few
   opportunities before half time and definitely could have had the lead
   through Sibeko who missed a great chance in front of goal.

   We knew that this was going to be a physical encounter, as we picked up
   a few injuries that lead to forced changes at half time with Sithole
   being substituted and later Omar Hendricks leaving the field to get
   stitches after a collusion earlier in the game.

   Missed opportunities was once the downfall of us not getting all the
   points in Cape Town but the positives continue to be that we are still
   unbeaten and yet to concede a goal.

   A massive home game vs African Warriors next week where nothing less
   than 3 points will do as we need to get some points on the board to
   ensure we don’t fall behind the front runners.

   We have set ourselves a great foundation defensively, and now we need
   to start scoring goals in order to get more wins.

   All your support will drive our team to forward amd improve game by
   game.

   Thanks

   Our 1st NFD Home League game vs Milano Utd was always going to be a
   tough one.

   We prepared well for this game and we’re expecting a very physical
   encounter against the Cape side.
   The foundation we put in place against Black Leopards was something to
   build on against Milano but the windy conditions also made it quite
   difficult to play our normal brand of football.
   Milano came with a game plan and 1 point was priority for them. We
   tried our best creating opportunities to score and once again a lack of
   composure and calmness cost us all the points.
   Having played the 2 toughest opponents in the league as our first two
   games and not conceding nor losing, we can be very optimistic with the
   future.
   We have to continously work hard at our game and earn the right to
   every 3 points available when we enter the field of play.
   FC Cape Town in 2 weeks will be a game where we can get back on track
   as far as getting more wins in the bag.
   Thanks for the support

   As we started our new campaign in the NFD with our 1st game vs Black
   Leopards in Thohoyandou,  it gave a very clear indication of how tough
   this season will be.

   We had a game plan and our players executed it to perfection with a
   great team fighting spirit all of us can be proud of.
   After starting the game a bit slow we found our rythm and started to
   pass the ball around nicely.

   The goal came from a corner and that already made the technical team
   very happy as we have not scored from a set play for quite some time.
   We had to defend with our lives and the players did exactly that.
   Throwing their bodies in front of every shot towards our goal.
   Our organisation and compactness paid off and now we can look forward
   to our next league game vs Milano at Chatsworth next Saturday 30
   August.

   Hoping to see you at the game next week.
   [larsen1718-e1537974723139-150x150.jpg]

   After a very difficult season for Lamontville Golden Arrows and 14
   years in the PSL, we bowed out after our last 2 games against Amazulu
   and Orlando Pirates.

   We have always been in the forefront of developing young talent and
   giving those players the opportunity to prove themselves, and we will
   continue that philosophy going into the NFD.

   In our game against Pirates we had a glimpse at the talent we have with
   the club at present with the introduction of Sibeko and Sibiya and over
   the months will introduce other players to the squad.

   I would like to thank all of Abafana Bes’thendes supporters for you
   unfaulted support and encouragement in our campaigns in the PSL over
   the years, and would like to assure you all that Lamontville Golden
   Arrows is not done. Our job is still to grow local football and give
   you a team to be proud of.

   We would all ask that your continued support carries over into the NFD
   and your encouragement comes with as we fight for our return to the
   PSL.
   [larsen-e1537974398522-150x150.jpg]

   Getting our second away win for the season against Platinum Stars gave
   us a bit of momentum going into our game against SuperSport United. And
   created a positive vibe in the camp that carried through to our game.

   We knew it was going to be a physical challenge as our opponent play a
   very direct game, we were not wrong and had definitely prepared for the
   game we expected.

   Defending as a team and then creating chances at the other end was how
   we intended to score and would be our biggest asset in order to get 3
   points.

   Again we had the better of the possession and this allowed us to create
   chances in the 1st half to score but couldn’t convert any of our
   chances.

   However, we were not disappointed going into the break with both teams
   scoreless.

   In the second half, We had to increase our efforts to get that elusive
   goal and the strategy we had decided on allowed us to do exactly that.
   Playing with all our attacking players from the start meant we had
   enough to get that goal and we did through Ntuli in the 64th minute.

   After all the pressure we put on SuperSport, we had the reward to show
   for it. I am only hoping that all the chances we never took will be
   saved for the remaining two games we have against Amazulu and Orlando
   Pirates.

   We live on to fight another day and continue our quest for survival.

   As a team, we needed to take all the positives we had from our previous
   game against Celtic and build on them for our encounter against
   Platinum Stars.

   We began the game slightly sluggish and were not on top of the
   opposition and their game until after the half-hour mark.

   After Kuboni’s penatly, we started passing the ball with a lot more
   confidence, however we still managed to concede a goal just before half
   time from a free kick in our box.

   We needed to create our opportunities properly and we did when just
   before hlaf time, a cross from Zwane caused the keeper to slip,
   allowing Mbewe to pull another goal and take us into the break with a
   goals lead.

   The way we came back in the second half was going to be key to our
   result and we needed to apply the right pressure and play to our
   gameplan discussed in order to make sure we maintaned our lead.

   We played positive and constructive football and this set bester up for
   a cracking long-shot goal that could be a contender for goal of the
   season.

   We were in the zone and our positive play caused Stars to make errors
   in their game, and once again an error by their keeper allowed Ntuli to
   take us up 4-1. That sealed the game for us.

   Finally all our good play we have had resulted in some goals that we
   have been long over due.

   This could be the result we have been searching for, the one to turn
   our season and continue our fight.

   After gaining a valuable point in Cape Town against  Ajax last week, we
   knew that ultimately a win against Bloem Celtic would be of utmost
   importance in our campaign.

   We started with all the attacking options we had in order to push for
   the win we wanted.

   Going into half time at goalless we were positive that our game plan
   was successful , however Celtic scored against the run of play in the
   early minutes of the second half. This was because we allowed  them to
   pass their way through our defence and gave them too much space on the
   ball. We were dealt the ultimate punishment for this, and they went
   ahead.

   Because of this our game planned had to change slightly, and getting
   the equaliser then became our priority. Moholo ensured we had an
   exciting finish on our hands when he scored in the 64th minute.

   Our cause was then given a lifeline in the 75th minute when Celtic
   received a red card for a foul on Khuboni .

   Applying more pressure during the last 15  minutes was always going to
   have setbacks and we gave them some counter attacking movements.

   With almost the last kick of the game Mbewe could have won it for us
   but a clearance off the line denied us the victory.

   We will have to win all our remaining games in order to survive now. We
   meet Platinum Stars on the weekend at Royal Bafokeng Stadium in the
   first of our last 4 games.

   Losing the KZN  derby against Maritzburg Utd was not easy to accept but
   we had to pick ourselves up to take on Ajax in Cape Town.

   We went into the game with some confidence primarily out of the
   positives we took from our game against Maritzburg Utd.

   After dominating the first 20 minutes, we were rewarded with a penalty
   when Deon Hotto was bought down in the penalty area, Khuboni stepped up
   and with no pressure scored our first goal in 5 games.

   We conceded the worst possible goal just before half time and this
   forced me to change my talk with the team half time completely.

   In the second half we fought well and scored what I thought to be the
   winner 3 mins from full time through Festus Mbewe .This  was a great
   reward for the players hard work. However,  once again through a lapse
   in concentration and lack of experience we conceded the equaliser in
   the last minute.

   A point away from home is always a positive even though we should have
   had all 3 points

   Now looking forward to Celtic on Wednesday at King Zwelethini Stadium

   Our game against Maritzburg United proved another frustrating day for
   our team. We were too flat in the first half and once again, one
   mistake cost us .

   In the second half we tried to play more in their half and this game
   plan created a couple of chances for us to score, but none that ended
   up in the back of the net.

   The energy and intensity of the team throughout game was much better
   and we put Maritzburg under a lot of pressure.

   We possibly should have had a penalty after Bongi Ntuli was fouled
   inside the box, but when you’re at the bottom all these decisions seem
   to go against you.

   We have a tough game on Wednesday when we face Ajax away but we have to
   keep believing that all is not over.

   Only when mathematically its not possible anymore, we will stop
   fighting for our survival. So until that day, we will continue fighting

   Playing away against the defending PSL champions Kaizer Chiefs was
   never going to be easy an easy task, but we were confident of snatching
   a point from the game.

   We set out our plan and defended very well for most part of the game.
   Containing them for as long as possible was what we had planned on
   doing, however,  a lapse of concentration on a free kick cost us the
   opening goal.

   We managed to get into their box but were always outnumbered and found
   it difficult to create clear cut chances.

   From team managements point of view, there are definitely some
   positives to take into our game against Maritzburg Utd on Sunday at
   Harry Gwala Stadium.

   I feel this could be the match that we have been looking for as a
   turning point in our season and our quest for survival.

   Thanks for the continuous support from our fans.

   After losing to Mamelodi Sundowns in the Nedbank Cup,  we needed to
   bounce back in the PSL against Bidvest Wits.

   We had prepared well and were ready to take them on.  Because of this,
   we started the game well, and the positive play created a few scoring
   opportunities, however,  as our season has been,  we could not convert
   any of them.

   Then, with a lapse of concentration in defence,  we conceded a goal
   before half time against the run of play.

   In the second half we came out onto the field again with the fighting
   spirit and positive attitude as the first half. We managed to contain
   them for the majority of the game and showed that we do have the
   capabilities to pull through as a team. I do feel that after the full
   time whistle that all our possession did not reflect in the score line,
   but the commitment was still evident from the team.

   With three away games coming up, we will have to get our act together
   and pick up points quickly to close the gap.

   We continue our fight against relegation with our next game being
   against Kaizer Chiefs on Wednesday night at FNB Stadium.

   Keep the belief that this struggle is not over yet, and continue
   supporting the team!

   Taking a break from our League games, we entertained Mamelodi Sundowns
   in the last 16 of the Nedbank Cup at King Zwelithini.

   We started the game at a high tempo as we had decided to do before the
   game.
   Getting the first goal through Philane Shange gave us the reward we
   deserved for our dominance in the first half.

   But, once again, we allowed the opposition to come back into the game
   by not converting our chances and conceding a soft equaliser just
   before half time.

   With the quality Sundowns possess, we allowed them too much time on the
   ball and did not apply the necessary pressure in our own  half.

   In  my opinion, the scoreline at the end of the game does not truly
   reflect how well we played and how much we put them under pressure for
   the majority of the game.

   However, it was definitely positive to see the players try their best
   but at the end of the day it was individual mistakes that cost us the
   game.

   We are now looking forward to Wits next weekend at Umlazi in our  PSL
   encounter.

   As disapponting as the result was against Aces, we needed to bounce
   back against Swallows at Dobsonville.

   Travelling away to a team that was also struggling for results was
   never going to be easy especially seeing as Swallows are so dangerous
   when playing at home.

   Saying that, having dominated the game and creating more than 10 clear
   scoring opportunities, we came away with nothing to show for our hard
   work. Where SWallows had one free kick and managed to get that goal. We
   showed a lot of character and had good spells throughout the game,
   showing some positive teamwork and play, which is encouraging to see.

   With the same fighting spirit and belief we can continue our fight in
   our PSL campaign.

   We have to entertain a very good Sundowns team in the Nedbank Cup this
   weekend and will be bringing the same positive attitude and mind set
   with us to the stadium.

   This game can potentially turn our season around with a good
   performance and result. Which is our biggest aim.

   See you at King Zwelithini this evening!

   Having had a short break after our last game, it was always going to be
   difficult to start the game at a high tempo.

   We gave Aced a lot of space and gave them too much time on the ball. We
   didn’t put them under enough pressure and only started playing in the
   second half.

   After getting the equaliser, we created a few more opportunities, but
   again, could not convert them.

   We have to realise that football is a 90 minute game and need to start
   our games off better in the future.

   We have made it difficult for ourselves but have to continue working
   hard as we still have 10 games to play.

   We have a tough task ahead with our away game against Swallows, but we
   need to bounce back as quickly as possible.

   Lets continue the battle of climbing up and off the bottom of the log.

   After starting the game at a great tempo and putting Tuks under
   pressure, we managed to score the 1st goal through Bongi Ntuli.

   But we then sat back and allowed Tuks back into the game through losing
   posession in our own half.

   The 2nd started well by creating a few chances but once again lacking
   to convert those chances we paid the price of conceeding again.

   Through a few moments of lapse of concentration, and individual errors
   cost us the game against Tuks.

   With 11 games to go, we will have to pull together and continue having
   the self belief that we can overcome these obstacles and keep working
   on our weaknesses and strengths.

   Looking forward to our next home game against Mpumalanga Black aces in
   12 days time.

   Another great team effort to ensure our spot in the last 16 of the
   Nedbank Cup the past weekend.

   More than anything the result will bring back the confidence in the
   squad and continue our great run of results at home.

   Now we look forward to our next PSL encounter vs Tuks next weekend.As
   difficult as it may

   be, with the support we have had the past 2 home games, I’m sure we can
   get another 3 points from that game.

   See you all next week at King Zwelithini.

   Following a great result against Polokwane City last week, we looked to
   Free State Stars as another massive game in our quest to climb the
   table.

   It was going to be a tough task playing away to Free State Stars and
   picking up points. We held them for the first 30 minutes of the half
   but a dubious foul on Zwane and a lapse in concentration on our part
   cost us a goal before half time.

   The next goal was to determine the result ,and unfortunately they got
   it. We came back strong in the last 30 minutes but could not convert
   the chances we created. Bongi Ntuli pulled one back for us which made
   for an interesting finish to the game.

   Taking the result into consideration, we have to continue working hard
   and picking up points where people least expect it.

   Looking forward now to our Nedbank Cup game against Polokwane City at
   home on Saturday.

   We call on all our supporters to please keep the support up for the
   team during this time.

   Following another defeat to Mamelodi Sundowns on Wednesday, we needed
   to bounce back against an in form Polokwane City.

   We always knew it will be a difficult game but as a team we showed a
   lot of character and determination to get the win we wanted. Our
   organisation and attacking approach gave us a better chance of
   exploiting their weaknesses.

   Getting our 1st win at home after 6 successive defeats will restore
   some confidence in the players and help with our goal of climbing the
   table.

   The fans were unbelievable in their support and hopefully they will
   keep on lifting the players when we need them

   In our second game in 3 days against the two Soweto giants we equipped
   ourselves well at the Orlando Stadium. It was never going to be easy
   but again our commitment and application was excellent, I felt our
   quality of play at times was a little lacking but maybe a few tired
   legs contributed to that.

   Again we conceded two silly goals due to our own errors and made life
   difficult for ourselves in an already very difficult place. Saying
   that,  we pushed Pirates all the way and had a couple of chances to
   draw level and their third goal only came as we committed more players
   forward in the final few minutes looking for the equaliser.

   I do believe that,  if we can maintain the standard we showed in our
   last two games against Chiefs and Pirates then our second half of the
   season will be a successful campaign.

   The Teams performance against Chiefs was a massive improvement upon our
   last two games and the commitment and quality shown by all the players
   was there to be seen by everyone. We matched Chiefs in every department
   and I know we deserved a result out of the game.

   In the final third we need to be a bit more clinical and a little more
   determined to finish off our chances, and if we can create these sort
   of chances against
   Chiefs,  then we can surely do so against any other PSL opposition.

   All in all our performance deserved a different result but
   unfortunately the referee had other ideas and gave Chiefs a life line
   with a very dodgy penalty decision which turned the game upside down
   and handed Chiefs a victory they did not deserve.

   If we can bring this type of display to the table week in and week out,
    then our season will turn around quickly.

   A poor first half performance and conceding 3 goals was ultimately what
   cost us this Durban derby match against Amazulu.

   When it comes to a derby game there is always a lot more at stake, and
   it took us 45 minutes to realise that, however we were already 3 goals
   down, and the hill we had left ourselves to climb was too big.

   The second half was a much better performance all round and we created
   a number of chances to get ourselves back into the game but
   unfortunately we could not capitalise on any of them.

   As a team we have to know it is all of our responsibility to defend
   goals and to score goals! It’s not just down to certain individuals but
   a collective responsibility to win games.

   The game against Platinum Stars was a game I know we should have won,
   our performance was below the standard we have now set for ourselves,
   it was disappointing as we had put ourselves in a good position to
   climb the table.

   On the day when we were not at our best we came in at half time 1-0 up
   but with two lapses of concentration at the back we conceded two soft
   goal which gave us a hill to climb against one of the best teams in the
   league.

   In the last 20 minutes of the game we started to show some of the form
   of our recent games but we were unable to find the goal we needed, it
   was too little too late.

   In our next game away against Celtic on Wednesday,  we will need to
   show more character and resilience to make sure we pick up points there
   to get ourselves back on track

   The Derby game against Maritzburg United was always going to be a tense
   affair but we coped well with the pressure and delivered an excellent
   performance. Throughout the 90 minutes we created numerous chances with
   our great passing game and should have scored more than the two goals
   we did score. When we lost possession we showed we could also defend.

   I felt we held our shape well and pressed the opposition aggressively
   to win back possession as early as possible.
   In general we well deserved our victory and 3 points, we now need to
   build on this and push ourselves up the table.

   The game against Supersport United was a difficult away game. They are
   the team that I am sure will be challenging for the championship at the
   end of the season.

   The first half was evenly fought and I felt we gave as good as we got
   and deserved to come out at half time 1-1. I was proud of the play and
   consistency carried across from the Swallows match by the players, and
   they looked confident on the pitch.

   As the second half progressed I felt we tired a little probably due to
   the hard game we had played 3 days earlier and we started to concede
   territory and allowed Supersport too much space and time. This allowed
   them to pass the ball around too easily and we ended up conceding two
   goals. in saying that we continued to try and play our passing game and
   created numerous goal chances which, on another day we may have
   converted.

   Non-the less 3 points from the two games of this size was a good return
   and gives us something to build on. The players performances over the
   past two matches have been especially encouraging and reassures me
   there are much better times ahead.

   We thoroughly deserved our victory in the game against Moroka Swallows
   , who are a team challenging for the top and unbeaten in 5 games.

   In the first 30 minutes we were excellent in all departments scoring
   twice and creating numerous other chances.

   In the second half we had to show the other side of our game and defend
   for periods which we did professionally. It was a well deserved victory
   in which the players showed exactly what they are capable of producing
   so we now need to try and display some consistency in our form going
   forward.

   Our PSL game against Black Aces was literally a game of two halves. We
   started very slowly with the possibility of a hangover from the Pirates
   game.

   We didn’t compete as well as we should have done and our passing game
   could have been much better. We conceded a goal ten minutes before half
   time which left us with an uphill battle in the second half.

   We changed things round at half time and in the second half we showed
   much more determination and desire to win the game. We practically
   dominated the second half, passing the ball with much more urgency and
   quality and created four or five great chances to score. We at least
   deserved a draw if not a win but you have to take your chances when
   they come and stop conceding soft goals.

   The Telkom Cup game against Orlando Pirates was a game that we could
   never get a foothold in. Pirates dominated the game from start to last,
   they showed exactly why they are in the final of the champions league.
   This was probably the best performance I have seen from a South African
   team. Their passing,movement and tempo was first class.

   After being 3-0 down at half time we at least steadied the ship in the
   second half and contained them better but the game was probably over by
   then.

   In our last match against the University of Pretoria, we had a very
   sloppy start and we were punished in that moment. Immediately there
   after we improved our game and we started coming at them and we still
   could not convert our chances. Our second half was very impressive, we
   started pushing them backwards and we got a chance after another but
   still we just could not convert anything. In the last ten minutes of
   the match we were caught with a counter attack and that made our
   situation to be very tough.

   Once again I still believe there is still too much room for improvement
   when you consider that our performances have not been below the desired
   levels, it’s only a question of our strikers finding the target then
   all will change for the better.

   In our match against Free State stars I believe we were very unlucky
   considering the number of chances that we created, we put Free state
   stars under a lot of pressure but we couldn’t convert even one chance
   from the amount of possession and the number of clear chances that we
   created.

   One must say that it is so unfortunate to have played six matches but
   none of our strikers had scored a goal. We just have to be patient with
   them because I’m still very optimistic that these boys are still going
   to turn the corner because it is not a question of them not performing
   but more a question of not taking their chances and being punished from
   such errors.

   We’ve had a very bumpy start to the season and it is so disappointing
   to have only collected 4 points in six matches. Our second batch of
   matches started with a lot of promise when we managed a victory away in
   Polokwane in very hot conditions. Our players showed a lot of courage
   and determination in this match and it was no wonder that we came home
   with maximum points.

   In our match against Sundowns, we started very well and we were just
   unfortunate not to score from our splendid first half where we created
   a lot of scoring opportunities from counter attacking situations. We
   were very unlucky but one should state that we also allowed a lot of
   shots in front of our defense which was a bit frustrating. Second half
   we wanted to have bit more creativity and we took out one of our
   defensive mid fielders to complement what we were getting from our wing
   play. Little did we know that in that plan we might encounter two
   forced substitutions from both our strikers and that crippled our plan
   to try and have two offensive midfielders since we all anticipated that
   Philani Shange might not finish the match after an explosive first
   half. Once again we conceded a very silly goal from Wome whom we had
   warned our players about his long range shots and the value of closing
   him down around the penalty area.

   I was however left very optimistic by our team and I’m looking forward
   to a very exciting season ahead of us. Thanks once again to all our
   supporters for their support and I promise all and sundry that this is
   a season you will all be proud off.

   After a very long and frustrating lay off, one has also had very
   disappointing results. One would like to start with our match against
   Bidvest Wits. This is one match I would like to forget based on how we
   performed on the day more especially our first half.

   We had more than four key players who were just not at their best on
   the match. We committed a lot of defensive errors and we were lucky not
   to get punished from those errors but we conceded from a very long and
   tame diagonal ball from Jayiya which was headed home by Ngalande.

   Our second half was promising if it was not for the chances that we
   also missed and a few dubious decisions by the match officials. One
   must say that this was our worst performance this season but we also
   hope it was an eye opener to all our boys.

   Firstly, it was so encouraging to play in such a packed stadium and one
   must really thank our supporters who came in numbers. One should also
   commend the good work that was done  by the club in all their drives to
   pack the stadium.

   Coming into the match, I was disappointed  by not winning the match
   because i think our boys gave a very good account of themselves. It was
   so encouraging to see so many debutants putting such a good
   performance. There is still a lot of work that we still have to do in
   both our defensive and offensive play. The biggest highlight for me was
   to see an Arrows team that really played the kind of football which we
   are all accustomed to and we can only build from there.

   The quest to bring back the glory days at Arrows has just begun let us
   just rally together in this revolution to see our beloved team claiming
   its rightful place in the Premiership.
   ” Aluta Continua”
                                                        P W D L GF GA GD Pts
   [lamontvillegoldenarrows.png]      Golden Arrows     8 2 4 8 7  12 -5 10
   [bloemfonteinceltic.png]           Bloem Celtic      7 2 2 3 9  7  2  8
   [supersportutd.png]                SuperSport Utd    7 3 2 2 11 9  2  11
   [maritzburgunited.png]             Maritzburg Utd    6 1 2 3 3  5  -2 5
   [leopards.png]                     Black Leopards    7 2 2 3 5  7  -2 8
   [orlandopirates.png]               Orlando Pirates   7 2 3 2 11 12 -1 9
   [polokwanecity.png]                Polokwane City    7 4 1 2 6  4  2  13
   [barokafc.png]                     Baroka FC         7 2 2 3 6  7  -1 8
   [stellenboschfc-logo-200x200.png]  Stellenbosch FC   7 0 4 3 6  9  -3 4
   [kaizerchiefs.png]                 Kaizer Chiefs     8 6 1 1 12 5  7  19
   [capetowncity.png]                 Cape Town City    8 1 5 2 13 14 -1 8
   [bidvestwits.png]                  Bidvest Wits      6 5 0 1 11 5  6  15
   [amazulu.png]                      AmaZulu           8 1 2 5 4  11 -7 5
   [chippaunited.png]                 Chippa Utd        8 0 4 4 3  7  -4 4
   [mamelodisundowns.png]             Mamelodi Sundowns 5 3 2 0 8  4  4  11
   [highlandspark-e1529321561113.png] Highlands Park    6 3 2 1 10 7  3  11
   FAN PICS
   DESKTOP IMAGES
   FAN GEAR

   Lamontville Golden Arrows FC
   Copyright All Rights Reserved © 2017

   Start typing and press Enter to search
   ____________________
   #Lamontville Golden Arrows FC » Feed Lamontville Golden Arrows FC »
   Comments Feed Lamontville Golden Arrows FC » Search Results for
   “{search_term_string}” Feed

     * 1ST TEAM
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + 2019/20 LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + MATCH REPORTS
     * COACHES COLUMN
     * DISKI
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + CHALLENGE LOG
          + SHIELD FIXTURES
          + SHIELD LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
     * RESERVES
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * Official Website Official Website Official Website
     * u17
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * THE CLUB
          + CLUB RECORDS
          + HISTORY
          + TROPHY CABINET
     * NEWS
     * FAN ZONE
          + FAN IMAGES
          + DESKTOP IMAGES
          + FAN GEAR
     * CONTACT US

   Official Website Official Website Official Website Official Website

     * 1ST TEAM
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + 2019/20 LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + MATCH REPORTS
     * COACHES COLUMN
     * DISKI
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + CHALLENGE LOG
          + SHIELD FIXTURES
          + SHIELD LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
     * RESERVES
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * u17
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * THE CLUB
          + CLUB RECORDS
          + HISTORY
          + TROPHY CABINET
     * NEWS
     * FAN ZONE
          + FAN IMAGES
          + DESKTOP IMAGES
          + FAN GEAR
     * CONTACT US

   ____________________ Submit

Search

   Search Results for: "{search_term_string}"
   Home » You searched for “{search_term_string}”

   Not so happy with results? Search for a new keyword
   ____________________ Submit

   Lamontville Golden Arrows FC
   Copyright All Rights Reserved © 2017

   Start typing and press Enter to search
   ____________________
   REFRESH(0 sec): file://localhost/


   No direct script access allowed

   #Lamontville Golden Arrows FC » Feed Lamontville Golden Arrows FC »
   Comments Feed alternate alternate

     * 1ST TEAM
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + 2019/20 LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + MATCH REPORTS
     * COACHES COLUMN
     * DISKI
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + CHALLENGE LOG
          + SHIELD FIXTURES
          + SHIELD LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
     * RESERVES
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * Official Website Official Website Official Website
     * u17
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * THE CLUB
          + CLUB RECORDS
          + HISTORY
          + TROPHY CABINET
     * NEWS
     * FAN ZONE
          + FAN IMAGES
          + DESKTOP IMAGES
          + FAN GEAR
     * CONTACT US

   Official Website Official Website Official Website Official Website

     * 1ST TEAM
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + 2019/20 LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + MATCH REPORTS
     * COACHES COLUMN
     * DISKI
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + FIXTURES
          + CHALLENGE LOG
          + SHIELD FIXTURES
          + SHIELD LOG
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
     * RESERVES
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * u17
          + PLAYER PROFILES
          + TECHNICAL STAFF
          + FIXTURES
          + LOG
     * THE CLUB
          + CLUB RECORDS
          + HISTORY
          + TROPHY CABINET
     * NEWS
     * FAN ZONE
          + FAN IMAGES
          + DESKTOP IMAGES
          + FAN GEAR
     * CONTACT US

   ____________________ Submit

Abafana bediski take on Matsatsantsa

   Home » News » Abafana bediski take on Matsatsantsa
     * Print
     * Email

   Diski Game Preview, NEWS
   August 23, 2019

   The Diski team take on SuperSport United at home on Sunday 25 August in
   the third game of the Multichoice Diski Challenge.

   The team has grown in confidence since kicking off their season and
   after losing to Kaizer Chiefs in their first outing, did well to fight
   back against Bloem Celtic last weekend, but eventually losing 3-1 after
   equalising.

   The home game could give the side the added confidence they need as
   they look for their first win for the season.

   SuperSport United have not yet lost a game, and will be looking to
   continue on their positive road on Sunday.

   In their first game they did well against Maritzburg United, with a
   convincing win at Harry Gwala Stadium. Their second encounter saw them
   draw against Stellenbosch FC.

   Entry to the game is free, so get to the stadium and come and watch the
   youngsters in action at Sugar Ray Stadium at 12pm on Sunday.

   Lamontville Golden Arrows FC
   Copyright All Rights Reserved © 2017

   Start typing and press Enter to search
   ____________________

   Diski action in Bloemfontein on SundayDiski Game Preview, NEWS

   Abafana Bes’thende host the Chilli BoysGame Preview, NEWS
